TO
WILLIAM BRANDFORD SHUBRICK,
ESQUIRE,
MAST. COM. U. S. NAVY.
MY DEAR SHUBRICK,
Each year causes some new and
melancholy chasm in what is now the brief
list of my naval friends and former
associates
.
War, disease, and the casualties
of a hazardous profession, have made
fearful
inroads in the limited number; while
the places of the dead are supplied by
names that to me are strangers. With the
consequences of these sad changes before
me, I cherish the recollection of those with
whom I once lived in close familiarity with
peculiar interest, and feel a triumph in
their growing reputations, that is but little
short of their own honest pride.
But neither time nor separation have
shaken our intimacy: and I know that in
dedicating to you these volumes, I tell you
nothing new, when I add, that it is a
tribute
paid to an enduring friendship, by
Your old messmate,
THE AUTHOR.
VOL. I BVOL. I. 1
THE PILOT.
CHAPTER I.
Sullen waves, incessant rolling,
Rudely dash against her sides.
Song
.
A single
glance at the map will make the reader
acquainted with the position of the eastern coast
of the island of Great Britain, as connected
with the shores of the opposite continent.
Together
they form the boundaries of the small
sea, that has for ages been known to the world
as the scene of maritime exploits, and as the
great avenue through which commerce and war
have conducted the fleets of the northern
nations
of Europe. Over this sea the islanders long
asserted a jurisdiction, exceeding that which
reason
concedes to any power on the highway of
nations
,
and which frequently led to conflicts that
caused an expenditure of blood and treasure,
utterly
disproportioned to the advantages that can
ever arise from the maintenance of a useless and
abstract right. It is across the waters of this
disputed
ocean that we shall attempt to conduct our
readers, in imagination, selecting a period for our
incidents that has peculiar interests for every
American, not only because it was the birth-day
of his nation, but because it was also the era when
reason and common sense began to take place of
custom and feudal practices in the management of
the affairs of nations.
Soon after the events of the revolution had
involved
the kingdoms of France and Spain, and
the republics of Holland, in our quarrel, a group
of labourers were collected in a field that lay
exposed
to the winds of the ocean, on the
north-eastern
coast of England. These men were
lightening
their toil in husbandry, and cheering the
gloom of a day in December, by uttering their
crude opinions on the political aspects of the
times. The fact that England was engaged in a
war with some of her dependencies on the other
side of the Atlantic, had long been known to
them, after the manner that faint rumours of
distant
and uninteresting events gain on the ear;
but now that nations, with whom she had been
used to battle, were armed against her in the
quarrel
,
the din of war had disturbed the quiet even
of these secluded and illiterate rustics. The
principal speakers, on the occasion, were a Scotch
drover, who was waiting the leisure of the
occupant
of the fields, and an Irish labourer, who had
found his way across the channel, and thus far
over the island, in quest of employment.
The Nagurs wouldn't have been a job at all
for ould England, letting alone Ireland, said the
latter, if these French and Spanishers hadn't
been troubling themselves in the matter. I'm
sure it's but little rason I have for thanking them,
if a man is to kape as sober as a praist at mass,
for fear he should find himself a souldier, and he
knowing nothing about the same.
Hoot! mon! ye ken but little of raising an
airmy in Ireland, if ye mak' a drum o' a whiskey
keg, said the drover, winking to the listeners.
Noo, in the north, they ca' a gathering of the
folk, and follow the pipes as graciously as ye wad
journey kirkward o' a Sabbeth morn. I've seen
a' the names o' a Heeland raj'ment on a sma' bit
paper, that ye might cover wi' a leddy's hand.
They war' a' Camerons and M`Donalds, though
they paraded sax hundred men! But what ha'
ye gotten here! That chield has an ow'r liking
to the land for a seafaring body; an' if the bottom
o' the sea be ony thing like the top o't, he's in
gr'at danger o' a shipwrack!
This unexpected change in the discourse, drew
all eyes on the object towards which the staff of
the observant drover was pointed. To the utter
amazement of every individual present, a small
vessel was seen moving slowly round a point of
land that formed one of the sides of the little bay,
to which the field the labourers were in composed
the other. There was something very peculiar in
the externals of this unusual visiter, which added
in no small degree to the surprise created by her
appearance in that retired place. None but the
smallest vessels, and those rarely, with, at long
intervals, a desperate smuggler, were ever known
to venture so close to the land, amid the sand-bars
and sunken rocks with which that immediate
coast abounded. The adventurous mariners who
now attempted this dangerous navigation in so
wanton, and, apparently, so heedless a manner, were
in a low, black schooner, whose hull seemed
utterly
disproportioned to the raking masts it upheld,
which, in their turn, supported a lighter set of spars,
that tapered away until their upper extremities
appeared no larger than the lazy pennant, that in
vain endeavoured to display its length in the light
breeze.
The short day of that high northern latitude
was already drawing to a close, and the sun was
throwing his parting rays obliquely across the
waters, touching the gloomy waves here and there
with streaks of pale light. The stormy winds of
the German ocean were apparently lulled to rest;
and, though the incessant rolling of the surge on
the shore, heightened the gloomy character of the
hour and the view, the light ripple that ruffled the
sleeping billows was produced by a gentle air, that
blew directly from the land. Notwithstanding
this favourable circumstance, there was something
threatening in the aspect of the ocean, which was
speaking in hollow, but deep murmurs, like a
volcano
on the eve of an eruption, that greatly
heightened
the feelings of amazement and dread with which
the peasants beheld this extraordinary
interruption
to the quiet of their little bay. With no other
sails spread to the action of the air, than her heavy
mainsail, and one of those light jibs that projected
far beyond her bows, the vessel glided over the
water with a grace and facility that seemed
magical
to the beholders, who turned their
wondering
looks from the schooner to each other, in silent
amazement. At length the drover spoke in a low,
solemn voice
He's a bold chield that steers her! and
if that bit craft has wood in her bottom, like
the brigantines that ply between Lon'on and
the Frith at Leith, he's in mair danger than
a prudent mon could wish. Ay! he's by the big
rock that shows his head when the tide runs low,
but it's no mortal man who can steer long in the
road he's journeying, and not speedily find land
wi' water a top o't.
The little schooner, however, still held her way
among the rocks and sand-spits, making such slight
deviations in her course, as proved her to be
under
the direction of one who knew his danger,
until she had entered as far into the bay as
prudence
1*
could at all justify, when her canvass was
gathered into folds, seemingly without the agency
of hands, and the vessel, after rolling for a few
minutes on the long billows that hove in from the
ocean, swung round in the currents of the tide,
and was held by her anchor.
The peasantry, now, began to make their
conjectures
more freely, on the character and object
of their visiter; some intimating that she was
engaged
in a contraband trade, and others that her
views were hostile, and her business war. A few
dark hints were hazarded on the materiality of
her construction, for nothing of artificial formation,
it was urged, would be ventured by men in such
a dangerous place, at a time when even the most
inexperienced landsman was enabled to foretell the
certain gale. The Scotchman, who, to all the
sagacity of his countrymen, added no small
portion
of their superstition, leaned greatly to the
latter conclusion, and had begun to express this
sentiment warily and with reverence, when the
child of Erin, who appeared not to possess any
very definite ideas on the subject, interrupted him,
by exclaiming
Faith! there's two of them! a big and a
little! sure the bogles of the saa likes good
company
the same as any other christians!
Twa! echoed the drover; twa! ill luck
bides o' some o' ye. Twa craft a sailing without
hands to guide them, in sic a place as this, whar'
eyesight is na guid enough to show the dangers,
bodes evil to a' that luik thereon. Hoot! she's
na yearling the tither! Luik, mon! luik! she's
a gallant boat, and a gr'at; he paused, raised his
pack from the ground, and first giving one
searching
look at the objects of his suspicions, he
nodded
with great sagacity to the listeners, and
continued
,
as he moved slowly towards the interior of
the country, I should na wonder if she carried
King George's commission aboot her; 'weel, 'weel,
I wull journey upward to the town, and ha'a crack
wi' the guid mon, for they craft have a suspeecious
aspect, and the sma' bit thing wu'ld nab a mon
quite easy, and the big ane wu'ld hold us a' and
no feel we war' in her.
This sagacious warning caused a general
movement in the party, for the intelligence of a
hot press was among the rumours of the times.
The husbandmen collected their implements of
labour, and retired homewards; and though
many a curious eye was bent on the movements of
the vessels from the distant hills, but very few of
those not immediately interested in the mysterious
visiters, ventured to approach the little rocky
cliffs that lined the bay.
The vessel that occasioned these cautious
movements, was a gallant ship, whose huge hull,
lofty masts, and square yards, loomed in the
evening's
haze, above the sea, like a distant mountain
rising from the deep. She carried but little sail,
and though she warily avoided the near approach
to the land that the schooner had attempted, the
similarity of their movements was sufficiently
apparent
to warrant the conjecture that they were
employed on the same duty. The frigate, for
the ship belonged to this class of vessels, floated
across the entrance of the little bay, majestically
in the tide, with barely enough motion through
the water to govern her movements, until she
arrived
opposite to where her consort lay, when she
hove up heavily into the wind, squared the
enormous
yards on her mainmast, and attempted, in
counteracting the power of her sails by each other,
to remain stationary; but the light air that had
at no time swelled her heavy canvass to the utmost,
began to fail, and the long waves that rolled in
from the ocean, ceased to be ruffled with the
breeze from the land. The currents, and the
billows
,
were fast sweeping the frigate towards one of
the points of the estuary, where the black heads of
the rocks could be seen running far into the sea,
and, in their turn, the mariners of the ship
dropped
an anchor to the bottom, and drew her sails in
festoons to the yards. As the vessel swung round
to the tide, a heavy ensign was raised to her peak,
and a current of air opening, for a moment, its
folds, the white field, and red cross, that
distinguish
the flag of England, were displayed to view.
So much, even the wary drover had loitered at a
distance to behold; but when a boat was launched
from either vessel, he quickened his steps, observing
to his wondering and amused companions, that
they craft were a' thegither, mair bonny to
luik on than to abide wi'.
A numerous crew manned the barge that was
lowered from the frigate, which, after receiving an
officer, with an attendant youth, left the ship, and
moved with a measured stroke of its oars, directly
towards the head of the bay. As it passed at a
short distance from the schooner, a light
whale-boat
,
pulled by four athletic men, shot from her
side, and rather dancing over, than cutting through
the waves, crossed her course with a wonderful
velocity. As the boats approached each other,
the men, in obedience to signals from their officers,
suspended their efforts, and for a few minutes they
floated at rest, during which time, there was the
following dialogue:
Is the old man mad! exclaimed the young
officer in the whale-boat, when his men had ceased
rowing; does he think that the bottom of the
Ariel is made of iron, and that a rock can't knock
a hole in it! or does he think she is mann'd with
alligators, who can't be drown'd!
A languid smile played for a moment round the
handsome features of the young man, who was
rather reclining than sitting in the stern-sheets of
the barge, as he replied,
He knows your prudence too well, Captain
Barnstable, to fear either the wreck of your
vessel
,
or the drowning of her crew. How near the
bottom does your keel lie?
I am afraid to sound, returned Barnstable.
I have never the heart to touch a lead-line when
I see the rocks coming up to breathe like so many
porpoises.
You are afloat! exclaimed the other, with
a vehemence that denoted an abundance of latent
fire.
Afloat! echoed his friend; ay! the little
Ariel would float in air! As he spoke, he rose
in the boat, and lifting his leathern sea-cap from his
head, stroked back the thick clusters of black
locks which shadowed his sun-burnt countenance,
while he viewed his little vessel with the
complacency
of a seaman who was proud of her
qualities
.
But it's close work, Mr. Griffith, when a
man rides to a single anchor in a place like this,
and at such a nightfall. What are the orders?
I shall pull into the surf and let go a
grapnel
;
you will take Mr. Merry into your
whale-boat
,
and try to drive her through the breakers on
the beach.
Beach! retorted Barnstable; do you call
a perpendicular rock of a hundred feet in height,
a beach!
We shall not dispute about terms, said
Griffith
,
smiling; but you must manage to get on the
shore; we have seen the signal from the land,
and know that the pilot, whom we have so long
expected, is ready to come off.
Barnstable shook his head with a grave air,
as he muttered to himself, this is droll
navigation
;
first we run into an unfrequented bay that
is full of rocks, and sand-spits, and shoals, and
then we get off our pilot. But how am I to know
him?
Merry will give you the pass-word, and
tell you where to look for him. I would land
myself
,
but my orders forbid it. If you meet with
difficulties, show three oar-blades in a row, and I
will pull in to your assistance. Three oars on
end, and a pistol, will bring the fire of my
muskets
,
and the signal repeated from the barge will
draw a shot from the ship.
I thank you, I thank you, said Barnstable,
carelessly; I believe I can fight my own battles
against all the enemies we are likely to fall in with
on this coast. But the old man is surely mad. I
would
You would obey his orders if he were here,
and you will now please to obey mine, said
Griffith, in a tone that the friendly expression of
his eye contradicted. Pull in, and keep a look
out for a small man in a drab pea-jacket; Merry
will give you the word; if he answer it bring him
off to the barge.
The young men now nodded familiarly and
kindly to each other, and the boy, who was called
Mr. Merry, having changed his place from the
barge to the whale-boat, Barnstable threw himself
into his seat, and making a signal with his hand,
his men again bent to their oars. The light
vessel
shot away from her companion, and dashed in
boldly towards the rocks; after skirting the shore
for some distance in quest of a favourable place,
she was suddenly turned, and, dashing over the
broken waves, was run upon a spot where a
landing
could be effected in safety.
In the mean time the barge followed these
movements, at some distance, with a more
measured
progress, and when the whale-boat was
observed
to be drawn up along side of a rock, the
promised grapnel was cast into the water, and her
crew deliberately proceeded to get their firearms
in a state for immediate service. Every thing
appeared to be done in obedience to strict orders
that must have been previously communicated;
for the young man, who has been introduced to
the reader by the name of Griffith, seldom spoke,
and then only in the pithy expressions that are
apt to fall from those who are sure of obedience.
When the boat had brought up to her grapnel, he
sunk back at his length on the cushioned seats of
the barge, and drawing his hat over his eyes in a
listless manner, he continued for many minutes
apparently
absorbed in thoughts altogether foreign to
his present situation. Occasionally he rose, and
would first bend his looks in quest of his
companions
on the shore, and then, turning his
expressive
eyes towards the ocean, the abstracted and
vacant air that so often usurped the place of
animation
and intelligence in his countenance, would
give place to the anxious and intelligent look of
a seaman gifted with an experience beyond his
years. His weather-beaten and hardy crew,
having
made their dispositions for offence, sat in
profound
silence, with their hands thrust into the
bosoms
of their jackets, but with their eyes earnestly
regarding every cloud that was gathering in the
threatening atmosphere, and exchanging looks of
deep care, whenever the boat rose higher than
usual on one of those long, heavy ground-swells
that were heaving in from the ocean with
increasing
rapidity and magnitude.
CHAPTER II.
A horseman's coat shall hide
Thy taper shape and comeliness of side;
And with a bolder stride and looser air,
Mingled with men, a man thou must appear.
Prior
.
When
the whale-boat obtained the position we
have described, the young lieutenant, who, in
consequence of commanding a schooner, was
usually addressed by the title of captain, stepped
on the rocks, followed by the youthful
midshipman
,
who had quitted the barge, to aid in the
hazardous
duty of their expedition.
This is, at best, but a Jacob's ladder we have
to climb, said Barnstable, casting his eyes
upwards
at the difficult ascent, and it's by no
means certain that we shall be well received, when
we get up, though we should even reach the top.
We are under the guns of the frigate,
returned
the boy; and you remember, sir, three
oar blades and a pistol, repeated from the barge,
will draw her fire.
Yes, on our own heads. Boy, never be so
foolish as to trust a long shot. It makes a great
smoke and some noise, but it's a terrible uncertain
manner of throwing old iron about. In such a
business as this, I would sooner trust Tom Coffin
and his harpoon to back me, than the best
broad-side
that ever rattled out of the three deeks of a
ninety-gun ship. Come, gather your limbs
together
,
and try if you can walk on terra firma,
Master Coffin.
The seaman who was addressed by this dire
appellation, arose slowly from the place where he
was stationed as cockswain of the boat, and
seemed
to ascend high in air by the gradual evolution
of numberless folds in his body. When erect, he
stood nearly six feet and as many inches in his
shoes, though, when elevated in his most
perpendicular
attitude, there was a forward inclination
about his head and shoulders, that appeared to be
the consequence of habitual confinement in
limited
lodgings. His whole frame was destitute of
the rounded outlines of a well-formed man, though
his enormous hands furnished a display of bones
and sinews which gave indications of gigantic
strength. On his head he wore a little, low, brown
hat of wool, with an arched top, that threw an
expression
of peculiar solemnity and hardness over
his harsh visage, the sharp prominent features of
which were completely encircled by a set of black
whiskers, that began to be grizzled a little with
age. One of his hands grasped, with a sort of
instinct, the staff of a bright harpoon, the lower
end of which he placed firmly on the rock, as, in
obedience to the order of his commander, he left
the place, where, considering his vast dimensions, he
had been established in an incredibly small space.
As soon as Captain Barnstable received this
addition to his strength, after giving a few
precautionary orders to the men in the boat, he
proceeded to the difficult task of ascending the
rocks. Notwithstanding the great daring and
personal agility of Barnstable, he would have
been completely baffled in this attempt, but for the
VOL. I. 2
assistance he occasionally received from his
cockswain
,
whose prodigious strength, and great
length of limbs, enabled him to make exertions
which it would have been useless for most men to
attempt. When within a few feet of the summit,
they availed themselves of a projecting rock, to
pause for consultation and breath; both of which
seemed necessary for their further movements.
This will be but a bad place for a retreat,
if we should happen to fall in with enemies, said
Barnstable. Where are we to look for this
pilot
,
Mr. Merry, or how are we to know him; and
what certainty have you that he will not betray
us?
The question you are to put to him is written
on this bit of paper, returned the boy, as he
handed the other the word of recognition; we
made the signal on the point of the rock at yon
headland, but as he must have seen our boat, he
will follow us to this place. As to his betraying
us, he seems to have the confidence of Captain
Munson, who has kept a bright look-out for him
ever since we made the land.
Ay, muttered the lieutenant, and I shall
have a bright look-out kept on him, now we are
on
the land. I like not this business of hugging
the shore so closely, nor have I much faith in any
traitor. What think you of it, Master Coffin?
The hardy old seaman, thus addressed, turned
his grave visage on his commander, and replied
with a becoming gravity
Give me plenty of sea-room, and good
canvass
,
where there is no 'casion for pilots at all,
sir. For my part, I was born on board a
chebac-co-man
,
and never could see the use of more land
than now and then a small island, to raise a few
vegetables, and to dry your fishI'm sure the
sight of it always makes me feel oncomfortable,
unless we have the wind dead off shore.
Ah! Tom, you are a sensible fellow, said
Barnstable, with an air half comic, half serious.
But we must be moving; the sun is just
touching
those clouds to sea-ward, and God keep us
from riding out this night at anchor in such a
place as this.
Laying his hand on a projection of the rock
above him, Barnstable swung himself forward,
and following this movement with a desperate
leap or two, he stood at once on the brow of the
cliff. His cockswain very deliberately raised the
midshipman after his officer, and proceeding with
more caution, but less exertion, he soon placed
himself by his side.
When they reached the level land, that lay
above the cliffs, and began to inquire, with curious
and wary eyes, into the surrounding scenery, the
adventurers discovered a cultivated country,
divided
,
in the usual manner, by hedges and walls.
Only one habitation for man, however, and that
a small dilapidated cottage, stood within a mile
of them, most of the dwellings being placed as
far as convenience would permit, from the fogs
and damps of the ocean.
Here seems to be neither any thing to
apprehend
,
nor the object of our search, said
Barnstable
,
when he had taken the whole view in his
survey; I fear we have landed to no purpose,
Mr. Merry. What say you, long Tom; see you
what we want?
I see no pilot, sir, returned the cockswain;
but it's an ill wind that blows luck to nobody;
there is a mouthful of fresh meat stowed away
under that row of bushes, that would make a
double ration to all hands in the Ariel.
The midshipman laughed, as he pointed out to
Barnstable the object of the cockswain's
solicitude
,
which proved to be a fat ox, quietly
ruminating
under a hedge near them.
There's many a hungry fellow aboard of us,
said the boy merrily, who would be glad to
second
long Tom's motion, if the time and
business
would permit us to slay the animal.
It's but a lubber's blow, Mr. Merry,
returned
the cockswain, without a muscle of his hard
face yielding, as he struck the end of his harpoon
violently against the earth, and then made a
motion
toward poising his weapon; let Captain
Barnstable but say the word, and I'll drive the
iron through him to the quick; I've sent it to the
seizing in many a whale, that hadn't a jacket of
such blubber as that fellow wears.
Pshaw! you are not on a whaling voyage,
where every thing that offers is game, said
Barnstable
,
turning himself pettishly away from the
beast, as if he distrusted his own forbearance;
but stand fast! I see some one
approaching
behind the hedge. Look to your arms, Mr.
Merrythe first thing we hear may be a shot.
Not from that cruiser, cried the thoughtless
lad; he is a younker, like myself, and would
hardly dare run down upon such a formidable
force as we muster.
You say true, boy, returned Barnstable,
relinquishing
the grasp he held on his pistol. He
comes on with caution, as if afraid. He is small,
and is in drab, though I should hardly call it a
pea-jacketand yet he may be our man. Stand
you both here, while I go and hail him.
As Barnstable walked rapidly towards the
hedge, that in part concealed the stranger, the
latter
stopped suddenly, and seemed to be in doubt
whether to advance or to retreat. Before he had
decided on either, the active sailor was within a
few feet of him.
Pray, sir, said Barnstable, what water
have we in this bay?
The slight form of the stranger started, with
an extraordinary emotion, at this question, and
he shrunk aside involuntarily, as if to conceal
his features, before he answered, in a voice that
was barely audible
I should think it would be the water of the
German ocean.
Indeed! you must have passed no small part
of your short life in the study of geography, to
be so well informed, returned the lieutenant;
perhaps, sir, your cunning is also equal to
telling
me how long we shall detain you, if I make
you a prisoner, in order to enjoy the benefit of
your wit?
To this alarming intimation, the youth who
was addressed made no reply; but, as he
averted
his face, and concealed it with both his hands,
the offended seaman, believing that a salutary
impression
had been made upon the fears of his
auditor
,
was about to proceed with his interrogatories.
The singular agitation of the stranger's frame,
however, caused the lieutenant to continue silent
a few moments longer, when, to his utter
amazement
,
he discovered that what he had mistaken
for alarm, was produced by an endeavour, on the
part of the youth, to suppress a violent fit of
laughter.
Now, by all the whales in the sea, cried
Barnstable
,
but you are merry out of season, young
gentleman. It's quite bad enough to be ordered to
anchor in such a bay as this, with a storm brewing
before my eyes, without landing to be laughed at,
by a stripling who has not strength to carry a
beard if he had one, when I ought to be getting
2*
an offing for the safety of both body and soul.
But I'll know more of you and your jokes, if I
take you into my own mess, and am giggled out
of my sleep for the rest of the cruise.
As the commander of the schooner concluded,
he approached the stranger, with an air of
offering
some violence, but the other shrunk back
from his extended arm, and exclaimed, with a
voice in which real terror had gotten the better of
mirth
Barnstable! dear Barnstable! would you
harm me?
The sailor recoiled several feet, at this
unexpected
appeal, and rubbing his eyes, he threw
the cap from his head, before he cried
What do I hear! and what do I see! There
lies the Arieland yonder is the frigate. Can
this be Katherine Plowden!
His doubts, if any doubts remained, were soon
removed, for the stranger sunk on the bank at
her side, in an attitude in which female
bashfulness
was beautifully contrasted to her
attire
,
and gave vent to her mirth in an
uncontrollable
burst of merriment.
From that moment, all thoughts of his duty,
and the pilot, or even of the Ariel, appeared to
be banished from the mind of the seaman, who
sprang to her side, and joined in her mirth,
though he hardly knew why or wherefore.
When the diverted girl had in some degree
recovered
her composure, she turned to her
companion
,
who had sat good-naturedly by her side,
content to be laughed at, and said
But this is not only silly, but cruel to others.
I owe you an explanation of my unexpected
appearance
,
and perhaps, also, of my extraordinary
attire.
I can anticipate every thing, cried
Barnstable
;
you heard that we were on the coast, and
have flown to redeem the promises you made me
in America. But I ask no more; the chaplain
of the frigate
May preach as usual, and to as little
purpose
,
interrupted the disguised female; but no
nuptial benediction shall be pronounced over me,
until I have effected the object of this hazardous
experiment of mine. You are not usually selfish,
Barnstable; would you have me forgetful of the
happiness of others?
Of whom do you speak?
My poor, my devoted cousin. I heard that
two vessels, answering the description of the
frigate
and the Ariel, were seen hovering on the
coast, and I determined at once to have a
communication
with you. I have followed your
movements
for a week, in this dress, but have been
unsuccessful
till now. To-day I observed you to
approach nearer to the shore than usual, and
happily
,
by being adventurous, I have been
successful
.
Ay, God knows we are near enough to the
land! But does Captain Munson know of your
wish to get on board his ship?
Certainly notnone know of it but
yourself
.
I thought that if Griffith and you could
learn our situation, you might be tempted to
hazard
a little to redeem us from our thraldom. In
this paper I have prepared such an account as
will, I trust, excite all your chivalry, and by
which you may govern your movements.
Our movements! interrupted Barnstable,
you will pilot us in person.
Then there's two of them, said a hoarse
voice near them.
The alarmed female shrieked as she recovered
her feet, but she still adhered, with instinctive
dependence
,
to the side of her lover. Barnstable,
who recognised the tones of his cockswain, bent
an angry brow on the sober visage that was
peering
at them above the hedge, and demanded the
meaning of the interruption.
Seeing you were hull-down, sir, and not
knowing but the chase might lead you ashore, Mr.
Merry thought it best to have a look-out kept. I
told him that you were overhauling the mail bags
of the messenger for the news, but as he was an
officer, sir, and I nothing but a common hand, I
did as he ordered.
Return, sir, where I ordered you to remain,
said Barnstable, and desire Mr. Merry to wait
my pleasure.
The cockswain gave the usual reply of an
obedient
seaman, but before he left the hedge, he
stretched out one of his brawny arms towards the
ocean, and said, in tones of solemnity suited to
his apprehensions and character
I showed you how to knot a reef-point, and
pass a gasket, Captain Barnstable, nor do I
believe
you could even take two half hitches when
you first came aboard of the Spalmacitty. These
be things that a man is soon expart in, but it takes
the time of his nat'ral life to larn to know the
weather. There be streaked wind-galls in the
offing, that speak as plainly, to all that see them,
and know God's language in the clouds, as ever
you spoke through a trumpet, to shorten sail;
besides
,
sir, don't you hear the sea moaning, as if it
knew the hour was at hand when it was to wake
up from its sleep!
Ay, Tom, returned his officer, walking to
the edge of the cliffs, and throwing a seaman's
glance at the gloomy ocean, 'tis a threatening
night indeed: but this pilot must be hadand
Is that the man? interrupted the cockswain,
pointing towards a man who was standing not far
from them, an attentive observer of their
proceedings
,
at the same time that he was narrowly
watched
himself by the young midshipman. God
send that he knows his trade well, for the bottom
of a ship will need eyes to find its road out of this
wild anchorage.
That must indeed be the man! exclaimed
Barnstable, at once recalled to his duty. He then
held a short dialogue with his female companion,
whom he left concealed by the hedge, and
proceeded
to address the stranger. When near
enough to be heard, the commander of the
schooner demanded
What water have you in this bay?
The stranger, who seemed to expect this
question
,
answered, without the least hesitation
Enough to take all out in safety, who have
entered with confidence.
You are the man I seek, cried Barnstable;
are you ready to go off?
Both ready and willing, returned the pilot,
and there is need of haste. I would give the
best hundred guineas that ever were coined for
two hours more use of that sun which has left us,
or for even half the time of this fading twilight.
Think you our situation so bad? said the
lieutenant. Follow this gentleman to the boat
then; I will join you by the time you can descend
the cliffs. I believe I can prevail on another hand
to go off with us.
Time is more precious now than any number
of hands, said the pilot, throwing a glance of
impatience from under his lowering brows, and
the consequences of delay must be visited on those
who occasion it.
And, sir, I will meet the consequences with
those who have a right to inquire into my
conduct
,
said Barnstable, haughtily.
With this warning and retort, they separated;
the young officer retracing his steps impatiently
towards his mistress, muttering his indignation in
suppressed execrations, and the pilot, drawing the
leathern belt of his pea-jacket mechanically
around his body, as he followed the midshipman
and cockswain to their boat, in moody silence.
Barnstable found the disguised female who had
announced herself as Katherine Plowden,
awaiting
his return, with intense anxiety depicted on
every feature of her intelligent countenance. As
he felt all the responsibility of his situation,
notwithstanding
his cool reply to the pilot, the young
man hastily drew an arm of the apparent boy,
forgetful of her disguise, through his own, and
led her forward.
Come, Katherine, he said, the time urges
to be prompt.
What pressing necessity is there for immediate
departure? she inquired, checking his
movements
by withdrawing herself from his side.
You heard the ominous prognostic of my
cockswain, on the weather, and I am forced to
add my own testimony to his opinion. 'Tis a
crazy night that threatens us, though I cannot
repent
of coming into the bay, since it has led to
this interview.
God forbid that we should either of us have
cause to repent of it, said Katherine, the
paleness
of anxiety chasing away the rich bloom that
had mantled the animated face of the brunette.
But you have the paperfollow its directions,
and come to our rescue; you will find us willing
captives, if Griffith and yourself are our
conquerors
.
What mean you, Katherine! exclaimed her
lover; you at least are now in safety'twould
be madness to tempt your fate again. My vessel
can and shall protect you, until your cousin is
redeemed; and then, remember, I have a claim on
you for life.
And how would you dispose of me in the
interval
,
said the young maiden, retreating slowly
from his advances.
In the Arielby heaven, you shall be her
commander; I will bear that rank only in name.
I thank you, thank you, Barnstable, but
distrust
my abilities to fill such a station, she said,
laughing, though the colour that again crossed
her youthful features was like the glow of a
summer's
sunset, and even her mirthful eyes seemed to
reflect their tints. Do not mistake me,
saucy-one
.
If I have done more than my sex will
warrant
,
remember it was through a holy motive,
and if I have more than a woman's enterprise, it
must be
To lift you above the weakness of your sex,
he cried, and to enable you to show your noble
confidence in me.
To fit me for, and to keep me worthy of
being
one day your wife. As she uttered these
words, she turned, and disappeared, with a
rapidity
that eluded his attempt to detain her, behind
an angle of the hedge, that was near them. For
a moment, Barnstable remained motionless
through surprise, and when he sprang forward in
pursuit, he was able only to catch a glimpse of
her light form, in the gloom of the evening, as
she again vanished in a little thicket at some
distance.
Barnstable was about to pursue, when the air
lighted with a sudden flash, and the bellowing
report of a cannon rolled along the cliffs, and
was echoed among the hills far inland.
Ay, grumble away, old dotard! the
disappointed
young sailor muttered to himself, while
he reluctantly obeyed the signal; you are in as
great a hurry to get out of your danger as you
were to run into it.
The quick reports of three muskets from the
barge beneath where he stood, urged him to
quicken his pace, and as he threw himself
carelessly
down the rugged and dangerous passes of
the cliffs, his experienced eye beheld the
wellknown
lights displayed from the frigate, which
commanded the recall of all her boats.
CHAPTER III.
In such a time as this it is not meet
That every nice offence should bear its comment.
Shakspeare.
The
cliffs threw their dark shadows wide on
the waters, and the gloom of the evening had so
far advanced, as to conceal the discontent that
brooded over the ordinarily open brow of
Barnstable
,
as he sprang from the rocks into the boat,
and took his seat by the side of the silent pilot.
Shove off, cried the lieutenant, in tones that
his men knew must be obeyed. A seaman's
curse light on the folly that exposes both planks
and lives to such navigation, and all to burn
some old timber-man, or catch a Norway trader
asleep! give way, men, give way.
Notwithstanding the heavy and dangerous
surf that was beginning to tumble in upon the
rocks, in an alarming manner, the startled seamen
succeeded in urging their light boat over the
waves, and in a few seconds were without the
point where danger was most to be apprehended.
Barnstable had seemingly disregarded the crisis
they had passed, but sat sternly eyeing the foam
that rolled by them in successive surges, until the
boat rose regularly on the long seas, when he
Vol. I. 3
turned his looks around the bay, in quest of the
barge.
Ay, Griffith has tired of rocking in his
pillowed
cradle, he muttered, and will give us a
pull to the frigate, when we ought to be
getting
the schooner out of this hard-featured
landscape
.
This is just such a place as one of your
sighing lovers would doat on: a little land, a
little
water, and a good deal of rock. Damme,
long Tom, but I am more than half of your
mind, that an island, now and then, is all the terra
firma that a seaman needs.
It's reason and philosophy, sir, returned the
sedate cockswain; and what land there is,
should always be a soft mud, or a sandy ooze, in
order that an anchor might hold, and to make
soundings sartain. I have lost many a deep-sea,
besides hand-leads by the dozens, on rocky
bottoms
;
but give me the roadsted where a lead
comes up light, and an anchor heavy. There's a
boat pulling athwart our fore-foot, Captain
Barnstable
;
shall I run her aboard, or give her a
birth, sir?
'Tis the barge! cried the officer; Ned has
not deserted me after all!
A loud hail from the approaching boat
confirmed
this opinion, and, in a few seconds, the barge
and whale-boat were again rolling by each other's
side. Griffith was no longer reclining on the
cushions of his seats, but spoke earnestly, and
with a slight tone of reproach in his manner.
Why have you wasted so many precious
moments
,
when every minute threatens us with new
dangers? I was obeying the signal, when I heard
your oars, and pulled back, to take out the pilot.
Have you been successful?
There he is, and if he finds his way out,
through the shoals, he will earn a right to his
name. This bids fair to be a night when a man
will need a spy-glass to find the moon. But when
you hear what I have seen on those rascally cliffs,
you will be more ready to excuse my delay, Mr.
Griffith.
You have seen the true man, I trust, or we
incur this hazard to an evil purpose.
Ay, I have seen him that is a true man, and
him that is not, replied Barnstable, bitterly;
you have the boy with you, Griffithask him
what his young eyes have seen.
Shall I! cried the young midshipman,
laughing; then I have seen a little clipper, in
disguise, outsail an old man-of-war's-man in a
hard chase, and I have seen a straggling rover in
long-togs as much like my cousin
Peace, gabbler! exclaimed Barnstable, in a
voice of thunder; would you detain the boats
with your silly nonsense, at a time like this.
Away into the barge, sir, and if you find him
willing to hear, tell Mr. Griffith what your
foolish
conjectures amount to, at your leisure.
The boy stepped lightly from the whale-boat
to the barge, whither the pilot had already
preceded
him, and as he sunk, with a mortified air,
by the side of Griffith, he said, in a low voice
And that won't be long, I know, if Mr.
Griffith
thinks and feels on the coast of England as
he thought and felt at home.
A silent pressure of his hand, was the only
reply
that the young lieutenant made, before he
paid the parting compliments to Barnstable, and
directed his men to pull for their ship.
The boats were separating, and the plash of
the oars was already heard, when the voice of
the pilot was for the first time raised in earnest.
Hold! he cried; hold water, I bid ye!
The men ceased their efforts, at the
commanding
tones of his voice, and turning towards the
whale-boat, he continued, in the same manner
You will get your schooner under-way
immediately
,
Captain Barnstable, and sweep into
the offing, with as little delay as possible. Keep
the ship well open from the northern headland,
and as you pass us, come within hail.
This is a clean chart and plain sailing, Mr.
Pilot, returned Barnstable; but who is to
justify
my moving without orders, to Captain
Munson
?
I have it in black and white, to run the
Ariel into this feather-bed sort of a place, and I
must at least have it by signal or word of mouth
from my betters, before my cut-water curls
another
wave. The road may be as hard to find
going out as it was coming inand then I had
daylight, as well as your written directions to
steer by.
Would you lie there to perish on such a
night! said the pilot, sternly. Two hours
hence, this heavy swell will break where your
vessel now rides so quietly.
There we think exactly alike; but if I get
drowned now, I am drowned according to orders;
whereas, if I knock a plank out of the schooner's
bottom, by following your directions, 'twill be a
hole to let in mutiny, as well as sea-water. How
do I know but the old man wants another pilot
or two?
That's philosophy, muttered the cockswain
of the whale-boat, in a voice that was audible:
but it's a hard strain on a man's conscience to
hold on in such an anchorage.
Then keep your anchor down, and follow it
to the bottom, said the pilot to himself; it's
worse to contend with a fool than a gale of wind;
but if
No, no sirno fool either, interrupted
Griffith. Barnstable does not deserve that
epithet, though he certainly carries the point of
duty to the extreme. Heave up at once, Mr.
Barnstable, and get out of this bay as fast as
possible.
Ah! you don't give the order with half the
pleasure with which I shall execute it; pull away,
boysthe Ariel shall never lay her bones in such
a hard bed, if I can help it.
As the commander of the schooner uttered
these words with his cheering voice, his men
spontaneously shouted, and the whale-boat darted
away from her companion, and was soon lost in
the gloomy shadows cast from the cliffs.
In the mean time, the oarsmen of the barge
were not idle, but by strenuous efforts they forced
the heavy boat rapidly through the water, and in
a few minutes she ran alongside of the frigate.
During this period the pilot, in a voice which had
lost all that startling fierceness and authority that
it had manifested in his short dialogue with
Barnstable
,
requested Griffith to repeat to him, slowly,
the names of the officers that belonged to his ship.
When the young lieutenant had complied with
this request, he observed to his companion
All good men and true, Mr. Pilot; and though
this business in which you are just now engaged
may be hazardous to an Englishman, there are
none with us who will betray you. We need
your services, and as we expect good faith from
you, so shall we offer it to you in exchange.
And how know you that I need its
exercise
?
asked the pilot, in a manner that denoted
a cold indifference to the subject.
Why, though you talk pretty good English,
for a native, interrupted Griffith, yet you have
a small bur-r-r in your mouth that would prick the
3*
tongue of a man who was born on the other side
of the Atlantic.
It is of but little moment where a man is
born, or how he speaks, returned the pilot,
coldly
,
so that he does his duty bravely, and in
good faith.
It was perhaps fortunate for the harmony of this
dialogue, that the gloom, which had now
increased
to positive darkness, completely concealed the
look of scornful irony that crossed the handsome
features of the young sailor, as he replied
True, true, so that he does his duty, as you
say, in good faith. But, as Barnstable said, you
must know your road well to travel among these
shoals on such a night as this. Know you what
water we draw?
'Tis a frigate's draught, and I shall
endeavour
to keep you in four fathoms; less than that
would be dangerous.
She's a sweet boat! said Griffith; and
minds her helm as a marine watches the eye of
his sergeant at a drill; but you must give her
room in stays, for she fore-reaches, as if she
would put out the wind's eye.
The pilot attended, with a practised ear, to this
description of the qualities of the ship that he
was about to attempt extricating from an
extremely
dangerous situation. Not a syllable was
lost on him; and when Griffith had ended, he
remarked
,
with the singular coldness that pervaded
his manner
That is both a good and a bad quality in a
narrow channel. I fear it will be the latter, to
night, when we shall require to have the ship in
leading strings.
I suppose we must feel our way with the
lead? said Griffith.
We shall need both eyes and leads, returned
the pilot, recurring insensibly to his
soliloquizing
tone of voice. I have been both in and
out in darker nights than this, though never with
a heavier draught than a half-two.
Then, by heaven, you are not fit to handle
that ship, among the rocks and breakers!
exclaimed
Griffith; your men of a light draught
never know their water; 'tis the deep keel only,
that finds a channelpilot! pilot! beware how
you trifle with us ignorantly; for 'tis a dangerous
experiment to play at hazards with an enemy.
Young man, you know not what you
threaten
,
nor whom, said the pilot, sternly, though
his quiet manner still remained undisturbed;
you forget that you have a superior here, and
that I have none.
That shall be as you discharge your duty,
cried Griffith; for if
Peace, interrupted the pilot, we approach
the ship; let us enter her in harmony.
He threw himself back on the cushions, when
he had said this, and Griffith, though filled with
the apprehensions of suffering, either by great
ignorance, or treachery, on the part of his
companion, smothered his feelings so far as to be
silent, and they ascended the side of the vessel in
apparent cordiality.
The frigate was already riding on lengthened
seas, that rolled in from the ocean, at each
successive
moment, with increasing violence, though
her topsails still hung supinely from her yards;
the air, which continued to breathe, occasionally,
from the land, being unable to shake the heavy
canvass of which they were composed.
The only sounds that were audible, when
Griffith
and the pilot had ascended to the gangway
of the frigate, were produced by the sullen
dashing
of the sea against the massive bows of the
ship, and the shrill whistle of the boatswain's
mate, as he recalled the side-boys, who were
placed on either side of the gangway, to do
honour
to the entrance of the first lieutenant and his
companion.
But though such a profound silence reigned
among the hundreds who inhabited the huge
fabric, the light produced by a dozen battle
lanterns
,
that were arranged in different parts of the
decks, served not only to exhibit, faintly, the
persons
of the crew, but the mingled feeling of
curiosity
and care that dwelt on most of their
countenances
.
Large groups of men were collected in the
gangways, around the mainmast, and on the
booms of the vessel, whose faces were distinctly
visible, while numerous figures, lying along the
lower yards, or bending out of the tops, might
be dimly traced in the back ground, all of whom
expressed, by their attitudes, the interest they
took in the arrival of the boat.
Though such crowds were collected in other
parts of the vessel, the quarter deck was
occupied
only by the officers, who were disposed
according
to their ranks, and were equally silent
and attentive as the remainder of the crew. In
front stood a small collection of young men, who,
by their similarity of dress, were the equals and
companions of Griffith, though his juniors in
rank; and on the opposite side of the vessel was
a larger assemblage of youths, who claimed Mr.
Merry as their fellow. Around the capstern,
three or four figures were standing, one of whom
wore a coat of blue, with the scarlet facings of a
soldier, and another the black vestments of the
ship's chaplain. Behind these, and nearer to
the passage to the cabin, from which he had just
ascended, stood the tall, erect form of the
commander
of the vessel.
After a brief salutation between Griffith and
the junior officers, the former advanced, followed
slowly by the pilot, to the place where he was
expected
by his veteran commander. The young
man removed his hat entirely, as he bowed with a
little more than his usual ceremony, and said
We have succeeded, sir, though not without
more difficulty and delay than were anticipated.
But you have not brought off the pilot, said
the captain, doubtingly; and without him, all
our risk and trouble have been in vain.
He is here, said Griffith, stepping aside, and
extending his arm towards the man that stood
behind
him, wrapped to the chin in his coarse
pea-jacket
,
and with his face shadowed by the falling
rims of a large hat, that had seen much and hard
service.
This! exclaimed the captain; then there
is a sad mistakethis is not the man I would
have seen, nor can another supply his place.
I know not whom you expected, Captain
Munson, said the stranger, in a low, quiet
voice; but if you have not forgotten the day
when a very different flag from that emblem of
tyranny that now hangs over yon tafferel was first
spread to the wind, you may remember the hand
that raised it.
Bring here the light! exclaimed the
commander
,
hastily.
When the lantern was extended towards the
pilot, and the glare fell strong on his features,
Captain Munson started, as he beheld the calm
blue eye that met his gaze, and the composed,
but pallid countenance of the other.
Involuntarily
raising his hat, and baring his silver locks,
the veteran cried
It is he! though so changed
That his enemies did not know him,
interrupted
the pilot, quickly; then touching the other
by the arm as he led him aside, he continued, in
a lower tone, neither must his friends, until the
hour and season shall arrive.
Griffith had fallen back, to reply to the eager
questions of his messmates, and no part of this
short dialogue was overheard by the officers,
though it was soon perceived that their
commander
had discovered his error, and was satisfied that
the proper man had been brought on board his
vessel. For many minutes the two continued to
pace a part of the quarter-deck, by themselves,
engaged in deep and earnest discourse.
As Griffith had but little to communicate, the
curiosity of his listeners was soon appeased, and
all eyes were directed towards that mysterious
guide, who was to conduct them from a situation
already surrounded by perils, which each moment
not only magnified in appearance, but increased
in reality.
CHAPTER IV.
behold the threaden sails,
Borne with the invisible and creeping winds,
Draw the huge bottoms through the furrowed sea,
Breasting the lofty surge.
Shakspeare,
It
has been already explained to the reader,
that there was something threatening in the
appearance
of the weather to create serious
forebodings
of evil in the breast of a seaman. When
removed from the shadows of the cliffs, the night
was not so dark but objects could be discerned
at some little distance, and in the eastern horizon
there was a streak of fearful light impending
over the gloomy waters, in which the swelling
outline formed by the rising waves, was becoming
each moment more distinct, and consequently
more alarming. Several dark clouds overhung
the vessel, whose towering masts apparently
propped the black vapour, while a few stars
were seen twinkling, with a sickly flame, in the
streak of clear sky that skirted the ocean. Still,
light currents of air, occasionally, swept across
the bay, bringing with them the fresh odour
from the shore, but their flitting irregularity too
surely foretold them to be the expiring breath of
the land breeze. The roaring of the surf, as it
rolled on the margin of the bay, produced a dull,
monotonous sound, that was only interrupted, at
times, by a hollow bellowing, as a larger wave
than usual broke violently against some cavity in
the rocks. Every thing, in short, united to
render
the scene gloomy and portentous, without
creating instant terror, for the ship rose easily on
the long billows, without even straightening the
heavy cable that held her to her anchor.
The higher officers were collected around the
capstern, engaged in earnest discourse about their
situation and prospects, while some of the oldest
and most favoured seamen would extend their
short walk to the hallowed precincts of the
quarter-deck, to catch, with greedy ears, the
opinions
that fell from their superiors. Numberless
were the uneasy glances that were thrown from
both officers and men at their commander and the
pilot, who still continued their secret communion
in a distant part of the vessel. Once, an
ungovernable
curiosity, or the heedlessness of his
years, led one of the youthful midshipmen near
them, but a stern rebuke from his captain sent the
boy, abashed and cowering, to hide his
mortification
among his fellows. This reprimand was
received by the elder officers as an intimation that
the consultation which they beheld, was to be
strictly inviolate; and, though it by no means
suppressed the repeated expressions of their
impatience
,
it effectually prevented an interruption
to the communications, which all thought were
unreasonably protracted for the occasion.
This is no time to be talking over bearings
and distances, observed the officer next in rank
to Griffith. But we should call the hands up,
and try to kedge her off while the sea will suffer
a boat to live.
'Twould be a tedious and bootless job to
attempt
to warp a ship for miles against a
head-beating
sea, returned the first lieutenant; but
the land-breeze yet flutters aloft, and if our light
sails would draw, with the aid of this ebb tide we
might be able to shove her from the shore.
Hail the tops, Griffith, said the other, and
ask if they feel the air move; 'twill be a hint at
least to set the old man and that lubberly pilot in
motion.
Griffith laughed, as he complied with the
request
,
and when he received the customary reply
to his call, he demanded, in a loud voice
Which way have you the wind, aloft?
We feel a light cat's-paw, now and then, from
the land, returned the sturdy captain of the top;
but our topsail hangs in the clewlines, sir,
without
winking.
Captain Munson and his companion suspended
their discourse, while this question and answer
were exchanged, and then resumed their dialogue
as earnestly as if it had received no interruption.
If it did wink, the hint would be lost on our
betters, said the officer of the marines, whose
ignorance of seamanship added greatly to his
perception of the danger, but who, from pure
idleness, made more jokes than any other man in
the ship. That pilot will not receive a delicate
intimation through his ears, Mr. Griffith; suppose
you try him by the nose.
Faith, there was a flash of gunpowder
between
us in the barge, returned the first
lieutenant
,
and he does not seem a man to stomach
such hints as you advise. Although he looks so
meek and quiet, I doubt whether he has paid much
attention to the book of Job.
Why should he! exclaimed the chaplain,
whose apprehensions at least equalled those of the
marine, and with a much more disheartening effect;
VOL. I. 4
I'm sure it would have been a great waste of
time; there are so many charts of the coast, and
books on the navigation of these seas, for him to
study, that I sincerely hope he has been much
better employed.
A loud laugh was created at this speech, among
the listeners, and it apparently produced the
effect
that was so long anxiously desired, by
putting
an end to the mysterious conference between
their captain and the pilot. As the former came
forward towards his expecting crew, he said, in
the composed, steady manner, that formed the
principal trait in his character
Get the anchor, Mr. Griffith, and make sail
on the ship; the hour has arrived when we must
be moving.
The cheerful ay! ay! sir! of the young
lieutenant was hardly uttered, before the cries of
half a dozen midshipmen were heard summoning
the boatswain and his mates to their duty.
There was a general movement in the living
masses that clustered around the mainmast, on
the booms, and in the gangways, though their
habits of discipline held the crew a moment longer
in suspense. The silence was first broken by
the sounds of the boatswain's whistle, followed
by the hoarse cry of all hands, up anchor,
ahoy!the former rising on the night air,
from its first low, mellow notes, to a piercing
shrillness, that again gradually died away on the
waters; and the latter, bellowing through every
cranny of the ship, like the hollow murmurs of
distant thunder.
The change produced by this customary
summons was magical. Human beings sprung
out from between the guns, rushed up the
hatches, threw themselves with careless activity
from the booms, and gathered from every
quarter
so rapidly, that, in an instant, the deck of the
frigate was alive with men. The profound
silence
,
that had hitherto been only interrupted by
the low dialogue of the officers, was now
exchanged
for the stern orders of the lieutenants,
mingled with the shriller cries of the midshipmen,
and the hoarse bawling of the boatswain's crew,
rising above the tumult of preparation and
general
bustle.
The captain and the pilot alone remained
passive
,
in this scene of general exertion; for their
apprehensions had even stimulated that class of
officers which is called idlers, to attempt
something, though frequently reminded by their
more experienced messmates, that they retarded,
instead of forwarded, the duty of the vessel.
The bustle, however, gradually ceased, and in a
few minutes the same silence pervaded the ship as
before.
We are brought-to, sir, said Griffith, who
stood overlooking the scene, holding in one hand
a short speaking trumpet, and grasping, with the
other, one of the shrouds of the ship, to steady
himself in the position he had taken on a gun.
Heave round, sir, was the calm reply.
Heave round! repeated Griffith, aloud.
Heave round! echoed a dozen eager voices
at once, and the lively strains of a fife struck up
a brisk air, to enliven the gloomy scene. The
capstern was instantly set in motion, and the
measured tread of the seamen was heard, as they
stamped the deck in the circle of their march.
For a few minutes, no other sounds were heard,
if we except the voice of an officer, occasionally,
cheering the sailors, when it was announced that
they were short, or, in other words, that the
ship was nearly over her anchor.
Heave and pall, cried Griffith; when the
quavering notes of the whistle were again
succeeded
by a general stillness in the vessel.
What is to be done now, sir? continued the
lieutenant; shall we trip the anchor? There
seems not a breath of air, and as the tide runs
slack, I doubt whether the sea do not heave the
ship ashore.
There was so much obvious truth in this
conjecture
,
that all eyes turned from the light and
animation afforded by the decks of the frigate, to
look abroad on the waters, in a vain desire to
pierce the darkness, as if to read the fate of their
apparently devoted ship, from the aspect of
nature
.
I leave all to the pilot, said the captain,
after he had stood a short time by the side of
Griffith, anxiously studying the heavens and the
ocean. What say you, Mr. Gray?
The man who was, thus, first addressed by
name, was leaning over the bulwarks, with his
eyes bent in the same direction as the others;
but as he answered, he turned his face towards
the speaker, and the light from the deck fell full
upon his quiet features, which exhibited a
calmness
bordering on the supernatural, considering
his station and responsibility.
There is much to fear from this heavy
ground-swell
,
he said, in the same unmoved tones as
before; but there is certain destruction to us,
if the gale that is brewing in the east, finds us
waiting its fury in this wild anchorage. All the
hemp that was ever spun into cordage would not
hold a ship an hour, chafing on these rocks, with
a north-easter pouring its fury on her. If the
powers of man can compass it, gentlemen, we
must get an offing, and that speedily.
You say no more, sir, than the youngest boy
in the ship can see for himself, said Griffith
ha! here comes the schooner!
The dashing of the long sweeps in the water,
was now plainly audible, and the little Ariel was
seen through the gloom, moving heavily under
their inadequate impulse. As she passed slowly
under the stern of the frigate, the cheerful voice
of Barnstable was first heard, opening the
communications
between them.
Here's a night for spectacles, Captain
Munson
!
he cried; but I thought I heard your
fife, sir; I trust in God, you do not mean to ride
it out here till morning?
I like the birth as little as yourself, Mr.
Barnstable, returned the veteran seaman, in his
calm manner, in which anxiety was however
beginning
to grow evident. We are short, but
are afraid to let go our hold of the bottom, lest
the sea cast us ashore. How make you out
the wind?
Wind! echoed the other; there is not
enough to blow a lady's curl aside. If you wait,
sir, till the land breeze fill your sails, you will
wait another moon, I believe. I've got my
egg-shell
out of that nest of gray-caps, but how it
has been done in the dark, a better man than
myself must explain.
Take your directions from the pilot, Mr.
Barnstable, returned his commanding officer,
and follow them strictly and to the letter.
A death-like silence, in both vessels, succeeded
this order, for all seemed to listen eagerly to
catch the words that fell from the man, on whom,
all now felt, depended their only hopes for safety.
A short time was suffered to elapse, before his
voice was heard, in the same low, but distinct
tones as before
Your sweeps will soon be of no service to
4*
you, he said, against the sea that begins to
heave in; but your light sails will help them to
get you out. So long as you can head
east-and-by-north
,
you are doing well, and you can stand
on till you open the light from that northern
headland, when you can heave to, and fire a
gun; but if, as I dread, you are struck aback,
before you open the light, you may trust to your
lead on the larboard tack, but beware, with your
head to the southward, for no lead will serve you
there.
I can walk over the same ground on one
tack as on the other, said Barnstable, and
make both legs of a length.
It will not do, returned the pilot. If you
fall off a point to starboard from
east-and-by-north
,
in going large, you will find both rocks
and points of shoals to bring you up; and
beware
,
as I tell you, of the starboard tack.
And how shall I find my way; you will let
me trust to neither time, lead, nor log.
You must trust to a quick eye and a ready
hand. The breakers only will show you the
dangers, when you are not able to make out the
bearings of the land. Tack in season, sir, and
don't spare the lead, when you head to port.
Ay, ay, returned Barnstable, in a low,
muttering
voice. This is a sort of blind
navigation
with a vengeance, and all for no purpose that
I can seesee! damme, eyesight is of about as
much use now, as a man's nose would be in
reading
the bible.
Softly, softly, Mr. Barnstable, interrupted
his commander, for such was the anxious stillness
in both vessels, that even the rattling of the
schooner's rigging was heard, as she rolled in the
trough of the seathe duty on which Congress
has sent us must be performed at the hazard of
our lives.
I don't mind my life, Captain Munson, said
Barnstable; but there is a great want of
conscience
in trusting a vessel in such a place as this.
However, it is a time to do, and not to talk. But
if there be such danger to an easy draught of
water, what will become of the frigate? had I
not better play jackall, and try and feel the way
for you.
I thank you, said the pilot; the offer is
generous, but would avail us nothing. I have
the advantage of knowing the ground well, and
must trust to my memory and God's good favour.
Make sail, make sail, sir, and if you succeed, we
will venture to break ground.
The order was promptly obeyed, and in a very
short time, the Ariel was covered with canvass.
Though no air was perceptible on the decks of
the frigate, the little schooner was so light, that
she succeeded in stemming her way over the
rising
waves, aided a little by the tide, and in a few
minutes, her low hull was just discernible in the
streak of light along the horizon; the dark
outline
of her sails rising above the sea, until their
fanciful summits were lost in the shadows of the
clouds.
Griffith had listened to the foregoing dialogue,
like the rest of the junior officers, in profound
silence
;
but when the Ariel began to grow
indistinct
to the eye, he jumped lightly from the gun
to the deck, and cried
She slips off, like a vessel from the stocks!
shall I trip the anchor, sir, and follow?
We have no choice, replied his captain.
You hear the question, Mr. Gray? shall we let
go the bottom?
It must be done, Captain Munson; we may
want more than the rest of this tide to get us to a
place of safety, said the pilot; I would give
five years from a life, that I know will be short,
if the ship lay one mile further seaward.
This remark was unheard by all, excepting the
commander of the frigate, who again walked
aside with the pilot, where they resumed their
mysterious communications. The words of
assent
were no sooner uttered, however, than
Griffith
gave forth from his trumpet the command to
heave away! Again the strains of the fife
were followed by the tread of the men at the
capstern. At the same time that the anchor was
heaving up, the sails were loosened from the
yards, and opened to invite the breeze. In
effecting
this duty, orders were thundered through the
trumpet of the first lieutenant, and executed with
the rapidity of thought. Men were to be seen,
like spots in the dim light from the heavens, lying
on every yard, or hanging as in air, while strange
cries were heard issuing from every part of the
rigging, and each spar of the vessel. Ready
the fore-royal, cried a shrill voice, as if from the
clouds; ready the fore yard, uttered the hoarse
tones of a seaman beneath him; all ready aft,
sir, cried a third, from another quarter; and in
a few moments, the order was given to let fall.
The little light which fell from the sky, was
now excluded by the falling canvass, and a deeper
gloom was cast athwart the decks of the ship,
that served to render the brilliancy of the
lanterns
even vivid, while it gave to objects
outboard
a more appalling and dreary appearance
than before.
Every individual, excepting the commander
and his associate, was now earnestly engaged in
getting the ship under way. The sounds of
we're away, were repeated by a burst from
fifty voices, and the rapid evolutions of the
capstern
announced that nothing but the weight of
the anchor was to be lifted. The howling of
cordage, the rattling of blocks, blended with the
shrill calls of the boatswain and his mates,
succeeded
;
and though to a landsman all would have
appeared confusion and hurry, long practice and
strict discipline enabled the crew to exhibit their
ship under a cloud of canvass, from the deck to
the trucks, in less time than we have consumed in
relating it.
For a few minutes, the officers were not
disappointed
by the result, for though the heavy sails
flapped lazily against the masts, the light duck
on the loftier spars swelled outwardly, and the
ship began sensibly to yield to their influence.
She travels! she travels! exclaimed
Griffith
,
joyously; ah! the hussy! she has as much
antipathy to the land as any fish that swims! it
blows a little gale aloft, yet!
We feel its dying breath, said the pilot, in
low, soothing tones, but in a manner so sudden as
to startle Griffith, at whose elbow they were
unexpectedly
uttered. Let us forget, young man,
every thing but the number of lives that depend,
this night, on your exertions and my knowledge.
If you be but half as able to exhibit the one,
as I am willing to make the other, we shall do
well, returned the lieutenant, in the same tone.
Remember, whatever may be your feelings, that
we
are on an enemy's coast, and love it not
enough to wish to lay our bones there.
With this brief explanation, they separated,
the vessel requiring the constant and close
attention
of the officer to her movements.
The exultation produced in the crew by the
progress of their ship through the water, was of
short duration; for the breeze that had seemed to
await their motions, after forcing the vessel for a
quarter of a mile, fluttered for a few minutes
amid their light canvass, and then left them
entirely
.
The quarter-master, whose duty it was
to superintend the helm, soon announced that he
was losing the command of the vessel, as she was
no longer obedient to her rudder. This
ungrateful
intelligence was promptly communicated to
his commander, by Griffith, who suggested the
propriety of again dropping an anchor.
I refer you to Mr. Gray, returned the
captain
;
he is the pilot, sir, and with him rests the
safety of the vessel.
Pilots sometimes lose ships, as well as save
them, said Griffith; know you the man well,
Captain Munson, who holds all our lives in his
keeping, and so coolly as if he cared but little for
the venture?
Mr. Griffith, I do know him; he is, in my
opinion, both competent and faithful. Thus
much I tell you, to relieve your anxiety; more
you must not ask;but is there not a shift of
wind?
God forbid! exclaimed his lieutenant; if
that north-easter catches us within the shoals,
our case will be desperate indeed!
The heavy rolling of the vessel caused an
occasional
expansion, and as sudden a re-action, in
their sails, which left the oldest seamen in the
ship in doubt which way the currents of air were
passing, or whether there existed any that were
not created by the flapping of their own canvass.
The head of the ship, however, began to fall off
from the sea, and notwithstanding the darkness,
it soon became apparent that she was driving in,
bodily, towards the shore.
During these few minutes of gloomy doubt,
Griffith, by one of those sudden revulsions of the
mind, that connect the opposite extremes of
feeling
,
lost his animated anxiety, and relapsed into
the listless apathy that so often came over him,
even in the most critical moments of trial and
danger. He was standing, with one elbow
resting
on the capstern, shading his eyes from the
light of the battle-lantern that stood near him,
with one hand, when he felt a gentle pressure of
the other, that recalled his recollection.
Looking
affectionately, though still recklessly, at the
boy who stood at his side, he said
Dull music, Mr. Merry.
So dull, sir, that I can't dance to it,
returned
the midshipman. Nor do I believe there is
a man in the ship who would not rather hear
`The girl I left behind me,' than those execrable
sounds.
What sounds, boy! The ship is as quiet as
the quaker meeting in the Jerseys, before your
good old grandfather used to break the charm of
silence with his sonorous voice.
Ah! laugh at my peaceable blood, if thou
wilt, Mr. Griffith, said the arch youngster; but
remember, there is a mixture of it in all sorts of
veins. I wish I could hear one of the old
gentleman's
chants now, sir; I could always sleep to
them, like a gull in a surf. But he that sleeps to
night, with that lullaby, will make a nap of it.
Sounds! I hear no sounds, boy, but the
flapping aloft; even that pilot, who struts the
quarter-deck like an admiral, has nothing to
say.
Is not that a sound to open a seaman's ear?
It is in truth a heavy roll of the surf, lad, but
the night air carries it heavily to our ears. Know
you not the sounds of the surf yet, younker?
I know it too well, Mr. Griffith, and do not
wish to know it better. How fast are we
tumbling
in towards that surf, sir?
I think we hold our own, said Griffith,
rousing
again; though we had better anchor.
Luff, fellow, luff, you are broadside to the sea!
The man at the wheel repeated his former
intelligence
,
adding a suggestion that he thought
the ship was gathering stern-way.
Haul up your courses, Mr. Griffith, said
Captain Munson, and let us feel the wind.
The rattling of the blocks was soon heard, and
the enormous sheets of canvass that hung from
the lower yards were instantly suspended in the
brails. When this change was effected, all on
board stood silent and breathless, as if expecting
to learn their fate by the result. Several
contradictory
opinions were, at length, hazarded among
the officers, when Griffith seized a candle from
the lantern, and springing on one of the guns,
held it on high, exposed to the action of the air.
The little flame waved, with uncertain
glimmering
,
for a moment, and then burned steadily, in a
line with the masts. Griffith was about to lower
his extended arm, when, feeling a slight sensation
of coolness on his hand, he paused, and the light
turned slowly towards the land, flared, flickered,
and finally deserted the wick.
Lose not a moment, Mr. Griffith, cried the
pilot, aloud; clew up and furl every thing but
your three topsails, and let them be double-reefed.
Now is the time to fulfil your promise.
The young man paused one moment, in
astonishment
,
as the clear, distinct tones of the
stranger
struck his ears so unexpectedly; but turning
his eyes to seaward, he sprang on the deck, and
proceeded to obey the order, as if life and death
depended on his despatch.
CHAPTER V.
She rights, she rights, boys! wear off shore!
Song
.
The
extraordinary activity of Griffith, which
communicated itself with promptitude to the crew,
was produced by a sudden alteration in the
weather
.
In place of the well-defined streak along
the horizon, that has been already described, an
immense body of misty light appeared to be
moving
in, with rapidity, from the ocean, while a
distinct but distant roaring announced the sure
approach of the tempest, that had so long
troubled
the waters. Even Griffith, while thundering
his orders through the trumpet, and urging the
men, by his cries, to expedition, would pause, for
instants, to cast anxious glances in the direction
of the coming storm, and the faces of the sailors
who lay on the yards were turned, instinctively,
towards the same quarter of the heavens, while
they knotted the reef-points, or passed the gaskets,
that were to confine the unruly canvass to the
prescribed limits.
The pilot alone, in that confused and busy
throng, where voice rose above voice, and cry
VOL. I. 5
echoed cry, in quick succession, appeared as if
he held no interest in the important stake. With
his eyes steadily fixed on the approaching mist,
and his arms folded together, in composure, he
stood calmly awaiting the result.
The ship had fallen off, with her broadside to
the sea, and was become unmanageable, and the
sails were already brought into the folds
necessary
to her security, when the quick and heavy
fluttering of canvass was thrown across the water,
with all the gloomy and chilling sensations that
such sounds produce, where darkness and danger
unite to appal the seaman.
The schooner has it! cried Griffith;
Barnstable
has held on, like himself, to the last
moment
God
send that the squall leave him cloth
enough to keep him from the shore!
His sails are easily handled, the commander
observed, and she must be over the principal
danger. We are falling off before it, Mr. Gray;
shall we try a cast of the lead?
The pilot turned from his contemplative
posture
,
and moved slowly across the deck, before
he returned any reply to this questionlike a
man who not only felt that every thing depended
on himself, but that he was equal to the
emergency
.
'Tis unnecessary, he at length said; 'twould
be certain destruction to be taken aback, and it is
difficult to say, within several points, how the
wind may strike us.
'Tis difficult no longer, cried Griffith; for
here it comes, and in right earnest!
The rushing sounds of the wind were now,
indeed
,
heard at hand, and the words were hardly
past the lips of the young lieutenant, before the
vessel bowed down heavily to one side, and then,
as she began to move through the water, rose
again majestically to her upright position, as if
saluting, like a courteous champion, the powerful
antagonist with which she was about to contend.
Not another minute elapsed, before the ship was
throwing the waters aside, with a lively progress,
and, obedient to her helm, was brought as near to
the desired course, as the direction of the wind
would allow. The hurry and bustle on the yards
gradually subsided, and the men slowly descended
to the deck, all straining their eyes to pierce the
gloom in which they were enveloped, and some
shaking their heads, in melancholy doubt, afraid
to express the apprehensions they really
entertained
.
All on board anxiously waited for the
fury of the gale; for there were none so ignorant
or inexperienced in that gallant frigate, as not to
know, that they, as yet, only felt the infant efforts
of the wind. Each moment, however, it
increased
in power, though so gradual was the
alteration
,
that the relieved mariners began to believe
that all their gloomy forebodings were not to be
realized. During this short interval of
uncertainty
,
no other sounds were heard than the
whistling
of the breeze, as it passed quickly through
the mass of rigging that belonged to the vessel,
and the dashing of the spray, that began to fly
from her bows, like the foam of a cataract.
It blows fresh, cried Griffith, who was the
first to speak in that moment of doubt and
anxiety
;
but it is no more than a cap-full of wind,
after all. Give us elbow-room, and the right
canvass, Mr. Pilot, and I'll handle the ship like
a gentleman's yacht, in this breeze.
Will she stay, think ye, under this sail? said
the low voice of the stranger.
She will do all that man, in reason, can ask
of wood and iron, returned the lieutenant; but
the vessel don't float the ocean that will tack
under double-reefed topsails alone, against a
heavy
sea. Help her with the courses, pilot, and
you'll see her come round like a dancing-master.
Let us feel the strength of the gale first,
returned
the man who was called Mr. Gray, moving
from the side of Griffith to the weather gangway
of the vessel, where he stood in silence, looking
ahead of the ship, with an air of singular
coolness
and abstraction.
All the lanterns had been extinguished on the
deck of the frigate, when her anchor was secured,
and as the first mist of the gale had passed over,
it was succeeded by a faint light that was a good
deal aided by the glittering foam of the waters,
which now broke in white curls around the vessel,
in every direction. The land could be faintly
discerned, rising like a heavy bank of black fog,
above the margin of the waters, and was only
distinguishable from the heavens, by its deeper
gloom and obscurity. The last rope was coiled,
and deposited in its proper place, by the seamen,
and for several minutes the stillness of death
pervaded the crowded decks. It was evident
to every one, that their ship was dashing at a
prodigious rate through the waves; and as she
was approaching, with such velocity, the quarter
of the bay where the shoals and dangers were
known to be situated, nothing but the habits of
the most exact discipline could suppress the
uneasiness
of the officers and men within their own
bosoms. At length the voice of Captain
Munson
was heard, calling to the pilot.
Shall I send a hand into the chains, Mr.
Gray, he said, and try our water?
Although this question was asked aloud, and
the interest it excited drew many of the officers
and men around him, in eager impatience for his
answer, it was unheeded by the man to whom it
was addressed. His head rested on his hand, as
he leaned over the hammock-cloths of the
vessel
,
and his whole air was that of one whose
thoughts wandered from the pressing necessity of
their situation. Griffith was among those who
had approached the pilot, and after waiting a
moment, from respect, to hear the answer to his
commander's question, he presumed on his own
rank, and leaving the circle that stood at a little
distance, stepped to the side of the mysterious
guardian of their lives.
Captain Munson desires to know whether you
wish a cast of the lead? said the young officer,
with a little impatience of manner. No
immediate
answer was made to this repetition of the
question, and Griffith laid his hand,
unceremoniously
,
on the shoulder of the other, with an
intent to rouse him, before he made another
application
for a reply, but the convulsive start of
the pilot held him silent in amazement.
Fall back there, said the lieutenant, sternly,
to the men who were closing around them in a
compact circle; away with you to your
stations
,
and see all clear for stays. The dense
mass of heads dissolved, at this order, like the
water of one of the waves commingling with the
ocean, and the lieutenant and his companion
were left by themselves.
This is not a time for musing, Mr. Gray,
continued Griffith; remember our compact,
and look to your chargeis it not time to put
the vessel in stays? of what are you dreaming?
The pilot laid his hand on the extended arm of
the lieutenant, and grasped it with a convulsive
pressure, as he answered
'Tis a dream of reality. You are young,
Mr. Griffith, nor am I past the noon of life; but
should you live fifty years longer, you never can
5*
see and experience what I have encountered in
my little period of three-and-thirty years!
A good deal astonished at this burst of feeling,
so singular at such a moment, the young sailor
was at a loss for a reply; but as his duty was
uppermost in his thoughts, he still dwelt on the
theme that most interested him.
I hope much of your experience has been on
this coast, for the ship travels lively, he said,
and the daylight showed us so much to dread,
that we do not feel over-valiant in the dark.
How much longer shall we stand on, upon this
tack?
The pilot turned slowly from the side of the
vessel, and walked towards the commander of the
frigate, as he replied, in a tone that seemed deeply
agitated by his melancholy reflections
You have your wish, then; much, very much
of my early life was passed on this dreaded coast.
What to you is all darkness and gloom, to me is
as light as if a noon day sun shone upon it. But
tack your ship, sir, tack your ship; I would see
how she works, before we reach the point, where
she
must
behave well, or we perish.
Griffith gazed after him in wonder, while the
pilot slowly paced the quarter-deck, and then,
rousing from his trance, gave forth the cheering
order that called each man to his station, to
perform
the desired evolution. The confident
assurances
which the young officer had given to the
pilot, respecting the qualities of his vessel, and
his own ability to manage her, were fully realized
by the result. The helm was no sooner put a-lee,
than the huge ship bore up gallantly against the
wind, and dashing directly through the waves,
threw the foam high into the air, as she looked
boldly into the very eye of the wind, and then,
yielding gracefully to its power, she fell off on
the other tack, with her head pointed from those
dangerous shoals that she had so recently
approached
with such terrifying velocity. The
heavy yards swung round, as if they had been
vanes to indicate the currents of the air, and in a
few moments the frigate again moved, with
stately progress, through the water, leaving the
rocks and shoals behind her on one side of the
bay, but advancing towards those that offered
equal danger on the other.
During this time, the sea was becoming more
agitated, and the violence of the wind was
gradually
increasing. The latter no longer
whistled
amid the cordage of the vessel, but it seemed
to howl, surlily, as it passed the complicated
machinery
that the frigate obtruded on its path.
An endless succession of white surges rose above
the heavy billows, and the very air was glittering
with the light that was disengaged from the
ocean. The ship yielded, each moment, more
and more before the storm, and in less than half
an hour from the time that she had lifted her
anchor, she was driven along, with
tremendous
fury, by the full power of a gale of wind.
Still, the hardy and experienced mariners who
directed her movements, held her to the course
that was necessary to their preservation, and still
Griffith gave forth, when directed by their
unknown
pilot, those orders that turned her in the
narrow channel where safety was, alone, to be
found.
So far, the performance of his duty appeared
easy to the stranger, and he gave the required
directions in those still, calm tones, that formed
so remarkable a contrast to the responsibility of
his situation. But when the land was becoming
dim, in distance as well as darkness, and the
agitated
sea was only to be discovered as it swept
by them in foam, he broke in upon the
monotonous
roaring of the tempest, with the sounds of
his voice, seeming to shake off his apathy, and
rouse himself to the occasion.
Now is the time to watch her closely, Mr.
Griffith, he cried; here we get the true tide
and the real danger. Place the best
quarter-master
of your ship in those chains, and let an
officer stand by him, and see that he gives us the
right water.
I will take that office on myself, said the
captain; pass a light into the weather
main-chains
.
Stand by your braces! exclaimed the pilot,
with startling quickness. Heave away that
lead!
These preparations taught the crew to expect
the crisis, and every officer and man stood in
fearful silence, at his assigned station, awaiting
the issue of the trial. Even the quarter-master
at the cun gave out his orders to the men at the
wheel, in deeper and hoarser tones than usual,
as if anxious not to disturb the quiet and order
of the vessel.
While this deep expectation pervaded the
frigate
,
the piercing cry of the leadsman, as he
called, by the mark seven, rose above the
tempest
,
crossed over the decks, and appeared to
pass away to leeward, borne on the blast, like
the warnings of some water spirit.
'Tis well, returned the pilot, calmly; try
it again.
The short pause was succeeded by another
cry, and a half-five!
She shoals! she shoals! exclaimed Griffith;
keep her a good full.
Ay! you must hold the vessel in command,
now, said the pilot, with those cool tones that
are most appalling in critical moments, because
they seem to denote most preparation and care.
The third call of by the deep four! was
followed
by a prompt direction from the stranger to
tack.
Griffith seemed to emulate the coolness of the
pilot, in issuing the necessary orders to execute
this manuvre.
The vessel rose slowly from the inclined
position
into which she had been forced by the
tempest
,
and the sails were shaking violently, as if to
release themselves from their confinement, while
the ship stemmed the billows, when the
wellknown
voice of the sailing-master was heard
shouting from the forecastle
Breakers! breakers, dead ahead!
This appalling sound seemed yet to be
lingering
about the ship, when a second voice cried
Breakers on our lee-bow!
We are in a bight of the shoals, Mr. Gray,
said the commander. She loses her way;
perhaps
an anchor might hold her.
Clear away that best-bower, shouted
Griffith
through his trumpet.
Hold on! cried the pilot, in a voice that
reached the very hearts of all who heard him;
hold on every thing.
The young man turned fiercely to the daring
stranger, who thus defied the discipline of his
vessel
,
and at once demanded
Who is it that dares to countermand my
orders
?is
it not enough that you run the ship
into danger, but you must interfere to keep her
there! If another word
Peace, Mr. Griffith, interrupted the captain,
bending from the rigging, his gray locks blowing
about in the wind, and adding a look of wildness
to the haggard care that he exhibited by the light
of his lantern; yield the trumpet to Mr. Gray;
he alone can save us.
Griffith threw his speaking trumpet on the
deck, and as he walked proudly away, muttered,
in bitterness of feeling
Then all is lost, indeed, and among the rest,
the foolish hopes with which I visited this coast.
There was, however, no time for reply; the
ship had been rapidly running into the wind, and
as the efforts of the crew were paralyzed by the
contradictory orders they had heard, she
gradually
lost her way, and in a few seconds, all her
sails were taken aback.
Before the crew understood their situation, the
pilot had applied the trumpet to his mouth, and
in a voice that rose above the tempest, he
thundered
forth his orders. Each command was
given distinctly, and with a precision that showed
him to be master of his profession. The helm
was kept fast, the head yards swung up heavily
against the wind, and the vessel was soon
whirling
round on her heel, with a retrograde
movement
.
Griffith was too much of a seaman, not to
perceive
that the pilot had seized, with a perception
almost intuitive, the only method that promised
to extricate the vessel from her situation. He
was young, impetuous, and proudbut he was
also generous. Forgetting his resentment and
his mortification, he rushed forward among the
men, and, by his presence and example, added
certainty to the experiment. The ship fell off
slowly before the gale, and bowed her yards
nearly to the water, as she felt the blast pouring
its fury on her broadside, while the surly waves
beat violently against her stern, as if in reproach
at departing from her usual manner of moving.
The voice of the pilot, however, was still heard,
steady and calm, and yet so clear and high as to
reach every ear; and the obedient seamen whirled
the yards at his bidding, in despite of the tempest,
as if they handled the toys of their childhood.
When the ship had fallen off dead before the
wind, her head sails were shaken, her after yards
trimmed, and her helm shifted, before she had
time to run upon the danger that had threatened,
as well to leeward as to windward. The
beautiful
fabric, obedient to her government, threw her
bows up gracefully towards the wind again, and
as her sails were trimmed, moved out from
amongst the dangerous shoals, in which she had
been embayed, as steadily and swiftly as she had
approached them.
A moment of breathless astonishment
succeeded
the accomplishment of this nice manuvre,
but there was no time for the usual expressions of
surprise. The stranger still held the trumpet,
and continued to lift his voice amid the howlings
of the blast, whenever prudence or skill directed
any change in the management of the ship. For
an hour longer, there was a fearful struggle for
their preservation, the channel becoming, at each
step, more complicated, and the shoals thickening
around the mariners, on every side. The lead
was cast rapidly, and the quick eye of the pilot
seemed to pierce the darkness, with a keenness of
vision that exceeded human power. It was
apparent
to all in the vessel, that they were under
the guidance of one who understood the
navigation
thoroughly, and their exertions kept
pace with their reviving confidence. Again and
again, the frigate appeared to be rushing blindly
on shoals, where the sea was covered with foam,
and where destruction would have been as sudden
as it was certain, when the clear voice of the
stranger was heard warning them of the danger,
and inciting them to their duty. The vessel was
implicitly yielded to his government, and during
those anxious moments when she was dashing
the waters aside, throwing the spray over her
enormous yards, each ear would listen eagerly
for those sounds that had obtained a command
over the crew, that can only be acquired, under
such circumstances, by great steadiness and
consummate
skill. The ship was recovering from
the inaction of changing her course, in one of
those critical tacks that she had made so often,
when the pilot, for the first time, addressed the
commander of the frigate, who still continued to
superintend
the all-important duty of the leadsman.
Now is the pinch, he said, and if the ship
behaves well, we are safebut if otherwise, all
we have yet done will be useless.
The veteran seaman whom he addressed left
the chains, at this portentous notice, and calling
to his first lieutenant, required of the stranger an
explanation of his warning.
See you yon light on the southern headland?
returned the pilot; you may know it from the
star near itby its sinking, at times, in the ocean.
Now observe the hom-moc, a little north of it,
looking like a shadow in the horizon'tis a hill
far inland. If we keep that light open from the
hill, we shall do wellbut if not, we surely go to
pieces.
Let us tack again! exclaimed the
lieutenant
.
The pilot shook his head, as he replied
There is no more tacking or box-hauling to
be done to night. We have barely room to pass
out of the shoals on this course, and if we can
weather the `Devil's-Grip,' we clear their
outermost
pointbut if not, as I said before, there is
but an alternative.
If we had beaten out the way we entered!
exclaimed Griffith, we should have done well.
Say, also, if the tide would have let us do
so, returned the pilot, calmly. Gentlemen,
we must be prompt; we have but a mile to go,
and the ship appears to fly. That topsail is not
enough to keep her up to the wind; we want
both jib and mainsail.
'Tis a perilous thing, to loosen canvass in
such a tempest! observed the doubtful captain.
It must be done, returned the collected
stranger; we perish, without itsee! the light
already touches the edge of the hom-moc; the
sea casts us to leeward!
It shall be done! cried Griffith, seizing the
trumpet from the hand of the pilot.
The orders of the lieutenant were executed
almost
as soon as issued, and every thing being
ready, the enormous folds of the mainsail were
trusted, loose, to the blast. There was an instant
when the result was doubtful; the tremendous
threshing of the heavy sails, seeming to bid
defiance
to all restraint, shaking the ship to her
centre; but art and strength prevailed, and
gradually
the canvass was distended, and bellying as
it filled, was drawn down to its usual place, by the
power of a hundred men. The vessel yielded to
this immense addition of force, and bowed before
it, like a reed bending to a breeze. But the
success
of the measure was announced by a joyful
cry from the stranger, that seemed to burst from
his inmost soul.
She feels it! she springs her luff! observe,
he said, the light opens from the hom-moc
already
;
if she will only bear her canvass, we shall
go clear!
A report, like that of a cannon, interrupted his
exclamation, and something resembling a white
VOL. I. 6
cloud was seen drifting before the wind from the
head of the ship, till it was driven into the gloom
far to leeward.
'Tis the jib, blown from the bolt-ropes, said
the commander of the frigate. This is no time
to spread light duckbut the mainsail may stand
it yet.
The sail would laugh at a tornado, returned
the lieutenant; but that mast springs like a
piece of steel.
Silence all! cried the pilot. Now,
gentlemen
,
we shall soon know our fate. Let her
luffluff you can!
This warning effectually closed all discourse,
and the hardy mariners, knowing that they had
already done all in the power of man, to ensure
their safety, stood in breathless anxiety, awaiting
the result. At a short distance ahead of them,
the whole ocean was white with foam, and the
waves, instead of rolling on, in regular
succession
,
appeared to be tossing about in mad
gambols
.
A single streak of dark billows, not half a
cable's length in width, could be discerned
running
into this chaos of water; but it was soon
lost to the eye, amid the confusion of the
disturbed
element. Along this narrow path the
vessel moved more heavily than before, being
brought so near the wind as to keep her sails
touching. The pilot, silently, proceeded to the
wheel, and, with his own hands, he undertook the
steerage of the ship. No noise proceeded from
the frigate to interrupt the horrid tumult of the
ocean, and she entered the channel among the
breakers, with the silence of a desperate
calmness
.
Twenty times, as the foam rolled away to
leeward, the crew were on the eve of uttering
their joy, as they supposed the vessel past the
danger; but breaker after breaker would still
rise before them, following each other into the
general mass, to check their exultation.
Occasionally
,
the fluttering of the sails would be
heard; and when the looks of the startled seamen
were turned to the wheel, they beheld the
stranger
grasping its spokes, with his quick eye
glancing
from the water to the canvass. At length
the ship reached a point, where she appeared to
be rushing directly into the jaws of destruction,
when, suddenly, her course was changed, and her
head receded rapidly from the wind. At the
same instant, the voice of the pilot was heard,
shouting
Square away the yards!in mainsail!
A general burst from the crew echoed, square
away the yards! and, quick as thought, the
frigate
was seen gliding along the channel, before
the wind. The eye had hardly time to dwell on
the foam, which seemed like clouds driving in the
heavens, and directly the gallant vessel issued
from her perils, and rose and fell on the heavy
waves of the open sea.
The seamen were yet drawing long breaths,
and gazing about them like men recovered from
a trance, when Griffith approached the man who
had so successfully conducted them through their
perils. The young lieutenant grasped the hand
of the other, as he said
You have this night proved yourself a
faithful
pilot, and such a seaman as the world cannot
equal.
The pressure of the hand was warmly returned
by the unknown mariner, who replied
I am no stranger to the seas, and I may yet
find my grave in them. But you, too, have
deceived
me; you have acted nobly, young man,
and Congress
What of Congress? asked Griffith,
observing
him to pause.
Why, Congress is fortunate, if it has many
such ships as this, said the stranger, coldly, and
walking towards the commander.
Griffith gazed after him, a moment, in surprise;
but as his duty required his attention, other
thoughts soon engaged his mind.
The vessel was pronounced to be in safety.
The gale was heavy and increasing, but there
was a clear sea before them, and, as she slowly
stretched out into the bosom of the ocean,
preparations
were made for her security during its
continuance
.
Before midnight, every thing was in
order. A gun from the Ariel had announced the
safety of the schooner also, which had gone out
by another and an easier channel, that the frigate
had not dared to attempt; and the commander
directed
the usual watch to be set, and the
remainder
of the crew to seek their necessary repose.
The captain withdrew with the mysterious
pilot to his own cabin. Griffith gave his last
order, and renewing his charge to the officer
intrusted
with the care of the vessel, he wished him
a pleasant watch, and sought the refreshment of
his own cot. For an hour, the young lieutenant
lay musing on the events of the day. The
remark
of Barnstable would occur to him, in
connexion
with the singular comment of the boy;
and then his thoughts would recur to the pilot,
who, taken from the hostile shores of Britain, and
with her accent on his tongue, had served them
so faithfully and so well. He remembered the
anxiety of Captain Munson to procure this
stranger
,
at the very hazard from which they had just
been relieved, and puzzled himself with
conjecturing
why a pilot was to be sought at such a
risk. His more private feelings would then
resume
their sway, and the recollection of
America
,
his mistress, and his home, mingled with the
confused images of the drowsy youth. The
dashing of the billows against the side of the
ship, the creaking of guns and bulk-heads, with
the roaring of the tempest, however, became
gradually
less and less distinct, until nature yielded
to necessity, and the young man forgot even the
romantic images of his love, in the deep sleep of
a seaman.
6*
CHAPTER VI.
The letter! ay! the letter!
'Tis there a woman loves to speak her wishes;
It spares the blushes of the love-sick maiden,
And every word's a smile, each line a tongue.
Duo
.
The
slumbers of Griffith continued till late on
the following morning, when he was awakened
by the report of a cannon, issuing from the deck
above him. He threw himself, listlessly, from
his cot, and perceiving the officer of marines
near him, as his servant opened the door of his
state-room, he inquired, with some little interest
in his manner, if the ship was in chase of any
thing, that a gun was fired?
The soldier replied
'Tis no more than a hint to the Ariel, that
there is bunting abroad for them to read. It
seems as if all hands were asleep on board her,
for we have shown her signal, these ten minutes,
and she takes us for a collier, I believe, by the
respect she pays it.
Say, rather, that she takes us for an enemy,
and is wary, returned Griffith. Brown Dick
has played the English so many tricks himself,
that he is tender of his faith.
Why, they have shown him a yellow flag
over a blue one, with a cornet, and that spells
Ariel, in every signal-book we have; surely he
can't suspect the English of knowing how to read
Yankee.
I have known Yankees read more difficult
English, said Griffith, smiling; but, in truth,
I suppose that Barnstable has been, like myself,
keeping a dead reckoning of his time, and his
men have profited by the occasion. She is lying
too, I trust.
Ay! like a cork in a mill-pond, and I dare say
you are right. Give Barnstable plenty of
sea-room
,
a heavy wind, and but little sail, and he
will send his men below, put that fellow he calls
long Tom at the tiller, and follow himself, and
sleep as quietly as I ever could at church.
Ah! yours is a somniferous orthodoxy.
Captain Manual, said the young sailor,
laughing
,
while he slipped his arms into the sleeves of
a morning round-about, covered with the gilded
trappings of his profession; sleep appears to
come most naturally to all you idlers. But give
me a passage, and I will go up, and call the
schooner down to us, in the turning of an
hour-glass
.
The indolent soldier raised himself from the
leaning posture he had taken against the door of
the state-room, and Griffith proceeded through
the dark ward-room, up the narrow stairs, that
led him to the principal battery of the ship, and
thence, by another and broader flight of steps, to
the open deck.
The gale still blew strong, but steadily; the
blue water of the ocean was rising in mimic
mountains, that were crowned with white foam,
which the wind, at times, lifted from its kindred
element, to propel, in mist, through the air, from
summit to summit. But the ship rode on these
agitated
billows, with an easy and regular movement,
that denoted the skill with which her mechanical
powers were directed. The day was bright and
clear, and the lazy sun, who seemed unwilling to
meet the toil of ascending to the meridian, was
crossing the heavens with a southern inclination,
that hardly allowed him to temper the moist air
of the ocean with his genial heat. At the
distance
of a mile, directly in the wind's eye, the
Ariel was seen, obeying the signal, which had
caused the dialogue we have related. Her low,
black hull was barely discernible, at moments,
when she rose to the crest of a larger wave than
common; but the spot of canvass that she
exposed
to the wind, was to be seen, seeming to touch
the water on either hand, as the little vessel rolled
amid the seas. At times, she was entirely hid
from view, when the faint lines of her raking
masts would be again discovered, issuing, as it
were, from the ocean, and continuing to ascend,
until the hull itself would appear, thrusting its
bows into the air, surrounded by foam, and
apparently
ready to take its flight into another
element
.
After dwelling a moment on the beautiful sight
we have attempted to describe, Griffith cast his
eyes upward, to examine, with the keenness of a
seaman, the disposition of things aloft, and then
turned his attention to those who were on the
deck of the frigate.
His commander stood, in his composed
manner
,
patiently awaiting the execution of his order
by the Ariel, and at his side was placed the
stranger
,
who had acted so recently such a conspicuous
part in the management of the ship. Griffith
availed himself of daylight and his situation, to
examine the appearance of this singular being more
closely than the darkness and confusion of the
preceding
night had allowed. He was rather below
the middle size in stature, but his form was
muscular
and athletic, exhibiting the finest
proportions
of manly beauty. His face appeared rather
characterized by melancholy and thought, than
by that determined decision which he had so
powerfully displayed in the moments of their
most extreme danger; but Griffith well knew, that
it could also exhibit looks of the fiercest
impatience
.
At present, it appeared, to the curious
youth, when compared to the glimpses he had
caught by the lights of their lanterns, like the
ocean at rest, contrasted with the waters around
him. The eyes of the pilot rested on the deck,
or when they did wander, it was with uneasy and
rapid glances. The large pea-jacket, that
concealed
most of his other attire, was as roughly
made, and of materials as coarse, as that worn
by the meanest seaman in the vessel; and yet, it
did not escape the inquisitive gaze of the young
lieutenant, that it was worn with an air of
neatness
and care, that was altogether unusual in men
of his profession. The examination of Griffith
ended here, for the near approach of the Ariel
attracted the attention of all on the deck of the
frigate, to the conversation that was about to pass
between their respective commanders.
As the little schooner rolled along under their
stern, Captain Munson directed his subordinate
to leave his vessel, and repair on board the ship.
As soon as the order was received, the Ariel
rounded-to, and drawing ahead into the smooth
water occasioned by the huge fabric that
protected
her from the gale, the whale-boat was
again launched from her decks, and manned by
the same crew that had landed on those shores
which were now faintly discerned far to leeward,
looking like blue clouds on the skirts of the ocean.
When Barnstable had entered his boat, a few
strokes of the oars sent it, dancing over the
waves, to the side of the ship. The little vessel
was then veered off, to a distance, where it rode in
safety, under the care of a boat-keeper, and the
officer and his men ascended the side of the lofty
frigate.
The usual ceremonials of reception were
rigidly observed by Griffith and his juniors, when
Barnstable touched the deck; and though every
hand was ready to be extended towards the
reckless
seaman, none presumed to exceed the
salutations
of official decorum, until a short and
private
dialogue had taken place between him and
their captain.
In the mean time, the crew of the whale-boat
passed forward, and mingled with the seamen of
the frigate, with the exception of the cockswain,
who established himself in one of the gangways,
where he stood in the utmost composure, fixing
his eyes aloft, and shaking his head, in evident
dissatisfaction, as he studied the complicated
mass of rigging above him. This spectacle soon
attracted to his side some half-dozen youths, with
Mr. Merry at their head, who endeavoured to
entertain
their guest in a manner that should most
conduce to the indulgence of their own waggish
propensities.
The conversation between Barnstable and his
superior soon ended; when the former,
beckoning
to Griffith, passed the wondering group who
had collected around the capstern, awaiting his
leisure to greet him more cordially, and led the
way to the ward-room, with the freedom of one
who felt himself no stranger. As this unsocial
manner formed no part of the natural temper or
ordinary deportment of the man, the remainder
of the officers suffered their first lieutenant to
follow
him alone, believing that duty required that
their interview should be private. Barnstable was
determined that it should be so, at all events; for
he seized the lamp from the mess-table, and
entered
the state-room of his friend, closing the door
behind them, and turning the key. When they
were both within its narrow limitspointing to
the only chair the little apartment contained, with
a sort of instinctive deference to his companion's
rankthe commander of the schooner threw
himself
carelessly on a sea-chest, and, placing the
lamp on the table, he opened the discourse as
follows:
What a night we had of it! twenty times I
thought I could see the sea breaking over you,
and I had given you over as drowned men, or,
what is worse, as men driven ashore, to be led to
the prison-ships of these islanders, when I saw
your lights in answer to my gun. Had you
hoisted the conscience out of a murderer, you
wouldn't have relieved him more than you did
me, by showing that bit of tallow and cotton,
tip'd with flint and steel.But, Griffith, I have a
tale to tell of a different kind
Of how you slept, when you found yourself
in deep water, and how your crew strove to outdo
their commander, and how all succeeded so well,
that there was a gray-head on board here, that
began to shake with displeasure, interrupted
Griffith; truly, Dick, you will get into lubberly
habits on board that bubble in which you float
about, where all hands go to sleep as regularly
as the inhabitants of a poultry yard go to roost.
Not so bad, not half so bad, Ned, returned
the other, laughing; I keep as sharp a
discipline
as if we wore a flag. To be sure, forty
men can't make as much parade as three or four
hundred; but as for making or taking in sail,
I am your better, any day.
Ay, because a pocket handkerchief is sooner
opened and shut than a table-cloth. But I hold
it to be unseamanlike, to leave any vessel
without
human eyes, and those open, to watch whether
she goes east or west, north or south.
And who is guilty of such a dead-man's
watch?
Why, they say on board here, that when it
blows hard, you seat the man you call long Tom
by the side of the tiller, tell him to keep her
head-to-sea
,
and then pipe all hands to their
night-caps
,
where you all remain, comfortably stowed
in your hammocks, until you are awakened by the
snoring of your helmsman.
'Tis a damned scandalous insinuation, cried
Barnstable, with an indignation that he in vain
attempted to conceal. Who gives currency to
such a libel, Mr. Griffith?
I had it of the marine, said his friend,
losing
the archness that had instigated him to worry
his companion, in the vacant air of one who was
careless of every thing; but I don't believe
half of it myselfI have no doubt you all had
your eyes open, last night, whatever you might
have been about this morning.
Ah! this morning! there was an oversight,
indeed! But I was studying a new signal-book,
Griffith, that has a thousand times more interest
for me, than all the bunting you can show, from
the head to the heel of your masts.
What! have you found out the Englishman's
private talk?
No, no, said the other, stretching forth his
hand, and grasping the arm of his friend. I
met, last night, one, on those cliffs, who has
proved
herself what I always believed her to be and
loved her for, a girl of quick thought and bold
spirit.
Of whom do you speak?
Of Katherine
Griffith started from his chair involuntarily,
at the sound of this name, and the blood passed
quickly through the shades of his countenance,
leaving it now pale as death, and then burning as
if oppressed by a torrent from his heart.
Struggling
to overcome an emotion, which he
appeared
ashamed to betray even to the friend he most
loved, the young man soon recovered himself
so far as to resume his seat, when he asked,
gloomily
Was she alone?
She was; but she left with me this paper,
and this invaluable book, which is worth a library
of all other works.
The eye of Griffith rested vacantly on the
treasure that the other valued so highly, but his
hand seized, eagerly, the open letter which was
laid on the table for his perusal. The reader
will at once understand, that it was in the
handwriting
of a female, and that it was the
communication
Barnstable had received from his
betrothed
,
on the cliffs. Its contents were as
follows
:
Believing that Providence may conduct me
where we shall meet, or whence I may be able to
transmit to you this account, I have prepared a
short statement of the situation of Cecilia
Howard
and myself; not, however, to urge you and
Griffith to any rash or foolish hazards, but that
you may both sit down, and, after due
consultation
,
determine on what is proper for our relief.
By this time, you must understand the
character
of Colonel Howard too well to expect he
will ever consent to give his niece to a rebel. He
Vol. I. 7
has already sacrificed to his loyalty, as he calls
it, (but I whisper to Cecilia, 'tis his treason,) not
only his native country, but no small part of his
fortune also. In the frankness of my disposition,
(you know my frankness, Barnstable, but too
well!) I confessed to him, after the defeat of the
mad attempt Griffith made to carry off Cecilia,
in Carolina, that I had been foolish enough to
enter into some weak promise to the brother
officer
who had accompanied the young sailor in his
traitorous visits to the plantation. Heigho! I
sometimes think it would have been better for us
all, if your ship had never been chased into the
river, or after she was there, if Griffith had made
no attempt to renew his acquaintance with my
cousin. The colonel received the intelligence as
such a guardian would hear that his ward was
about to throw away thirty thousand dollars and
herself on a traitor to his king and country. I
defended you stoutly; said that you had no
king, as the tie was dissolved; that America was
your country, and that your profession was
honourable
;
but it would not all do. He called
you rebel; that I was used to. He said you
were a traitor; that, in his vocabulary, amounts
to the same thing. He even hinted that you were
a coward; and that I knew to be false, and did
not hesitate to tell him so. He used fifty
opprobrious
terms that I cannot remember, but
among others were the beautiful epithets of `
disorganizer
,'
`leveller,' `democrat,' and `jacobin.'
(I hope he did not mean a monk!) In short, he
acted Colonel Howard in a rage. But as his
dominion does not, like that of his favourite kings,
continue from generation to generation, and one
short year will release me from his power, and
leave me mistress of my own actions, that is, if
your fine promises are to be believed, I bore it
all very well, being resolved to suffer any thing
but martyrdom, rather than abandon Cecilia.
She, dear girl, has much more to distress her than
I can have; she is not only the ward of Colonel
Howard, but his niece, and his sole heir. I am
persuaded this latter circumstance makes no
difference
in either her conduct or her feelings, but
he appears to think it gives him a right to
tyrannize
over her on all occasions. After all,
Colonel
Howard is a gentleman when you do not
put him in a passion, and, I believe, a thoroughly
honest man, and Cecilia even loves him. But a
man who is driven from his country, in his
sixtieth
year, with the loss of near half his fortune,
is not apt to canonize those who compel the
change.
It seems that when the Howards lived on
this island, a hundred years ago, they dwelt in
the county of Northumberland. Hither, then,
he brought us, when political events, and his
dread of becoming the uncle to a rebel, induced
him to abandon America, as he says, for ever.
We have been here now three months, and for
two thirds of that time we lived in tolerable
comfort
;
but latterly, the papers have announced the
arrival of the ship and your schooner in France,
and from that moment as strict a watch has been
kept over us, as if we had meditated a renewal of
the Carolina flight. The colonel, on his arrival
here, hired an old building, that is part house,
part abbey, part castle, and all prison, because
it is said to have once belonged to an ancestor of
his. In this delightful dwelling there are many
cages, that will secure more uneasy birds than
we are. About a fortnight ago an alarm was
given in a neighbouring village, which is situated
on the shore, that two American vessels,
answering
your description, had been seen hovering
along the coast; and, as the people in this
quarter
dream of nothing but that terrible fellow,
Paul Jones, it was said that he was on board one
of them. But I believe that Colonel Howard
suspects who you really are. He was very
minute
in his inquiries, I hear; and since then, has
established a sort of garrison in the house, under
the pretence of defending it against marauders,
like those who are said to have laid my Lady
Selkirk under contribution.
Now, understand me, Barnstable; on no
account
would I have you risk yourself on shore;
neither must there be blood spilt, if you love me;
but that you may know what sort of a place we
are confined in, and by whom surrounded, I will
describe both our prison and the garrison. The
whole building is of stone, and not to be
attempted
with slight means. It has windings and
turnings
,
both internally and externally, that would
require more skill than I possess to make
intelligible
;
but the rooms we inhabit are in the upper
or third floor of a wing, that you may call a
tower, if you are in a romantic mood, but which,
in truth, is nothing but a wing. Would to God I
could fly with it! If any accident should bring
you in sight of the dwelling, you will know our
rooms, by the three smoky vanes that whiffle
about its pointed roof, and, also, by the windows
in that story being occasionally open. Opposite
to our windows, at the distance of half a mile, is
a retired, unfrequented ruin, concealed, in a great
measure, from observation by a wood, and
affording
none of the best accommodations, it is
true, but shelter in some of its vaults or
apartments
.
I have prepared, according to the
explanations
you once gave me on this subject, a
set of small signals, of differently coloured silks,
and a little dictionary of all the phrases that I
could imagine as useful, to refer to, properly
numbered to correspond with the key and the
flags, all of which I shall send you with this
letter
.
You must prepare your own flags, and of
course I retain mine, as well as a copy of the
key and book. If opportunity should ever offer,
we can have, at least, a pleasant discourse
together
;
you from the top of the old tower in the
ruins, and I from the east window of my
dressing-room
!
But now for the garrison. In
addition
to the commandant, Colonel Howard, who
retains all the fierceness of his former military
profession, there is, as his second in authority,
that bane of Cecilia's happiness, Kit Dillon, with
his long Savannah face, scornful eyes of black, and
skin of the same colour. This gentleman, you
know, is a distant relative of the Howards, and
wishes to be more nearly allied. He is poor, it
is true, but then, as the colonel daily remarks,
he is a good and loyal subject, and no rebel.
When I asked why he was not in arms in these
stirring times, contending for the prince he loves
so much, the colonel answers, that it is not his
profession, that he has been educated for the
law, and was destined to fill one of the highest
judicial stations in the colonies, and that he
hoped he should yet live to see him sentence
certain
nameless gentlemen to condign punishment.
This was consoling, to be sure, but I bore it.
However, he left Carolina with us, and here he
is, and here he is likely to continue, unless you
can catch him, and anticipate his judgment on
himself. This gentleman the colonel has long
desired to see the husband of Cecilia, and since
the news of your being on the coast, the siege
has nearly amounted to a storm. The
consequences
are, that my cousin at first kept her
room, and then the colonel kept her there, and
7*
even now she is precluded from leaving the wing
we inhabit. In addition to these two principal
gaolers, we have four men servants, two black
and two white; and an officer and twenty
soldiers
from the neighbouring town are billeted
on us, by particular desire, until the coast is
declared
free from pirates! yes, that is the musical
name they give youand when their own people
land, and plunder, and rob, and murder the men
and insult the women, they are called heroes!
It's a fine thing to be able to make dictionaries,
and invent namesand it must be your fault, if
mine has been framed for no purpose. I declare,
when I recollect all the insulting and cruel things
I hear in this country, of my own and her
people
,
it makes me lose my temper, and forget my
sex; but do not let my ill humour urge you to
any thing rash; remember your life, remember
their prisons, remember your reputation, but do
not, do not forget your
Katherine Plowden.
P. S. I had almost forgotten to tell you, that
in the signal-book you will find a more particular
description of our prison, where it stands, and a
drawing of the grounds, &c.
When Griffith concluded this epistle, he
returned
it to the man to whom it was addressed, and
fell back in his chair, in an attitude that denoted
deep reflection.
I knew she was here, or I should have
accepted
the command offered to me by our
commissioners
in Paris, at length he uttered; and
I thought that some lucky chance might throw
her in my way; but this is bringing us close,
indeed
!
This intelligence must be acted on, and
that promptly. Poor girl, what does she not
suffer, in such a situation!
What a beautiful hand she writes! exclaimed
Barnstable; 'tis as clear, and as pretty, and as
small, as her own delicate fingers. Griff. what a
log-book she would keep!
Cecilia Howard touch the coarse leaves of a
log-book! cried the other, in amazement; but
perceiving Barnstable to be poring over the
contents
of his mistress's letter, he smiled at their
mutual folly, and continued silent. After a short
time spent in cool reflection, Griffith required of
his friend the nature and circumstances of his
interview with Katherine Plowden. Barnstable
related it, briefly, as it occurred, in the manner
already known to the reader.
Then, said Griffith, Merry is the only one,
besides ourselves, who knows of this meeting,
and he will be too chary of the reputation of his
kinswoman to mention it.
Her reputation needs no shield, Mr. Griffith,
cried her lover; 'tis as spotless as the canvass
above your head, and
Peace, dear Richard; I entreat your pardon;
my words may have conveyed more than I
intended
;
but it is important that our measures
should be secret, as well as prudently concerted.
We must get them both off, returned
Barnstable
,
forgetting his displeasure the moment it
was exhibited, and that too before the old man
takes it into his wise head to leave the coast.
Did you ever get a sight of his instructions, or
does he keep silent?
As the grave. This is the first time we have
left port, that he has not conversed freely with me
on the nature of the cruise; but not a syllable
has been exchanged between us on the subject,
since we sailed from Brest.
Ah! that is your Jersey bashfulness, said
Barnstable; wait till I come alongside him,
with my eastern curiosity, and I pledge myself
to get it out of him in an hour.
'Twill be diamond cut diamond, I doubt,
said Griffith, laughing; you will find him as
acute at evasion, as you can possibly be at a
cross-examination.
At any rate, he gives me a chance to-day;
you know, I suppose, that he sent for me to
attend
a consultation of his officers, on important
matters.
I did not, returned Griffith, fixing his eyes
intently on the speaker; what has he to offer?
Nay, that you must ask your pilot; for while
talking to me, the old man would turn and look at
the stranger, every minute, as if watching for
signals how to steer.
There is a mystery about that man, and our
connexion with him, that I cannot fathom, said
Griffith. But I hear the voice of Manual,
calling for me; we are wanted in the cabin.
Remember
,
you do not leave the ship without seeing
me again.
No, no, my dear fellow, from the public, we
must retire to a private consultation.
The young men arose, and Griffith, throwing
off the round-about in which he had appeared on
deck, drew on a coat of more formal appearance,
and taking a sword carelessly in his hand, they
proceeded together, along the passage already
described, to the gun-deck, where they entered,
with the proper ceremonials, into the principal
cabin of the frigate.
CHAPTER VII.
Sempronius, speak.
Cato
.
The
arrangements for the consultation were
brief and simple. The veteran commander of
the frigate received his officers with punctilious
respect, and pointing to the chairs that were
placed around the table, which was a fixture in the
centre of his cabin, he silently seated himself, and
his example was followed by all, without further
ceremony. In taking their stations, however, a
quiet, but rigid observance was paid to the rights
of seniority and rank. On the right of the
captain
was placed Griffith, as next in authority;
and opposite to him, was seated the
commander
of the schooner. The officer of marines,
who was included in the number, held the next
situation in point of precedence, the same order
being observed to the bottom of the table, which
was occupied by a hard-featured, square-built,
athletic man, who held the office of sailing-master.
When order was restored, after the short
interruption
of taking their places, the officer who had
required the advice of his inferiors, opened the
business on which he demanded their opinions.
My instructions direct me, gentlemen, he
said, after making the coast of England, to run
the land down
The hand of Griffith was elevated respectfully
for silence, and the veteran paused, with a look
that inquired the reason of his interruption.
We are not alone, said the lieutenant,
glancing
his eye towards the part of the cabin where
the pilot stood, leaning on one of the guns, in an
attitude of easy indulgence.
The stranger moved not at this direct hint;
neither did his eye change from its close survey of
a chart that lay near him on the deck. The
captain
dropped his voice to tones of cautious
respect
,
as he replied
'Tis only Mr. Gray. His services will be
necessary on the occasion, and, therefore, nothing
need be concealed from him.
Glances of surprise were exchanged among the
young men, but Griffith bowing his silent
acquiescence
in the decision of his superior, the latter
proceeded
I was ordered to watch for certain signals
from the headlands that we made, and was
furnished
with the best of charts, and such directions
as enabled us to stand into the bay we entered
last night. We have now obtained a pilot, and
one who has proved himself a skilful man; such
a one, gentlemen, as no officer need hesitate to
rely on, in any emergency, either on account of
his integrity or his knowledge.
The veteran paused, and turned his looks on
the countenances of the listeners, as if to collect
their sentiments on this important point.
Receiving
no other reply than the one
conveyed
by the silent inclinations of the heads of his
hearers, the commander resumed his explanations,
referring to an open paper in his hand
It is known to you all, gentlemen, that the
unfortunate question of retaliation has been much
agitated between the two governments, our own
and that of the enemy. For this reason, and
certain political purposes, it has become an
object
of solicitude with our commissioners in Paris,
to obtain a few individuals of character from the
enemy, who may be held as a check on their
proceedings
,
at the same time it brings the evils of
war, from our own shores, home to those who have
caused it. An opportunity now offers to put this
plan in execution, and I have collected you, in
order to consult on the means.
A profound silence succeeded this unexpected
communication of the object of their cruise.
After a short pause, their captain added,
addressing
himself to the sailing-master
What course would you advise me to pursue,
Mr. Boltrope?
The weather-beaten seaman who was thus
called on to break through the difficulties of a
knotty point, with his opinion, laid one of his
short, bony hands on the table, and began to
twirl an inkstand with great industry, while with
the other he conveyed a pen to his mouth, which
was apparently masticated with all the relish that
he could possibly have felt had it been a leaf from
the famous Virginian weed. But perceiving that
he was expected to answer, after looking first to
his right hand, and then to his left, he spoke as
follows, in a hoarse, thick voice, in which the fogs
of the ocean seemed to have united with
sea-damps
and colds, to destroy every thing like
melody
If this matter is ordered, it is to be done, I
suppose, he said; for the old rule runs, `obey
orders, if you break owners;' though the
maxim, which says, `one hand for the owner, and
t'other for yourself,' is quite as good, and has
saved many a hearty fellow from a fall that
would have balanced the purser's books. Not
that I mean a purser's books are not as good as
any other man's books, but that when a man is
dead, his account must be closed, or there will be
a false muster. Well, if the thing is to be done,
the next question is, how is it to be done? There
is many a man that knows there is too much
canvass
on a ship, who can't tell how to shorten sail.
Well, then, if the thing is really to be done, we must
either land a gang to seize them, or we must show
false lights, and sham colours, to lead them off to
the ship. As for landing, Captain Munson, I can
only speak for one man, and that is myself, which
is to say, that if you run the ship with her
jibboom
into the king of England's parlour
windows
,
why, I'm consenting, nor do I care how
much of his crockery is cracked in so doing;
but as to putting the print of my foot on one of
his sandy beaches, if I do, that is always
speaking
for only one man, and saving your presence,
may I hope to be dd.
The young men smiled as the tough old
seaman
uttered his sentiments so frankly, rising with
his subject, to that which with him was the
climax of all discussion; but his commander,
who was but a more improved scholar from the
same rough school, appeared to understand his
arguments entirely, and without altering a muscle
of his rigid countenance, he required the opinion
of the junior lieutenant.
The young man spoke firmly, but modestly,
though the amount of what he said was not much
more distinct than that uttered by the master, and
was very much to the same purpose, with the
exception
,
that he appeared to entertain no personal
reluctance to trusting himself on dry ground.
The opinions of the others grew gradually
more explicit and clear, as they ascended in the
scale of rank, until it came to the turn of the
captain of marines to speak. There was a
trifling
exhibition of professional pride about the
soldier, in delivering his sentiments on a subject
that embraced a good deal more of his peculiar
sort of duty than ordinarily occurred in the usual
operations of the frigate.
It appears to me, sir, that the success of this
expedition depends altogether upon the manner
in which it is conducted. After this lucid
opening, the soldier hesitated a moment, as if to
collect his ideas for a charge that should look
down all opposition, and proceeded. The
landing, of course, will be effected on a fair
beach, under cover of the frigate's guns, and
could it be possibly done, the schooner should
be anchored in such a manner as to throw
in a flanking fire on the point of
debarkation
.
The arrangements for the order of march
must a good deal depend on the distance to
go over; though I should think, sir, an
advanced
party of seamen, to act as pioneers for
the column of marines, should be pushed a short
distance in front, while the baggage and
baggageguard
might rest upon the frigate, until the enemy
was driven into the interior, when it could
advance
without danger. There should be
flankguards
,
under the orders of two of the oldest
midshipmen
;
and a light corps might be formed of
the top-men, to co-operate with the marines. Of
course, sir, Mr. Griffith will lead, in person, the
musket-men and boarders, armed with their long
pikes, whom I presume he will hold in reserve, as
I trust my military claims and experience entitle
me to the command of the main body.
Well done, field marshal! cried Barnstable,
with a glee that seldom regarded time or place;
you should never let salt-water mould your
buttons
,
but in Washington's camp, ay! and in
VOL. I. 8
Washington's tent, you should swing your
hammock
in future. Why, sir, do you think we are
about to invade England?
I know that every military movement should
be executed with precision, Captain Barnstable,
returned the marine. I am too much
accustomed
to hear the sneers of the sea-officers, to
regard what I know proceeds from ignorance.
If Captain Munson is disposed to employ me and
my command in this expedition, I trust he will
discover that marines are good for something
more than to mount guard or pay salutes.
Then, turning haughtily from his antagonist, he
continued to address himself to their common
superior
,
as if disdaining further intercourse with
one who, from the nature of the case, must be
unable to comprehend the force of what he said.
It will be prudent, Captain Munson, to send
out a party to reconnoitre, before we march; and
as it may be necessary to defend ourselves, in case
of a repulse, I would beg leave to recommend
that a corps be provided with entrenching tools,
to accompany the expedition. They would be
extremely useful, sir, in assisting to throw up
field-works; though, I doubt not, tools might be
found in abundance in this country, and labourers
impressed for the service, on an emergency.
This was too much for the risibility of
Barnstable
,
who broke forth in a burst of scornful
laughter, which no one saw proper to interrupt;
though Griffith, on turning his head, to conceal
the smile that was gathering on his own face,
perceived the fierce glance which the pilot threw
at the merry seaman, and wondered at its
significance
and impatience. When Captain Munson
thought that the mirth of the lieutenant was
concluded
,
he mildly desired his reasons for amusing
himself so exceedingly with the plans of the
marine.
'Tis a chart for a campaign! cried
Barnstable
,
and should be sent off express to Congress,
before the Frenchmen are brought into the field!
Have you any better plan to propose, Mr.
Barnstable? inquired the patient commander.
Better! ay, one that will take no time, and
cause no trouble, to execute it, cried the other;
'tis a seaman's job, sir, and must be done with
a seaman's means.
Pardon me, Captain Barnstable, interrupted
the marine, whose jocular vein was entirely
absorbed
in his military pride; if there be
service
to be done on shore, I claim it as my right
to be employed.
Claim what you will, soldier, but how will
you carry on the war, with a parcel of fellows
who don't know one end of a boat from the
other, returned the reckless sailor. Do you
think, that a barge or a cutter is to be beached
in the same manner you ground firelock, by word
of command? No, no, Captain ManualI
honour
your courage, for I have seen it tried, but
de if
You forget we wait for your project, Mr.
Barnstable, said the veteran.
I crave your patience, sir; but no project is
necessary. Point out the bearings and distance
of the place where the men you want are to be
found, and I will take the heel of the gale, and
run into the land, always speaking for good
water and no rocks. Mr. Pilot, you will
accompany
me, for you carry as true a map of
the bottom of these seas, in your head, as ever
was made of dry ground. I will look out for
good anchorage, or, if the wind should blow off
shore, let the schooner stand off and on, till we
should be ready to take the broad sea again. I
would land, out of my whale-boat, with long Tom
and a boat's crew, and finding out the place you
will describe, we shall go up, and take the men
you want, and bring them aboard. It's all
plain-sailing
;
though, as it is a well-peopled country,
it may be necessary to do our shore work in the
dark.
Mr. Griffith, we only wait for your
sentiments
,
proceeded the captain, when, by
comparing
opinions, we may decide on the most
prudent course.
The first lieutenant had been much absorbed
in thought, during the discussion of the subject,
and might have been, on that account, better
prepared
to give his opinion with effect. Pointing
to the man who yet stood behind him, leaning on
a gun, he commenced by asking
Is it your intention that man shall
accompany
the party?
It is.
And from him you expect the necessary
information
,
sir, to guide our movements?
You are altogether right.
If, sir, he has but a moiety of the skill on the
land that he possesses on the water, I will answer
for his success, returned the lieutenant, bowing
slightly to the stranger, who recived the
compliment
by a cold inclination of his head. I must
desire the indulgence of both Mr. Barnstable and
Captain Manual, he continued, and claim the
command as of right belonging to my rank.
It belongs naturally to the schooner,
exclaimed
the impatient Barnstable.
There may be enough for us all to do, said
Griffith, elevating a finger to the other, in a
manner
,
and with an impressive look, that was
instantly
comprehended. I neither agree wholly
with the one nor the other of these gentlemen.
'Tis said, that since our appearance on the coast,
the dwellings of many of the gentry are guarded
by small detachments of soldiers from the
neighbouring
towns.
Who says it? asked the pilot, advancing
among them, with a suddenness that caused a
general silence.
I say it, sir, returned the lieutenant, when
the momentary surprise had passed away.
Can you vouch for it?
I can.
Name a house, or an individual, that is thus
protected.
Griffith gazed at the man who thus forgot
himself
in the midst of a consultation like the
present
,
and yielding to his native pride, hesitated to
reply. But mindful of the declarations of his
captain, and the recent services of the pilot, he
at length said, with a little embarrassment of
manner
I know it to be the fact, in the dwelling of a
Colonel Howard, who resides but a few leagues
to the north of us.
The stranger started at the name, and then
raising his eye keenly to the face of the young
man, appeared to study his thoughts in his
varying
countenance. But the action, and the pause
that followed, were of short continuance. His
lip slightly curled, whether in scorn or with a
concealed smile, would have been difficult to say,
so closely did it resemble both, and as he
dropped quietly back to his place at the gun, he
said
'Tis more than probable you are right, sir;
and if I might presume to advise Captain
Munson
,
it would be to lay great weight on your
opinion.
8*
Griffith turned, to see if he could comprehend
more meaning in the manner of the stranger than
his words expressed, but his face was again
shaded
by his hand, and his eyes were once more
fixed on the chart with the same vacant
abstraction
as before.
I have said, sir, that I agree wholly neither
with Mr. Barnstable nor Captain Manual,
continued
the lieutenant, after a short pause. The
command of this party is mine, as the senior
officer
,
and I must beg leave to claim it. I certainly
do not think the preparation that Captain Manual
advises necessary; neither would I undertake
the duty with as little caution as Mr. Barnstable
proposes. If there are soldiers to be
encountered
,
we should have soldiers to oppose to them;
but as it must be sudden boat-work, and regular
evolutions must give place to a seaman's bustle,
a sea-officer should command. Is my request
granted, Captain Munson?
The veteran replied, without hesitation
It is, sir; it was my intention to offer you
the service, and I rejoice to see you accept it so
cheerfully.
Griffith with difficulty concealed the
satisfaction
with which he listened to his commander, and
a radiant smile illumined his pale features, when
he observed
With me, then, sir, let the responsibility rest.
I request that Captain Manual, with twenty men,
may be put under my orders, if that
gentleman
does not dislike the duty. The marine
bowed, and cast a glance of triumph at
Barnstable
.
I will take my own cutter, with her
tried crew, go on board the schooner, and when
the wind lulls, we will run in to the land, and
then be governed by circumstances.
The commander of the schooner threw back
the triumphant look of the marine, and exclaimed,
in his joyous manner
'Tis a good plan, and done like a seaman,
Mr. Griffith. Ay, ay, let the schooner be
employed
,
and if it be necessary, you shall see her
anchored in one of their duck-ponds, with her
broadside to bear on the parlour-windows of the
best house in the island! But twenty marines!
they will cause a jam in my little craft.
Not a man less than twenty would be
prudent
,
returned Griffith. More service may
offer than that we seek.
Barnstable well understood his allusion, but
still he replied
Make it seamen, and I will give you room
for thirty. But these soldiers never know how to
stow away their arms and legs, unless at a drill.
One will take the room of two sailors; they
swing their hammocks athwart-ships, heads to
leeward, and then turn-out wrong end uppermost
at the call. Why, damn it, sir, the chalk and
rotten-stone of twenty soldiers will chock my
hatches!
Give me the launch, Captain Munson!
exclaimed
the indignant marine, and we will
follow
Mr. Griffith in an open boat, rather than put
Captain Barnstable to so much inconvenience.
No, no, Manual, cried the other, extending
his muscular arm across the table, with an open
palm, to the soldier; you would all become so
many Jonahs in uniform, and I doubt whether
the fish could digest your cartridge-boxes and
bayonet-belts. You shall go with me, and learn,
with your own eyes, whether we keep the
cat's-watch
aboard the Ariel, that you joke about.
The laugh was general, at the expense of the
soldier, if we except the pilot and the commander
of the frigate. The former was a silent, and
apparently
an abstracted, but in reality a deeply
interested listener to the discourse; and there
were moments when he bent his looks on the
speakers, as if he sought more in their
characters
than was exhibited by the gay trifling of the
moment. Captain Munson seldom allowed a
muscle of his wrinkled features to disturb their
repose; and if he had not the real dignity to
repress
the untimely mirth of his officers, he had
too much good nature to wish to disturb their
harmless enjoyments. He expressed himself
satisfied
with the proposed arrangements, and
beckoned to his steward, to place before them the
usual beverage, with which all their consultations
concluded.
The sailing-master appeared to think that the
same order was to be observed in their potations
as in council, and helping himself to an
allowance
which retained its hue even in its diluted
state, he first raised it to the light, and then
observed
This ship's-water is nearly the colour of rum
of itself; if it only had its flavour, what a set of
hearty dogs we should be. Mr. Griffith, I find
you are willing to haul your land-tacks aboard.
Well, it's natural for youth to love the earth; but
there is one man, and he is sailing-master of this
ship, who saw land enough, last night, to last
him a twelve-month. But if you will go, here's
a good land-fall and a better offing to you.
Captain Munson, my respects to you. I say, sir,
if we should keep the ship more to the south'ard,
it's my opinion, and that's but one man's, we
should fall in with some of the enemy's
homewardbound
West-Indiamen, and find wherewithal to
keep the life in us when we see fit to go ashore
ourselves.
As the tough old sailor made frequent
applications
of the glass to his mouth, with one hand,
and kept a firm hold of the decanter with the
other, during this speech, his companions were
compelled to listen to his eloquence, or depart
with their thirst unassuaged. Barnstable,
however
,
quite coolly dispossessed the tar of the
bottle
,
and mixing for himself a more equal
potation
,
observed, in the act
That is the most remarkable glass of grog
you have, Boltrope, that I ever sailed with; it
draws as little water as the Ariel, and is as hard
to find the bottom. If your spirit-room enjoys
the same sort of engine to replenish it, when you
pump out your rum, Congress will sail this
frigate
cheaply.
The other officers helped themselves with still
greater moderation, Griffith barely moistening
his lips, and the pilot rejecting the offered glass
altogether. Captain Munson continued standing,
and his officers, perceiving that their presence
was no longer necessary, bowed, and took their
leave. As Griffith was retiring last, he felt a
hand laid lightly on his shoulder, and turning,
perceived that he was detained by the pilot.
Mr. Griffith, he said, when they were quite
alone with the commander of the frigate, the
occurrences of the last night should teach us
confidence in each other; without it, we go on a
dangerous and fruitless errand.
Is the hazard equal? returned the youth.
I am known to all to be the man I seemam
in the service of my countrybelong to a family,
and enjoy a name, that is a pledge for my loyalty
to the cause of Americaand yet I trust myself
on hostile ground, in the midst of enemies, with a
weak arm, and under circumstances where
treachery would prove my ruin. Who and what
is the man who thus enjoys your confidence,
Captain
Munson? I ask the question less for myself
than for the gallant men who will fearlessly
follow
wherever I lead.
A shade of dark displeasure crossed the
features
of the stranger, at one part of this speech,
and at its close he sunk into deep thought. The
commander, however, replied
There is a show of reason in your question,
Mr. Griffithand yet you are not the man to be
told that implicit obedience is what I have a right
to expect. I have not your pretensions, sir, by
birth or education, and yet Congress have not
seen proper to overlook my years and services.
I command this frigate
Say no more, interrupted the pilot. There
is reason in his doubts, and they shall be
appeased
.
I like the proud and fearless eye of the
young man, and while he fears a gibbet from
my hands, I will show him how to repose a noble
confidence. Read this, sir, and tell me if you
distrust me now?
While the stranger spoke, he thrust his hand into
the bosom of his dress, and drew forth a parchment,
decorated with ribbands and bearing a
massive
seal, which he opened, and laid on the table
before the youth. As he pointed with his finger,
impressively, to different parts of the writing, his
eye kindled with a look of unusual fire, and there
was a faint tinge discernible on his pallid features,
when he spoke.
See! he said. Royalty itself does not
hesitate to bear witness in my favour, and that is
not a name to occasion dread to an American.
Griffith gazed with wonder at the fair signature
of the unfortunate Louis, which graced the
bottom
of the parchment; but when his eye obeyed
the signal of the stranger, and rested on the body
of the instrument, he started back from the table,
and fixing his animated eyes on the pilot, he cried,
while a glow of fiery courage flitted across his
countenance
Lead on! I'll follow you to death!
A smile of gratified exultation struggled around
the lips of the stranger, who took the arm of the
young man, and led him into a state-room, leaving
the commander of the frigate, standing in his
unmoved and quiet manner, a spectator of, but
hardly an actor in the scene.
CHAPTER VIII.
Fierce bounding, forward sprung the ship,
Like grayhound starting from the slip,
To seize his flying prey.
Lord of the Isles
.
Although
the subject of the consultation
remained
a secret with those whose opinions were
required, yet enough of the result leaked out
among the subordinate officers, to throw the
whole crew into a state of eager excitement.
The rumour spread itself along the decks of the
frigate, with the rapidity of an alarm, that an
expedition
was to attempt the shore on some hidden
service, dictated by the Congress itself; and
conjectures
were made respecting its force and
destination
,
with all that interest which might be
imagined would exist among the men whose lives
or liberties were to abide the issue. A gallant
and reckless daring, mingled with the desire of
novelty, however, was the prevailing sentiment
among the crew, who would have received with
cheers the intelligence that their vessel was
commanded
to force the passage of the united
British
fleet. A few of the older and more prudent
of the sailors were exceptions to this thoughtless
hardihood, and one or two, among whom the
cockswain of the whale-boat was the most
conspicuous
,
ventured to speak doubtingly of all
sorts of land service, as being of a nature never
to be attempted by seamen.
Captain Manual had his men paraded in the
weather-gangway, and after a short address,
calculated
to inflame their military ardour and
patriotism
,
acquainted them, that he required twenty
volunteers, which was in truth half their number,
for a dangerous service. After a short pause,
the company stepped forward, like one man, and
announced themselves as ready to follow him to
the end of the world. The marine cast a look
over his shoulder, at this gratifying declaration,
in quest of Barnstable; but observing that the
sailor was occupied with some papers, on a
distant
part of the quarter-deck, he proceeded to
make a most impartial division among the
candidates
for glory; taking care, at the same time, to
cull his company in such a manner as to give
himself the flower of his men, and, consequently,
to leave the ship the refuse.
While this arrangement was taking place, and
the crew of the frigate was in this state of
excitement
,
Griffith ascended to the deck, his
countenance
flushed with unusual enthusiasm, and his
eyes beaming with a look of animation and
gayety that had long been strangers to the face
of the young man. He was giving forth the few
necessary orders to the seamen he was to take
with him from the ship, when Barnstable again
motioned him to follow, and led the way once
more to the state-room.
Let the wind blow its pipe out, said the
commander of the Ariel, when they were seated;
there will be no landing on the eastern coast of
England, till the sea goes down. But this Kate
was made for a sailor's wife! see, Griffith, what
VOL. I. 9
a set of signals she has formed, out of her own
cunning head.
I hope your opinion may prove true, and that
you may be the happy sailor who is to wed her,
returned the other. The girl has indeed
discovered
surprising art in this business! where
could she have learnt the method and system so
well?
Where! why, where she learnt better things;
how to prize a whole-hearted seaman, for
instance
.
Do you think that my tongue was
jammed
in my mouth, all the time we used to sit by
the side of the river in Carolina, and that we
found nothing to talk about!
Did you amuse your mistress with treatises
on the art of navigation, and the science of
signals
?
said Griffith, smiling.
I answered her questions, Mr. Griffith, as
any civil man would to a woman he loved. The
girl has as much curiosity as one of my own
townswomen who has weathered cape forty
without
a husband, and her tongue goes like a
dogvane
in a calm, first one way and then another.
But here is her dictionary. Now own, Griff., in
spite of your college learning and sentimentals,
that a woman of ingenuity and cleverness is a
very good sort of a helpmate.
I never doubted the merits of Miss Plowden,
said the other, with a droll gravity that often
mingled
with his deeper feelings, the result of a
sailor's habits, blended with native character.
But this indeed surpasses all my expectations!
Why, she has, in truth, made a most judicious
selection of phrases. `No. 168. **** indelible;'
`169. **** end only with life;' `170. **** I fear
yours misleads me;' `171.'
Pshaw! exclaimed Barnstable, snatching
the book from before the laughing eyes of
Griffith
;
what folly, to throw away our time now
on such nonsense. What think you of this
expedition
to the land?
That it may be the means of rescuing the
ladies, though it fail in making the prisoners we
anticipate.
But this pilot! you remember that he holds
us by our necks, and can run us all up to the
yard-arm of some English ship, whenever he
chooses to open his throat, at their threats or
bribes.
It would have been better that he should
have cast the ship ashore, when he had her
entangled
in the shoals; it would have been our
last thought to suspect him of treachery then,
returned
Griffith. I follow him with confidence,
and must believe that we are safer with him than
we should be without him.
Let him lead to the dwelling of his
foxhunting
ministers of state, cried Barnstable,
thrusting his book of signals into his bosom;
but here is a chart that will show us the way to
the port we wish to find. Let my foot once
more touch terra firma, and you may write craven
against my name, if that laughing vixen slips her
cable before my eyes, and shoots into the wind's
eye again, like a flying-fish chased by a dolphin.
Mr. Griffith, we must have the chaplain with us
to the shore.
The madness of love is driving you into the
errors of the soldier. Would you lie-by to hear
sermons, with a flying party like ours?
Nay, nay, we must lay-to for nothing that is
not unavoidable; but there are so many tacks in
such a chase, when one has time to breathe, that
we might as well spend our leisure in getting that
fellow to splice us together. He has a handy
way with a prayer-book, and could do the job
as well as a bishop, and I should like to be able
to say, that this is the last time these two saucy
names, which are written at the bottom of this
letter, should ever be seen sailing in the company
of each other.
It will not do, said his friend, shaking his
head, and endeavouring to force a smile which
his feelings suppressed; it will not do, Richard;
we must yield our own inclinations to the service
of our country; nor is this pilot a man who will
consent to be led from his purpose.
Then let him follow his purpose alone, cried
Barnstable. There is no human power,
always
saving my superior officer, that shall keep
me from throwing abroad these tiny signals, and
having a private talk with my dark-eyed Kate.
But for a paltry pilot! he may luff and bear away
as he pleases, while I shall steer as true as a
magnet for that old ruin, where I can bring my
eyes to bear on that romantic wing and three
smoky vanes. Not that I'll forget my duty;
yes, I'll help you catch the Englishmen, but when
that is done, hey! for Katherine Plowden and my
true love!
Hush, madcap! the ward-room holds long
ears, and our bulkheads grow thin by wear. I
must keep you and myself to our duty. This is
no children's game that we play; it seems the
commissioners at Paris have thought proper to
employ a frigate in the sport.
Barnstable's gayety was a little repressed by
the grave manner of his companion; but after
reflecting a moment, he started on his feet, and
made the usual movements for departure.
Whither? asked Griffith, gently detaining
his impatient friend.
To old Moderate; I have a proposal to
make, that may remove every difficulty.
Name it to me, then; I am in his council,
and may save you the trouble and mortification
of a refusal.
How many of those gentry does he wish to
line his cabin with?
The pilot has named no less than six, all
men of rank and consideration with the enemy.
Two of them are peers, two more belong to the
commons' house of parliament, one is a general,
and the sixth, like ourselves, is a sailor, and
holds the rank of captain. They muster at a
hunting seat, near the coast, and believe me, the
scheme is not without its plausibility.
Well, then, there are two a-piece for us.
You follow the pilot, if you will; but let me
sheer off for this dwelling of Colonel Howard,
with my cockswain and boat's-crew. I will
surprise
his house, release the ladies, and on my way
back, lay my hands on two of the first lords I
fall in with. I suppose, for our business, one is
as good as another.
Griffith could not repress a faint laugh, while
he replied
Though they are said to be each other's
peers, there is, I believe some difference even in
the quality of lords. England might thank us
for ridding her of some among them. Neither
are they to be found, like beggars, under every
hedge. No, no, the men we seek must have
something better than their nobility to recommend
them to our favour. But let us examine more
closely into this plan and map of Miss Plowden;
something may occur, that shall yet bring the
place within our circuit, like a contingent duty
of the cruise.
Barnstable reluctantly relinquished his own
wild plan, to the more sober judgment of his
friend, and together they passed an hour,
inquiring
into the practicability, and consulting on
9*
the means, of making their public duty subserve
the purposes of their private feelings.
The gale continued to blow heavily, during
the whole of that morning; but towards noon,
the usual indications of better weather became
apparent. During these few hours of inaction in
the frigate, the marines, who were drafted for
service
on the land, moved through the vessel with a
busy and stirring air, as if they were about to
participate in the glory and danger of the
campaign
their officer had planned, while the few
seamen who were to accompany the expedition
steadily paced the deck, with their hands thrust
into the bosoms of their neat blue jackets, or,
occasionally, stretched towards the horizon, as
their fingers traced, for their less experienced
shipmates, the signs of an abatement in the gale
among the driving clouds. The last lagger among
the soldiers had appeared with his knapsack on
his back in the lee-gangway, where his comrades
were collected, armed and accoutred for the
strife, when Captain Munson ascended to the
quarter-deck, accompanied by the stranger and
his first lieutenant. A word was spoken by the
latter in a low voice to a midshipman, who
skipped
gayly along the deck, and presently the
shrill call of the boatswain was heard, preceding
the hoarse cry of
Away there, you tigers, away!
A smart roll of the drum followed, and the
marines paraded, while the six seamen who
belonged
to the cutter that owned so fierce a name,
made their preparations for lowering their little
bark from the quarter of the frigate into the
troubled sea. Every thing was conducted in the
most exact order, and with a coolness and skill
that bid defiance to the turbulence of the angry
elements. The marines were safely transported
from the ship to the schooner, under the
favouring
shelter of the former, though the boat
appeared
,
at times, to be seeking the cavities of the
ocean, and again, to be riding in the clouds, as
she passed from one vessel to the other.
At length, it was announced that the cutter was
ready to receive the officers of the party. The
pilot walked aside, and held private discourse,
for a few moments, with the commander, who
listened to his sentences with marked and singular
attention. When their conference was ended,
the veteran bared his gray head again to the
blasts, and offered his hand to the other, with
a seaman's frankness, mingled with the deference
of an inferior. The compliment was carelessly
returned by the stranger, who turned quickly on
his heel, and directed the attention of those who
awaited his movements, by a significant gesture,
to the gangway.
Come, gentlemen, let us go, said Griffith,
starting from a reverie, and bowing his hasty
compliments to his brethren in arms.
When it appeared that his superiors were
ready
to enter the boat, the boy, who was styled Mr.
Merry, by nautical courtesy, and who had been
ordered to be in readiness, sprang over the side
of the frigate, and glided into the cutter, with the
activity of a squirrel. But the captain of
marines
paused, and cast a meaning glance at the
pilot, whose place it was to precede him. The
stranger, as he lingered on the deck, was
examining
the aspect of the heavens, and seemed
unconscious of the expectations of the soldier,
who gave vent to his impatience, after a
moment's
detention, by saying
We wait for you, Mr. Gray.
Aroused by the sound of his name, the pilot
glanced his quick eye on the speaker, but instead
of advancing, he gently bent his body, as he again
signed towards the gangway with his hand. To
the astonishment not only of the soldier, but of
all who witnessed this breach of naval etiquette,
Griffith bowed low, and entered the boat with the
same promptitude as if he were preceding an
admiral
.
Whether the stranger became conscious
of his want of courtesy, or was too indifferent to
surrounding objects to note occurrences, he
immediately
followed himself, leaving to the marine
the post of honour. The latter, who was
distinguished
for his skill in all matters of naval or
military etiquette, thought proper to apologize,
at a fitting time, to the first lieutenant, for
suffering
his senior officer to precede him into a boat,
but never failed to show a becoming exultation,
when he recounted the circumstance, by dwelling
on the manner in which he had brought down the
pride of the haughty pilot.
Barnstable had been several hours on board his
little vessel, which was every way prepared for
their reception; and as soon as the heavy cutter of
the frigate was hoisted on her deck, he announced
that the schooner was ready to proceed. It has
been already intimated, that the Ariel belonged to
the smallest class of sea-vessels, and as her
construction
reduced even that size in appearance,
she was peculiarly well adapted to the sort of
service in which she was about to be employed.
Notwithstanding her lightness rendered her
nearly
as buoyant as a cork, and at times she
actually
seemed to ride on the foam, her low decks
were perpetually washed by the heavy seas that
dashed against her frail sides, and she tossed and
rolled in the hollows of the waves, in a manner
that compelled even the practised seamen who
trod her decks to move with guarded steps. Still
she was trimmed and cleared with an air of
nautical
neatness and attention that afforded the
utmost possible room for her dimensions; and
though in miniature, she wore the trappings of
war as proudly as if the metal she bore was of a
more fatal and dangerous character. The
murderous
gun which, since the period of which we
are writing, has been universally adopted in all
vessels of inferior size, was then in the infancy of
its invention, and was known to the American
mariner only by reputation, under the appalling
name of a smasher. Of a vast caliber, though
short, and easily managed, its advantages were
even in that early day beginning to be
appreciated
,
and the largest ships were thought to be
unusually
well provided with the means of offence,
when they carried two or three cannon of this
formidable
invention among their armament. At a
later day this weapon has been improved and
altered
,
until its use has become general in vessels of
a certain size, taking its appellation from the
Carron
,
on the banks of which river it was first
moulded
.
In place of carronades, six light brass cannon
were firmly lashed to the bulwarks of the Ariel,
their brazen throats blackened by the sea-water,
which so often broke harmlessly over these
engines
of destruction. In the centre of the vessel,
between her two masts, a gun of the same metal,
but of nearly twice the length of the others, was
mounted on a carriage of a new and singular
construction
,
which admitted of its being turned in
any direction, so as to be of service in most of the
emergencies that occur in naval warfare.
The eye of the pilot examined this armament
closely, and then turned to the well-ordered decks,
the neat and compact rigging, and the hardy
faces of the fine young crew, with manifest
satisfaction
.
Contrary to what had been his
practice
during the short time he had been with them,
he uttered his gratification freely and aloud.
You have a tight boat, Mr. Barnstable, he
said, and a gallant looking crew. You
promise
good service, sir, in time of need, and that
hour may not be far distant.
The sooner the better, returned the reckless
sailor; I have not had an opportunity of
scaling
my guns since we quitted Brest, though we
passed several of the enemy's cutters coming up
channel, with whom our bull-dogs longed for a
conversation. Mr. Griffith will tell you, pilot,
that my little sixes can speak, on occasion, with
a voice nearly as loud as the frigate's eighteens.
But not to as much purpose, observed
Griffith
;
`vox et preterea nihil,' as we said at the
school.
I know nothing of your Greek or Latin, Mr.
Griffith, retorted the commander of the Ariel;
but if you mean that those seven brass
play-things
won't throw a round shot as far as any
gun of their size and height above the water, or
won't scatter grape and cannister with any
blunderbuss
in your ship, you may possibly find an
opportunity that will convince you to the
contrary
,
before we part company.
They promise well, said the pilot, who was
evidently ignorant of the good understanding
that existed between the two officers, and wished
to conciliate all under his directions, and I doubt
not they will argue all the leading points of a
combat with good discretion. I see that you
have christened themI suppose for their
respective
merits. They are indeed expressive names!
'Tis the freak of an idle moment, said
Barnstable
,
laughing, as he glanced his eyes to the
cannon
,
above which were painted the several quaint
names of boxer, plumper, grinder,
scatterer, exterminator, and nail-driver.
Why have you thrown the midship-gun
without
the pale of your baptism? asked the pilot;
or do you know it by the usual title of the `old
woman?'
No, no, I have no such petticoat terms on
board me, cried the other; but move more to
starboard, and you will see its style painted on
the cheeks of the carriage, and it's a name that
need not cause them to blush either.
'Tis a singular epithet, though not without
some meaning!
It has more than you, perhaps, dream of, sir.
That worthy seaman whom you see leaning
against the foremast, and who would serve, on
occasion, for a spare spar himself, is the captain
of that gun, and more than once has decided
some warm disputes with John Bull, by the
manner
in which he has wielded it. No marine can
trail his musket more easily than my cockswain
can train his nine-pounder on an object; and thus
from their connexion, and some resemblance
there is between them in length, it has got the
name which you perceive it carries; that of `long
Tom.'
The pilot smiled as he listened, but turning
away from the speaker, the deep reflection that
crossed his brow but too plainly showed that he
trifled only from momentary indulgence; and
Griffith intimated to Barnstable, that as the gale
was sensibly abating, they would pursue the
object
of their destination.
Thus recalled to his duty, the commander of
the schooner forgot the delightful theme of
expatiating
on the merits of his vessel, and issued
the necessary orders to direct their movements.
Slowly the little schooner obeyed the impulse of
her helm, and fell off before the wind, when the
folds of her squaresail, though limited by a
prudent
reef, were opened to the blasts, and she shot
away from her consort, like a meteor dancing
across the waves. The black mass of the
frigate's
hull soon sunk in distance, and long before
the sun had fallen below the hills of England,
her tall masts were barely distinguishable by the
small cloud of sail that held the vessel to her
station
.
As the ship disappeared, the land seemed
to issue out of the bosom of the deep, and so
rapid was their progress, that the dwellings of
the gentry, the humbler cottages, and even the
dim lines of the hedges, became gradually more
distinct to the eyes of the bold mariners, until
they were beset with the gloom of evening, when
the whole scene faded from their view in the
darkness
of the hour, leaving only the faint outline of
the land visible in the track before them, and the
sullen billows of the ocean raging with appalling
violence in their rear.
Still the little Ariel held on her way, skimming
the ocean like a water-fowl seeking its place of
nightly rest, and shooting in towards the land as
fearlessly as if the dangers of the preceding
night were forgotten, like the warnings of an
ill-remembered
experience. No shoals or rocks
appeared
to arrest her course, and we must leave
her gliding into the dark streak that was thrown
from the high and rocky cliffs, that lined a basin
of bold entrance, where the mariners often sought
and found a refuge from the dangers of the
German
ocean.
CHAPTER IX.
Sirrah! how dare you leave your barley broth,
To come in armour thus, against your king!
Drama
.
The
large, irregular building, inhabited by
Colonel Howard, well deserved the description it
had received from the pen of Katherine
Plowden
.
Notwithstanding the confusion in its
orders
,
owing to the different ages in which its
several parts had been erected, the interior was
not wanting in that appearance of comfort which
forms the great characteristic of English
domestic
life. Its dark and intricate mazes of halls,
galleries, and apartments, or by such other names
as they were properly to be distinguished, were
all well provided with good and substantial
furniture
,
and whatever might have been the
purposes
of their original construction, they were
now peacefully appropriated to the service of a
quiet and well-ordered family.
There were divers portentous traditions, of
cruel separations and blighted loves, which
always
linger, like cobwebs, around the walls of
old houses, to be heard here also, and which,
doubtless, in abler hands, might easily have been
VOL. I. 10
wrought up into scenes of high interest and
delectable
pathos. But our humbler efforts must be
limited by an attempt to describe man as God
has made him, vulgar and unseemly as he may
appear to sublimated faculties, to the possessors
of which enviable qualifications we desire to say,
at once, that we are determined to eschew all
things supernaturally refined, as we would the
devil. To all those, then, who are tired of the
company of their species, we would bluntly
insinuate
,
that the sooner they throw aside our pages,
and seize upon those of some more highly gifted
bard, the sooner will they be in the way of
quitting
earth, if not of attaining heaven. Our
business
is solely to treat of man, and this fair scene
on which he acts, and that not in his subtleties
and metaphysical contradictions, but in his
palpable
nature, that all may understand our
meaning
as well as ourselveswhereby we manifestly
reject the prodigious advantage of being thought
a genius, by perhaps foolishly refusing the mighty
aid of incomprehensibility to establish such a
character.
Leaving the gloomy shadows of the cliffs,
under
which the little Ariel has been seen to steer,
and the sullen roaring of the surf along the
margin
of the ocean, we shall endeavour to transport
the reader to the dining parlour of St. Ruth's
Abbey
,
taking the evening of the same day as the time
for introducing another collection of those
personages
,
whose acts and characters it has become
our duty to describe.
The room was not of very large dimensions,
and every part was glittering with the collected
light of half a dozen candles, aided by the fierce
rays that glanced from the grate, which held a most
cheerful fire of seacoal. The mouldings of the
dark oak wainscoting threw back upon the
massive
table of mahogany, streaks of strong light,
which played among the rich fluids, that were
sparkling on the board, in mimic haloes. The
outline of this picture of comfort was formed by
damask curtains of a deep red, enormous oak
chairs with leathern backs and cushioned seats,
as if the apartment were hermetically sealed
against the world and its chilling cares.
Around the table, which still stood in the
centre
of the floor, were seated three gentlemen, in
the easy enjoyment of their daily repast. The
cloth had been drawn, and the bottle was slowly
passing among them, as if those who partook of
its bounty well knew that neither the time nor
the opportunity would be wanting for their
deliberate
indulgence in its pleasures.
At one end of the table an elderly man was
seated, who performed whatever little acts of
courtesy the duties of a host would appear to
render necessary, in a company where all seemed
to be equally at their ease and at home. This
gentleman was in the decline of life, though his
erect carriage, quick movements, and steady hand,
equally denoted that it was an old age free from
the usual infirmities. In his dress, he belonged to
that class whose members always follow the
fashions
of the age anterior to the one in which
they live, whether from disinclination to sudden
changes of any kind, or from the recollections of
a period which, with them, has been hallowed by
scenes and feelings that the chilling evening of
life can neither revive nor equal. Age might
possibly have thrown its blighting frosts on his
thin locks, but art had laboured to conceal the
ravages with the nicest care. An accurate
outline
of powder covered not only the parts where
the hair actually remained, but wherever nature
had prescribed that hair should grow. His
countenance
was strongly marked in features, if not
in expression, exhibiting, on the whole, a look of
noble integrity and high honour, which was a
good deal aided in its effect, by the lofty receding
forehead, that rose like a monument, above the
whole, to record the character of the aged veteran.
A few streaks of branching red mingled with the
swarthiness that was rendered more conspicuous
by the outline of unsullied white which nearly
surrounded his prominent features.
Opposite to the host, who it will at once be
understood was Colonel Howard, was the thin,
yellow visage of Mr. Christopher Dillon, that
bane to the happiness of her cousin, already
mentioned by Miss Plowden.
Between these two gentlemen was a
middle-aged
,
hard-featured man, attired in the livery of
King George, whose countenance emulated the
scarlet of his coat, and whose principal
employment
,
at the moment, appeared to consist in doing
honour to the cheer of his entertainer.
Occasionally, a servant entered or left the
room in silence, giving admission, however,
through the opened door, to the rushing sounds
of the gale, as the wind murmured amid the
angles
and high chimneys of the edifice.
A man, in the dress of a rustic, was standing
near the chair of Colonel Howard, between whom
and the master of the mansion a dialogue had
been maintained, which closed as follows. The
colonel was the first to speak, after the curtain is
drawn from between the eyes of the reader and
the scene.
Said you, farmer, that the Scotchman beheld
the vessels with his own eyes?
The answer was a simple negative.
Well, well, continued the colonel, you can
withdraw.
The man made a rude attempt at a bow, which
being returned by the old soldier with formal
grace, he left the room. The host, turning to
his companions, resumed the subject.
If those rash boys have really persuaded the
silly dotard who commands the frigate, to trust
himself within the shoals, on the eve of such a
gale as this, their case must have been hopeless
indeed! Thus may rebellion and disaffection
ever meet with the just indignation of
Providence
!
It would not surprise me, gentlemen, to
hear that my native land has been engulphed by
earthquakes, or swallowed by the ocean, so awful
and inexcusable has been the weight of her
transgressions
!
And yet it was a proud and daring
boy who held the second station in that ship! I
knew his father well, and a gallant gentleman he
was, who, like my own brother, the parent of
Cecilia
,
preferred to serve his master on the ocean
rather than on the land. His son inherited the
bravery of his high spirit, without its loyalty.
One would not wish to have such a youth
drowned
either.
This speech, which partook much of the
nature
of a soliloquy, especially towards its close,
called for no immediate reply; but the soldier,
having held his glass to the candle, to admire the
rosy hue of its contents, and then sipped of the
fluid so often that nothing but a clear light
remained
to gaze at, quietly replaced the empty
vessel
on the table, and, as he extended an arm
towards the blushing bottle, he spoke, in the
careless tones of one whose thoughts were
dwelling
on another theme
Ay, true enough, sir; good men are scarce,
and, as you say, one cannot but mourn his fate,
though his death be glorious; quite a loss to his
majesty's service, I dare say, it will prove.
10*
A loss to the service of his majesty! echoed
the hosthis death glorious! no, Captain
Borroughcliffe
,
the death of no rebel can be glorious;
and how he can be a loss to his majesty's service,
I am myself quite at a loss to understand.
The soldier, whose ideas were in that happy
state of confusion that renders it difficult to
command
the one most needed, but who still, from
long discipline, had them under a wonderful
control
for the disorder of his brain, answered, with
great promptitude
I mean the loss of his example, sir. It would
have been so appalling to others, to have seen the
young man executed instead of shot in battle.
He is drowned, sir.
Ah! that is the next thing to being hung;
that circumstance had escaped me.
It is by no means certain, sir, that the ship
and schooner that the drover saw are the vessels
you take them to have been, said Mr. Dillon, in
a harsh, drawling tone of voice. I should
doubt their daring to venture so openly on the
coast, and in the direct track of our vessels of
war.
These people are our countrymen,
Christopher
,
though they be rebels, exclaimed the
colonel
.
They are a hardy and brave nation.
When I had the honour to serve his majesty,
some twenty years since, it was my fortune to
face the enemies of my king in a few small
affairs
,
Captain Borroughcliffe; such as the siege
of Quebec, and the battle before its gates, a
trifling
occasion at Ticonderoga, and that
unfortunate
catastrophe of General Braddockwith a
few others. I must say, sir, in favour of the
colonists, that they played a manful game on the
latter day; and this gentleman who now heads
the rebels sustained a gallant name among us for
his conduct in that disastrous business. He was
a discreet, well-behaved young man, and quite a
gentleman. I have never denied that Mr.
Washington
was very much of a gentleman.
Yes, said the soldier, yawning, he was
educated among his majesty's troops, and he
could hardly be otherwise. But I am quite
melancholy
about this unfortunate drowning,
Colonel
Howard. Here will be an end of my
vocation
,
I suppose, and I am far from denying that
your hospitality has made these quarters most
agreeable to me.
Then, sir, the obligation is only mutual,
returned the host, with a polite inclination of his
head; but gentlemen, who, like ourselves, have
been made free of the camp, need not bandy idle
compliments about such trifles. If it were my
kinsman Dillon, now, whose thoughts run more
on Coke upon Littleton than on the gayeties of a
mess-table, and a soldier's life, he might think
such formalities as necessary as all his hard words
are to a deed. Come, Borroughcliffe, my dear
fellow, I believe we have given an honest glass to
each of the royal family, (God bless them all!) let
us swallow a bumper to the memory of the
immortal
Wolfe.
An honest proposal, my gallant host, and
such a one as a soldier will never decline,
returned
the captain, who roused himself with the
occasion. God bless them all, say I, in echo,
and if this gracious queen of ours ends as
famously
as she has begun, 'twill be such a family
of princes as no other army in Europe can brag
of around a mess-table.
Ay, ay, there is some consolation in that
thought, in the midst of this dire rebellion of my
countrymen. But I'll vex myself no more with
the unpleasant recollections; the arms of my
sovereign will soon purge that wicked land of
the foul stain.
Of that there can be no doubt, said
Borroughcliffe
,
whose thoughts still continued a little
obscured by the sparkling Madeira that had long
lain ripening under a Carolinian sun; these
Yankees fly before his majesty's regulars, like so
many dirty clowns in a London mob before a
charge of the horse-guards.
Pardon me, Captain Borroughcliffe, said his
host, elevating his person to more than its usually
erect attitude; they may be misguided,
deluded
,
and betrayed, but the comparison is unjust.
Give them arms and give them discipline, and he
who gets an inch of their land from them,
plentiful
as it is, will find a bloody day on which to
take possession.
The veriest coward in Christendom would
fight in a country where wine brews itself into
such a cordial as this, returned the cool soldier;
I am a living proof that you mistook my
meaning
;
for had not those loose-flapped gentlemen
they call Vermontese and Hampshire-granters
(God grant them his blessing for the deed!)
finished
two thirds of my company, I should not have
been at this day under your roof, a recruiting
instead of a marching officer; neither should I
have been bound up in a covenant, like the law
of Moses, could Burgoyne have made head
against their long-legged marchings and
counter-marchings
.
Sir, I drink their healths, with all
my heart; and, with such a bottle of golden
sunshine
before me, rather than displease so good a
friend, I will go through Gates's whole army,
regiment
by regiment, company by company, or, if
you insist on the same, even man by man.
On no account would I tax your politeness so
far, returned the Colonel, abundantly mollified by
this ample concession; I stand too much your
debtor, Captain Borroughcliffe, for so freely
volunteering to defend my house against the
attacks
of my piratical, rebellious, and misguided
countrymen, to think of requiring such a
concession
.
Harder duty might be performed, and no
favours asked, my respectable host, returned
the soldier. Country quarters are apt to be
dull, and the liquor is commonly execrable; but
in such a dwelling as this a man can rock himself in
the very cradle of contentment. And yet there is
one subject of complaint, that I should disgrace
my regiment did I not speak of, for it is
incumbent
on me, both as a man and a soldier, to be no
longer silent.
Name it, sir, freely, and its cause shall be as
freely redressed, said the host, in some amazement.
Here we three sit, from morning to night,
continued the soldier, bachelors all, well
provisioned
and better liquored, I grant you, but like
so many well fed anchorites, while two of the
loveliest damsels in the island pine in solitude
within a hundred feet of us, without tasting the
homage of our sighs. This I will maintain is a
reproach both to your character, Colonel Howard,
as an old soldier, and to mine as a young one. As
to our friend Coke on top of Littleton here, I
leave him to the quiddities of the law to plead his
own cause.
The brow of the host contracted for a moment,
and the sallow cheek of Dillon, who had sat
during
the dialogue in a sullen silence, appeared to
grow even livid; but gradually the open brow
of the veteran resumed its frank expression, and
the lips of the other relaxed into a jesuitical sort
of a smile, that was totally disregarded by the
captain, who amused himself with sipping his
wine, while he waited for an answer, as if he
analyzed each drop that crossed his palate.
After an embarrassing pause of a moment,
Colonel Howard broke the silence.
There is reason in Borroughcliffe's hint, for
such I take it to be
I meant it for a plain, matter-of-fact
complaint
,
interrupted the soldier.
And you have cause for it, continued the
colonel. It is unreasonable, Christopher, that
the ladies should allow their dread of these
piratical
countrymen of ours to exclude us from their
society, though prudence may require that they
remain secluded in their apartments. We owe
the respect to Captain Borroughcliffe, that at
least we admit him to the sight of the coffee-urn
in an evening.
That is precisely my meaning, said the
captain
;
as for dining with them, why, I am well
provided for here, but there is no one knows how
to set hot water a hissing in so professional a
manner
as a woman. So forward, my dear and
honoured
colonel, and lay your injunctions on them,
that they command your humble servant and Mr.
Coke unto Littleton to advance and give the
countersign of gallantry.
Dillon contracted his disagreeable features into
something that was intended for a satirical smile,
before he spoke as follows:
Both the veteran Colonel Howard and the
gallant Captain Borroughcliffe may find it easier
to overcome the enemies of his majesty in the
field than to shake a woman's caprice. Not a
day has passed, these three weeks, that I have not
sent my inquiries to the door of Miss Howard, as
became her father's kinsman, with a wish to
soften her apprehensions of the pirates; but little
has she deigned me in reply, more than such
thanks as her sex and breeding could not well
dispense with.
Well, you have been as fortunate as myself,
and why you should be more so, I see no reason,
cried the soldier, throwing a glance of cool
contempt
at the other; fear whitens the cheek, and
ladies best love to be seen where the roses flourish
rather than the lilies.
A woman is never so interesting, Captain
Borroughcliffe, said the gallant host, as when
she appears to lean on man for support; and he
who does not feel himself honoured by the trust
is a disgrace to his species.
Bravo! my honoured sir, a worthy
sentiment
,
and spoken like a true soldier; but I have
heard much of the loveliness of the ladies of the
Abbey, since I have been in my present quarters,
and I feel a strong desire to witness beauty
encircled
by such loyalty as could induce them to flee
their native country, rather than to devote their
charms to the rude keeping of the rebels.
The colonel looked grave, and for a moment
fierce; but the expression of his displeasure soon
passed away in a smile of forced gayety, and, as
he cheerfully rose from his seat, he cried
You shall be admitted this very night, and
this instant, Captain Borroughcliffe. We owe it,
sir, to your services here, as well as in the field,
and those froward girls shall be humoured no
longer. Nay, it is nearly two weeks since I have
seen my ward myself, nor have I laid my eyes on
my niece but twice in all that time. Christopher,
I leave the captain under your good care, while I
go seek admission into the cloisters; we call that
part of the building the cloisters, because it holds
our nuns, sir! You will pardon my early
absence
from the table, Captain Borroughcliffe.
I beg it may not be mentioned; you leave
an excellent representative behind you, sir, cried
the soldier, taking in the lank figure of Mr.
Dillon
in a sweeping glance, that terminated with a
settled gaze on his decanter. Make my devoirs
to the recluses, my dear colonel, and say all that
your own excellent wit shall suggest as an
apology
for my impatience. Mr. Dillon, I meet you
in a bumper to their healths and in their honour.
The challenge was coldly accepted, and while
these gentlemen still held their glasses to their
lips, Colonel Howard left the apartment, bowing
low, and uttering a thousand excuses to his guest,
as he proceeded, and even offering a very
unnecessary
apology of the same effect to his habitual
inmate, Mr. Dillon.
Is fear so very powerful within these old
walls? said the soldier, when the door closed
behind their host, that your ladies deem it
necessary
to conceal themselves before even an
enemy is known to have landed?
Dillon coldly replied
The name of Paul Jones is terrific to all on
this coast, I believe, nor are the ladies of St. Ruth
singular in their apprehensions, sir.
Ah! the pirate has bought himself a desperate
name, since the affair of Flamborough Head.
But let him look to't, if he trusts himself in
another
Whitehaven expedition, while there is a
detachment
of the th in the neighbourhood,
though the men should be nothing better than
recruits.
Our last accounts leave him safe in the court
of Louis, returned his companion; but there
are men as desperate as himself, who sail the
ocean under the rebel flag, and from one or two
of them we have had much reason to apprehend
the vengeance of disappointed men. It is they
that we hope are lost in this gale.
Hum! I hope they were dastards, then, or
your hopes are a little unchristian, and
He would have proceeded, but the door opened,
and his orderly entered, and announced, with
military precision, that a sentinel had detained
three men, who were passing along the highway,
near the Abbey, and who, by their dress,
appeared
to be seamen.
Well, let them pass, cried the captain;
what, have we nothing to do better than to stop
passengers, like footpads, on the king's highway!
give them of your canteens, and let the rascals
pass. Your orders were to give the alarm, if any
hostile party landed on the coast, not to detain
peaceable subjects on their lawful business.
I beg your honour's pardon, returned the
sergeant; but these men seemed lurking about
the grounds for no good, and as they kept
carefully
aloof from the place where our sentinel was
posted, until to-night, Downing thought it looked
suspiciously, and detained them.
Downing is a fool, and it may go hard with
him for his officiousness. What have you done
with the men?
I took them to the guard-room in the east
wing, your honour.
Then feed them; and harkye, sirrah! liquor
them well, that we hear no complaints, and let
them go.
Yes, sir, yes, your honour shall be obeyed;
but there is a straight, soldierly looking fellow
among them, that I think might be persuaded to
enlist, if he were detained till morning. I doubt,
sir, by his walk, but he has served already.
Ha! what say you! cried the captain,
pricking up his ears, like a hound who hears a
well-known cry, served, think ye, already?
There are signs about him, your honour, to
that effect. An old soldier is seldom deceived in
VOL. I. 11
such a thing, and considering his disguise, for it
can be no other, and the place where we took
him, there is no danger of a have-us corpses,
until he is tied to us by the laws of the kingdom.
Peace, you knave! said Borroughcliffe,
rising
,
and making a devious route towards the
door; you speak in the presence of my lord
chief justice that is to be, and should not talk
lightly of the laws. But still you say reason;
give me your arm, sergeant, and lead the way to
the east wing; my eyesight is good for nothing in
such a dark night. A soldier should always visit
his guard before the tattoo beats.
After emulating the courtesy of their host,
Captain Borroughcliffe retired on this patriotic
errand, leaning on his subordinate in a style of
most familiar condescension. Dillon continued
at the table, endeavouring to express the
rancorous
feelings of his breast by a satirical smile of
contempt, that was necessarily lost on all but
himself
,
as a large mirror threw back the image of
his morose and unpleasant features.
But we must precede the veteran colonel in his
visit to the cloisters.
CHAPTER X.
And kindness like their own
Inspired those eyes affectionate and glad,
That seemed to love whate'er they looked upon;
Whether with Hebe's mirth her features shone,
Or if a shade more pleasing them o'ercast
Yet so becomingly th' expression past,
That each succeeding look was lovelier than the last.
Gertrude of Wyoming
.
The
western wing of St. Ruth house, or
abbey
,
as the building was indiscriminately called,
retained but few vestiges of the uses to which it
had been originally devoted. The upper
apartments
were small and numerous, extending on
either side of a long, low, and dark gallery, and
might have been the dormitories of the sisterhood
who were said to have once inhabited that
portion
of the edifice; but the ground-floor had been
modernized, as it was then called, about a century
before, and retained just enough of its ancient
character to blend the venerable with what was
thought comfortable in the commencement of the
reign of the third George. As this wing had
been appropriated to the mistress of the
mansion
,
ever since the building had changed its
spiritual
character for one of a more carnal nature,
Colonel Howard continued the arrangement,
when he became the temporary possessor of St.
Ruth's, until, in the course of events, the
apartments
which had been set apart for the
accommodation
and convenience of his niece, were
eventually
converted into her prison. But as the
severity
of the old veteran was as often marked by
an exhibition of his virtues as of his foibles,
the confinement and his displeasure constituted
the sole subjects of complaint that were given to
the young lady. That our readers may be better
qualified to judge of the nature of their
imprisonment
,
we shall transport them, without further
circumlocution, into the presence of the two
females
,
whom they must be already prepared to
receive.
The withdrawing-room of St. Ruth's was an
apartment which, tradition said, had formerly
been the refectory of the little bevy of fair sinners
who sought a refuge within its walls from the
temptations of the world. Their number was
not large, nor their entertainments very splendid,
or this limited space could not have contained
them. The room, however, was of fair
dimensions
,
and an air of peculiar comfort, mingled
with chastened luxury, was thrown around it, by
the voluminous folds of the blue damask curtains
that nearly concealed the sides where the deep
windows were placed, and by the dark leathern
hangings, richly stamped with cunning devices
in gold, that ornamented the two others.
Massive
couches in carved mahogany, with chairs of
a similar material and fashion, all covered by the
same rich fabric that composed the curtains,
together
with a Turkey carpet, over the shaggy
surface of which all the colours of the rainbow
were scattered in bright confusion, united to
relieve
the gloomy splendour of the enormous
mantel, deep, heavy cornices, and the complicated
carvings of the massive wood-work which
cumbered
the walls. A brisk fire of wood was
burning
on the hearth, in compliment to the wilful
prejudice of Miss Plowden, who had maintained,
in her most vivacious manner, that seacoal was
only tolerable for blacksmiths and Englishmen.
In addition to the cheerful blaze from the hearth,
two waxen lights, in candlesticks of massive
silver
,
were lending their aid to enliven the
apartment
.
One of these was casting its rays brightly
along the confused colours of the carpet on which
it stood, flickering before the active movements
of the form that played around it with light and
animated inflexions. The posture of this young
lady was infantile in grace, and, with one ignorant
of her motives, her employment would have been
obnoxious to the same construction. Divers small,
square pieces of silk, strongly contrasted to each
other in colour, lay on every side of her, and
were changed, by her nimble hands, into as many
different combinations, as if she were humouring
the fancies of her sex, or consulting the shades of
her own dark, but rich complexion, in the shop
of a mercer. The dark satin dress of this young
female served to display her small figure in its
true proportions, while her dancing eyes of
jet-black
shamed the dies of the Italian
manufacturer
by their superior radiancy. A few ribands
of pink, disposed about her person with an air
partly studied, and yet carelessly coquettish,
seemed rather to reflect than lend the rich bloom
that mantled around her laughing countenance,
leaving to the eye no cause to regret that she was
not fairer.
Another female figure, clad in virgin white,
was reclining on the end of a distant couch.
The seclusion in which they lived might have
rendered this female a little careless of her
appearance
,
or, what was more probable, the comb
had been found unequal to its burthen, for her
tresses, which rivalled the hue and gloss of the
11*
raven, had burst from their confinement, and,
dropping over her shoulder, fell along her dress
in rich profusion, finally resting on the damask of
the couch, in dark folds, like glittering silk. A
small hand, which seemed to blush at its own
naked beauties, supported her head, imbedded in
the volumes of her hair, like the fairest alabaster
set in the deepest ebony. Beneath the dark
profusion
of her curls, which, notwithstanding the
sweeping train that fell about her person, covered
the summit of her head, lay a low, spotless
forehead
of dazzling whiteness, that was relieved by
two arches so slightly and truly drawn that they
appeared to have been produced by the nicest
touches of art. The fallen lids and long silken
lashes concealed the eyes, that rested on the floor,
as if their mistress mused in melancholy. The
remainder of the features of this maiden were of
a kind that is most difficult to describe, being
neither regular nor perfect in their several parts,
yet harmonizing and composing a whole, that
formed an exquisite picture of female delicacy
and loveliness. There might or there might not
have been a tinge of slight red in her cheeks, but
it varied with each emotion of her bosom, even
as she mused in quiet, now seeming to steal
insidiously
over her glowing temples, and then
leaving
on her face an almost startling paleness.
Her stature, as she reclined, seemed above the
medium height of womanhood, and her figure
was rather delicate than full, though the little foot
that rested on the damask cushion before her,
displayed a rounded outline that any of her sex
might envy.
Oh! I'm as expert as if I were signal officer
to the lord high admiral of this realm!
exclaimed
the laughing female on the floor, clapping her
hands together in girlish exultation. I do
long, Cecilia, for an opportunity to exhibit my
skill.
While her cousin was speaking, Miss Howard
raised her head, with a faint smile, and as she
turned her eyes towards the other, a spectator
might have been disappointed, but could not
have been displeased, by the unexpected change
the action produced in the expression of her
countenance
.
Instead of the piercing black eyes that
the deep colour of her tresses would lead him to
expect, he would have beheld two large, mild,
blue orbs, that seemed to float in a liquid so pure
as to be nearly invisible, and which were more
remarkable for their tenderness and persuasion,
than for the vivid flashes that darted from the
quick glances of her companion.
The success of your mad excursion to the
seaside, my cousin, has bewildered your brain,
returned Cecilia; but I know not how to
conquer
your disease, unless we prescribe salt-water
for the remedy, as in some other cases of
madness
.
Ah! I am afraid your nostrum would be
useless
,
cried Katherine; it has failed to wash
out the disorder from the sedate Mr. Richard
Barnstable, who has had the regimen
administered
to him through many a hard gale, but who
continues as fair a candidate for bedlam as ever.
Would you think it, Cicely, the crazy-one urged
me, in the ten minutes' conversation we held
together
on the cliffs, to accept of his schooner as
a shower-bath!
I can think that your hardihood might
encourage
him to expect much, but surely he could
not have been serious in such a proposal!
Oh! to do the wretch justice, he did say
something of a chaplain to consecrate the
measure
,
but there was boundless impudence in the
thought. I have not, nor shall I forget it, or
forgive him for it, these six and twenty years.
What a fine time he must have had of it, in his
little Ariel, among the monstrous waves we saw
tumbling in upon the shore to-day, coz! I hope
they will wash his impudence out of him! I do
think the man cannot have had a dry thread
about him, from sun to sun. I must believe it is
a punishment for his boldness, and, be certain, I
shall tell him of it. I will form half a dozen
signals, this instant, to joke at his moist
condition
,
in very revenge.
Pleased with her own thoughts, and buoyant
with the secret hope that her adventurous
undertaking
would be finally crowned with complete
success, the gay girl shook her black locks, in
infinite mirth, and tossed the mimic flags gayly
around her person, as she was busied in forming
new combinations, in order to amuse herself with
her lover's disastrous situation. But the features
of her cousin clouded with the thoughts that were
excited by her remarks, and she replied, in a
tone that bore some little of the accents of
reproach
Katherine! Katherine! can you jest when
there is so much to apprehend! Forget you
what Alice Dunscombe told us of the gale, this
morning! and that she spoke of two vessels, a
ship and a schooner, that had been seen
venturing
with fearful temerity within the shoals, only
six miles from the Abbey, and that unless God in
his gracious providence had been kind to them,
there was but little doubt that their fate would be
a sad one! Can you, that know so well who
and what these daring mariners are, be merry
about the selfsame winds that cause their
danger
?
The laughing maiden was recalled to her
recollection by this remonstrance, and every
trace of mirth vanished from her countenance,
leaving a momentary death-like paleness crossing
her face, as she clasped her hands before her, and
fastened her keen eyes vacantly on the splendid
pieces of silk that now lay unheeded around her.
At this critical moment the door of the room
slowly opened, and Colonel Howard entered the
apartment with an air that displayed a droll
mixture
of stern indignation, with a chivalric and
habitual respect to the sex.
I solicit your pardon, young ladies, for the
interruption, he said; I trust, however, that
an old man's presence can never be entirely
unexpected
in the drawing-room of his wards.
As he bowed, the colonel seated himself on the
end of the couch, opposite to where his niece had
been reclining, for Miss Howard had risen at his
entrance, and continued standing until her uncle
had comfortably disposed of himself. Throwing
a glance, which was not entirely free from
self-commendation
,
around the comfortable
apartment
,
the veteran proceeded, in the same tone as
before
You are not without the means of making
any guest welcome, nor do I see the necessity of
such constant seclusion from the eyes of the world
as you thus rigidly practise.
Cecilia looked timidly at her uncle, with
momentary
surprise, before she returned any
answer
to his remark.
We certainly owe much to your kind
attention
,
dear sir, she at length uttered; but is our
retirement altogether voluntary?
How can it be otherwise! are you not
mistress
of this mansion, madam! In selecting the
residence where yours, and, permit me to add, my
ancestors, so long dwelt, in credit and honour, I
have surely been less governed by any natural
pride that I might well have entertained on such
a subject, than by a desire to consult your
comfort
and happiness. Every thing appears to my
aged eyes as if we ought not to be ashamed to
receive our friends within these walls. The
cloisters of St. Ruth, Miss Howard, are not
entirely
bare, neither are their tenants wholly
unworthy
to be seen.
Open, then, its portals, sir, and your niece
will endeavour to do proper credit to the
hospitality
of its master.
That was spoken like Harry Howard's
daughter, frankly and generously! cried the old
soldier, insensibly edging himself nearer to his
niece. If my brother had devoted himself to
the camp, instead of the sea, Cecilia, he would
have made one of the bravest and ablest generals
in his majesty's servicepoor Harry! he might
have been living at this very day, and at this
moment
leading the victorious troops of his
sovereign
through the revolted colonies in triumph.
But he is gone, Cicely, and has left you behind
him, as his dear representative, to perpetuate our
family, and to possess what little has been left to
us from the ravages of the times.
Surely, dear sir, said Cecilia, taking his
hand, which had unconsciously approached her
person, and pressing it to her lips, we have no
cause to complain of our lot in respect to fortune,
though it may cause us bitter regret that so few of
us are left to enjoy it.
No, no, no, said Katherine, in a low,
hurried
voice; Alice Dunscombe is and must be
wrong; providence would never abandon brave
men to so cruel a fate!
Alice Dunscombe is here to atone for her
error, if she has fallen into one, said a quiet,
subdued voice, in which the accents of a
provincial
dialect, however, were slightly perceptible,
and which, in its low tones, wanted that silvery
clearness that gave so much feminine sweetness
to the words of Miss Howard, and which even
rung melodiously in the ordinarily vivacious
strains of her cousin.
The surprise created by these sudden
interruptions
caused a total suspension of the discourse.
Katherine Plowden, who had continued kneeling,
in the attitude before described, arose, and as she
looked about her in momentary confusion, the
blood again mantled her face with the fresh and
joyous springs of life. The other speaker
advanced
steadily into the middle of the room, and
after returning, with studied civility, the low bow
of Colonel Howard, seated herself in silence on
the opposite couch. The manner of her
entrance
,
her reception, and her attire, sufficiently
denoted that the presence of this female was
neither
unusual nor unwelcome. She was dressed
with marked simplicity, though with a studied
neatness, that more than compensated for the
absence of ornaments. Her age might not have
much exceeded thirty, but there was an adoption
of customs in her attire that indicated she was
not unwilling to be thought older. Her fair
flaxen hair was closely confined by a dark
bandeau
,
such as was worn in a nation farther north
by virgins only, over which a few curls strayed,
in a manner that showed the will of their mistress
alone restrained their luxuriance. Her light
complexion had lost much of its brilliancy, but
enough still remained to assert its original beauty
and clearness. To this description might be
added, fine, mellow blue eyes, beautifully white,
though large teeth, a regular set of features, and
a person that was clad in a dark lead-coloured
silk, which fitted her full, but gracefully moulded
form, with the closest exactness.
Colonel Howard paused a moment, after this
lady was seated, and then turned himself to
Katherine; with an air that became stiff and
constrained
by attempting to seem extremely easy,
he said
You no sooner summon Miss Alice, but she
appears, Miss Plowdenready and (I am bold
to say, Miss Alice) able to defend herself against
all charges that her worst enemies can allege
against her.
I have no charges to make against Miss
Dunscombe, said Katherine, pettishly, nor do
I wish to have dissensions created between me
and my friends, even by Colonel Howard.
Colonel Howard will studiously avoid such
offences in future, said the veteran, bowing; and
turning stiffly to the others, he continuedI
was just conversing with my niece, as you
entered
,
Miss Alice, on the subject of her immuring
herself like one of the veriest nuns who ever
inhabited
these cloisters. I tell her, madam, that
neither her years, nor my fortune, nor, indeed, her
own, for the child of Harry Howard was not left
pennyless, require that we should live as if the
doors of the world were closed against us, or
there was no other entrance to St. Ruth's but
through those antiquated windows. Miss
Plowden
,
I feel it to be my duty to inquire why those
pieces of silk are provided in such an unusual
abundance, and in so extraordinary a shape?
To make a gala dress for the ball you are
about to give, sir, said Katherine, promptly, and
with a saucy smile, that was only checked by the
reproachful glance of her cousin. You have
taste in a lady's attire, Colonel Howard; will not
this bright yellow form a charming relief to my
brown face, while this white and black relieve
one another, and this pink contrasts so sweetly
with black eyes. Will not the whole form a
turban
fit for an empress to wear?
As the arch maiden prattled on in this
unmeaning
manner, her rapid fingers entwined the flags
in a confused maze, which she threw over her
head in a form not unlike the ornament for which
she intimated it was intended. The veteran was
by far too polite to dispute a lady's taste, and he
renewed the dialogue, with his slightly awakened
suspicions completely quieted by her dexterity
and artifice. But although it was not difficult to
deceive Colonel Howard in matters of female
dress, the case was very different with Alice
Dunscombe. This lady gazed, with a steady
eye and reproving countenance, on the
fantastical
turban, until Katherine threw herself by her
side, and endeavoured to lead her attention to
other subjects, by her playful motions and
whispered
questions.
I was observing, Miss Alice, continued the
colonel, that although the times had certainly
inflicted some loss on my estate, yet we were not
so much reduced, as to be unable to receive
our friends in a manner that would not disgrace
the descendants of the ancient possessors of St.
Ruth. Cecilia, here, my brother Harry's
daughter
,
is a young lady that any uncle might be
proud to exhibit, and I would have her, madam,
show your English dames, that we rear no
unworthy
specimens of the parent stock on the
other side of the Atlantic.
You have only to declare your pleasure, my
good uncle, said Miss Howard, and it shall be
executed.
Tell us how we can oblige you, sir,
continued
Katherine, and if it be in any manner that
VOL. I. 12
will relieve the tedium of this dull residence, I
promise you at least one cheerful assistant to your
scheme.
You speak fair, cried the colonel, and like
two discreet and worthy girls! Well, then, our
first step shall be to send a message to Dillon and
the captain, and invite them to attend your
coffee. I see the hour approaches.
Cecilia made no reply, but looked distressed,
and dropped her mild eyes to the carpet; but
Miss Plowden took it upon herself to answer.
Nay, sir, that would be for them to take steps
in the matter; as your proposal was that the first
step should be ours, suppose we all adjourn to
your part of the house, and do the honours of the
tea-table in your drawing-room, instead of our
own. I understand, sir, that you have had an
apartment fitted up for that purpose, in some
style; a woman's taste might aid your designs,
however.
Miss Plowden, I believe I intimated to you,
some time since, said the displeased colonel,
that so long as certain suspicious vessels were
known to hover on this coast, I should desire that
you and Miss Howard would confine yourselves
to this wing.
Do not say that we confine ourselves, said
Katherine, but let it be spoken in plain
English
,
that you confine us here.
Am I a gaoler, madam, that you apply such
epithets to my conduct! Miss Alice must form
strange conclusions of our manners, if she
receive
her impressions from your very singular
remarks. I
All measures adopted from a dread of the
ship and schooner that ran within the Devil's
Grip, yester-eve, may be dispensed with now,
interrupted Miss Dunscombe, in a melancholy,
reflecting tone. There are few living, who know
the dangerous paths that can conduct even the
smallest craft in safety from the land, with daylight
and fair winds; but when darkness and adverse
gales oppose them, the chance for safety lies
wholly in God's kindness.
There is truly much reason to believe they
are lost, returned the veteran, in a voice in
which no exultation was apparent.
They are not lost! exclaimed Katherine,
with startling energy, leaving her seat, and
walking
across the room to join her cousin, with an
air that seemed to elevate her little figure to the
other's height. They are skilful and they are
brave, and what gallant sailors can do, will they
do, and do it successfully; besides, in whose
behalf
would a just Providence sooner exercise its
merciful power, than to protect the daring
children
of an oppressed country, while contending
against tyranny and countless wrongs?
The conciliating disposition of the colonel
deserted him, as he listened. His own black
eyes sparkled with a vividness unusual for his
years, and his courtesy barely permitted the lady
to conclude, ere he broke forth.
What sin, madam, what damning crime,
would sooner call down the just wrath of
Heaven
on the transgressors, than the act of foul
rebellion? It was this crime, madam, that
deluged England in blood in the reign of the
first Charles; it is this crime that has dyed more
fields red than all the rest of man's offences
united; it has been visited on our race, as a
condign
punishment, from the days of the deservedly
devoted Absalom, down to the present time; in
short, it lost heaven for ever to some of the most
glorious of its angels, and there is much reason
to believe that it is the one unpardonable sin,
named in the holy gospels.
I know not that you have authority for
believing
it to be the heavy enormity that you
mention
,
Colonel Howard, said Miss Dunscombe,
anticipating the spirited reply of Katherine, and
willing to avert it; she hesitated an instant, and
then drawing a heavy, shivering sigh, she
continued
,
in a voice that grew softer as she spoke
'tis indeed a crime of magnitude, and one that
throws the common backslidings of our lives,
speaking by comparison, into the sunshine of his
favour. Many there are, who sever the dearest
ties of this life, by madly rushing into its sinful
vortex, for I fain think the heart grows hard with
the sight of human calamity, and becomes callous
to the miseries its owner inflicts; especially where
we act the wrongs on our own kith and kin,
regardless who or how many that are dear to
us suffer by our evil deeds. It is, besides,
Colonel Howard, a dangerous temptation, to one
little practised in the great world, to find himself
suddenly elevated into the seat of power; and if
it do not lead to the commission of great crimes,
it surely prepares the way to it, by hardening the
heart.
I hear you patiently, Miss Alice, said
Katherine
,
dancing her little foot, in affected
coolness
,
for you neither know of whom nor to
whom you speak. But Colonel Howard has not
that apology. Peace, Cecilia, for I must speak!
Believe them not, dear girl; there is not a wet
hair on their heads. For you, Colonel Howard,
who must recollect that the sister's son of the
mothers of both your niece and myself is on
board that frigate, there is an appearance of
cruelty
in using such language.
I pity the boy! from my soul I pity him!
exclaimed the veteran; he is a child, and has
followed the current that is sweeping our unhappy
colonies down the tide of destruction. But
there are others in that vessel, who have no
excuse
of ignorance to offer. There is a son of
my old acquaintance, and the bosom friend of my
brother Harry, Cecilia's father, dashing Hugh
Griffith, as we called him. The urchins left
home together, and were rated on board one of
his majesty's vessels on the same day. Poor
Harry lived to carry a broad pennant in the
service
,
and Hugh died in command of a frigate.
This boy, too! he was nurtured on board his
father's vessel, and learned, from his majesty's
discipline, how to turn his arms against his king.
There is something shockingly unnatural in that
circumstance, Miss Alice; 'tis like the child
inflicting
a blow on the parent. 'Tis such men as
these, with Washington at their head, who
maintain
the bold front this rebellion wears.
There are men, who have never worn the
servile livery of Britain, sir, whose names are as
fondly cherished in America as any that she
boasts of, said Katherine, proudly; ay, sir,
and those who would gladly oppose the bravest
officers in the British fleet.
I contend not against your misguided
reason
,
said Colonel Howard, rising with cool
respect. A young lady who ventures to
compare
rebels with gallant gentlemen engaged
in their duty to their prince, cannot but be
subjected to the imputation of possessing a
misguided
reason. No manI speak not of
women
,
who cannot be supposed so well versed in
human naturebut no man, who has reached the
time of life that entitles him to be called by that
name, can consort with these disorganizers, who
would destroy every thing that is sacredthese
12*
levellers, who would pull down the great, to exalt
the littlethese jacobites, whowho
Nay, sir, if you are at a loss for opprobrious
epithets, said Katherine, with provoking
coolness
,
call on Mr. Christopher Dillon for
assistance
;
he waits your pleasure at the door.
Colonel Howard turned in amazement,
forgetting
his angry declamations at this unexpected
intelligence, and beheld in reality the sombre
visage of his kinsman, who stood holding the
door in his hand, apparently as much surprised
at finding himself in the presence of the ladies,
as they themselves could be at his unusual visit.
CHAPTER XI.
Poithee, Kate, let's stand aside, and see the end of this controversy.
Shakspeare
.
During
the warm discussions of the preceding
chapter, Miss Howard had bowed her pale face
to the arm of the couch, and sate an unwilling and
distressed listener to the controversy; but now that
another, and one whom she thought an
unauthorized
intruder on her privacy, was announced, she
asserted the dignity of her sex as proudly, though
with something more of discretion, than her
cousin
could possibly have done. Rising from her
seat, she inquired, with cool but delicate
reserve
To what are we indebted for so unexpected a
visit from Mr. Dillon? Surely he must know
that we are prohibited going to the part of the
dwelling where he resides, and I trust Colonel
Howard will tell him that common justice requires
we should be permitted to be private.
The gentleman replied, in a manner in which
malignant anger was sufficiently mingled with
calculating humility
Miss Howard will think better of my
intrusion
,
when she knows that I come on business of
importance to her uncle.
Ah! that may alter the case, Kit; but the
ladies
must have the respect that is due to their sex.
I forgot, somehow, to have myself announced;
but that Borroughcliffe leads me deeper into my
Madeira than I have been accustomed to go,
since the time when my poor brother Harry,
with his worthy friend, Hugh Griffiththe devil
seize Hugh Griffith, and all his raceyour
pardon
,
Miss Alice. What is your business with
me, Mr. Dillon?
I bear a message from Captain
Borroughcliffe
.
You may remember that, according to
your suggestions, the sentinels were to be changed
every night, sir.
Ay! ay! we practised that in our campaign
against Montcalm; 'twas necessary to avoid the
murders of their Indians, who were sure, Miss
Alice, to shoot down a man at his post, if he
were placed two nights running in the same
place.
Well, sir, your prudent precautions have not
been thrown away, continued Dillon, moving
farther into the apartment, as if he felt himself
becoming a more welcome guest as he proceeded;
the consequences are, that we have already
made three prisoners.
Truly it has been a most politic scheme!
exclaimed Katherine Plowden, with infinite
contempt
.
I suppose, as Mr. Christopher Dillon
applauds it so highly, that it has some
communion
with the law! and that the redoubtable
garrison
of St. Ruth are about to reap the high
glory of being most successful thief-takers!
The sallow face of Dillon actually became
livid as he replied, and his whole frame shook with
the rage that he vainly endeavoured to suppress.
There may be a closer communion with the
law, and its ministers, perhaps, than Miss
Plowden
can desire, he said; for rebellion seldom
finds favour in any Christian code.
Rebellion! exclaimed the colonel; and
what has this detention of three vagabonds to do
with rebellion, Kit? Has the damnable poison
found its way across the Atlantic?your pardon,
Miss Alicebut this is a subject on which you can
feel with me; I have heard your sentiments on the
allegiance due to our anointed sovereign. Speak,
Mr. Dillon, are we surrounded by another set of
demons! if so, we must give ourselves to the
work, and rally round our prince; for this island
is the main pillar of his throne.
I cannot say that there is any appearance, at
present, of an intention to rise in this island,
said Dillon, with demure gravity; though the
riots in London warrant any precautionary
measures
on the part of his majesty's ministers, even
to a suspension of the habeas corpus. But you
have had your suspicions concerning two certain
vessels that have been threatening the coast, for
several days past, in a most piratical manner?
The little foot of Katherine played rapidly on
the splendid carpet, but she contented herself
with bestowing a glance of the most sovereign
contempt on the speaker, as if she disdained any
further reply. With the colonel, however, this was
touching a theme that lay nearest his heart, and
he answered, in a manner worthy of the
importance
of the subject
You speak like a sensible man, and a loyal
subject, Mr. Dillon. The habeas corpus, Miss
Alice, was obtained in the reign of King John,
along with magna charta, for the security of the
throne, by his majesty's barons; some of my own
blood were of the number, which alone would
be a pledge that the dignity of the crown was
properly consulted. As to our piratical
countrymen
,
Christopher, there is much reason to
think that the vengeance of an offended
Providence
has already reached them. Those who
know the coast well, tell me that without a better
pilot than an enemy would be likely to procure,
it would be impossible for any vessels to escape
the shoals among which they entered, on a dark
night, and with an adverse gale; the morning
has arrived, and they are not to be seen!
But be they friends or be they enemies, sir,
continued Dillon, respectfully, there is much
reason to think that we have now in the Abbey
those who can tell us something of their true
character
;
for the men we have detained carry with
them the appearance of having just landed, and
wear not only the dress but the air of seamen.
Of seamen! echoed Katherine, a deadly
paleness chasing from her cheeks the bloom
which indignation had heightened.
Of seamen, Miss Plowden, repeated Dillon,
with malignant satisfaction, but concealing it
under
an air of submissive respect.
I thank you, sir, for so gentle a term,
replied
the young lady, recollecting herself, and
recovering her presence of mind in the same
instant
;
the imagination of Mr. Dillon is so apt
to conjure the worst, that he is entitled to our
praise for so far humouring our weaknesses, as
not to alarm us with the apprehensions of their
being pirates.
Nay, madam, they may yet deserve that
name, returned the other, coolly; but my
education has instructed me to hear the testimony
before I pronounce sentence.
Ah! that the boy has found in his Coke upon
Littleton, cried the colonel; the law is a
salutary
corrective to human infirmities, Miss Alic,
and, among other things, it teaches patience to a
hasty temperament. But for this cursed,
unnatural
rebellion, madam, the young man would, at
this moment, have been diffusing its blessings
from a judicial chair, in one of the colonies, ay!
and I pledge myself, to all alike, black and white,
red and yellow, with such proper distinctions as
nature has made between the officer and the
private
.
Keep a good heart, kinsman; we shall
yet find a time! the royal arms have many hands,
and things look better at the last advices. But,
come, we will proceed to the guard-room, and
put these stragglers to the question; runaways,
I'll venture to predict, from one of his majesty's
cruisers, or, perhaps, honest subjects engaged in
supplying the service with men. Come, Kit,
come, let us go, and
Are we, then, to lose the company of
Colonel
Howard so soon? said Katherine, advancing
to her guardian, with an air of blandishment and
pleasantry. I know that he too soon forgets
the hasty language of our little disputes, to part
in anger, if, indeed, he will even quit us till he
has tasted of our coffee.
The veteran turned to the speaker of this
unexpected
address, and listened with profound
attention
.
When she had done, he replied, with a
good deal of courtesy, if not of softness in his
tones
Ah! provoking one! you know me too well
to doubt my forgiveness; but duty must be
attended
to, though even a young lady's smiles
tempt me to remain. Yes, yes, child, you, too,
are the daughter of a very brave and worthy
seaman; but you carry your attachment to that
profession too far, Miss Plowdenyou do,
indeed
you do.
Katherine might have faintly blushed, but the
slight smile which mingled with the expression of
her shame gave to her countenance a look of
additional
archness, and she laid her hand lightly
on the sleeve of her guardian, to detain him, as
she replied
Yet why leave us, Colonel Howard? It is
long since we have seen you in the cloisters, and
you know you come as a father; tarry, and you
may yet add confessor to the title.
I know thy sins already, girl, said the
worthy
colonel, unconsciously yielding to her gentle
efforts to lead him back to his seat; they are,
deadly rebellion in your heart to your prince,
a most inveterate propensity to salt-water, and a
great disrespect to the advice and wishes of an
old fellow whom your father's will and the laws
have made the guardian of your person and
fortune
.
Nay, say not the last, dear sir, cried
Katherine
;
for there is not a syllable you have ever
said to me, on that foolish subject, that I have
forgotten. Will you resume your seat again?
Cecilia, Colonel Howard consents to take his
coffee with us.
But you forget the three men, honest Kit,
there, and our respectable guest, Captain
Borroughcliffe
.
Let honest Kit stay there, if he please; you
may send a request to Captain Borroughcliffe
to join our party; I have a woman's curiosity to
see the soldier; and as for the three men she
paused, and affected to muse a moment, when she
continued, as if stricken by an obvious thought
Yes, and the men can be brought in, and
examined
here; who knows but they may have been
wrecked in the gale, and need our pity and
assistance
,
rather than deserve your suspicions.
There is a solemn warning in Miss
Plowden's
conjecture, that should come home to the
breasts of all who live on this wild coast, said
Alice Dunscombe; I have known many a sad
wreck among the hidden shoals, and when the
wind has blown but a gentle gale, compared to
last night's tempest. The wars, and the
uncertainties
of the times, together with man's own
wicked passions, have made great havoc with
those who knew well the windings of the
channels
among the Ripples. Some there were who
could pass, as I have often heard, within a fearful
distance of the Devil's-Grip, the darkest night
that ever shadowed England; but all are now
gone, of that daring set, either by the hand of
death, or, what is even as mournful, by unnatural
banishment from the land of their fathers.
This war has then probably drawn off most of
them, for your recollections must be quite recent,
Miss Alice, said the veteran; as many of them
were engaged in the business of robbing his
majesty's
revenue, the country is in some measure
requited for their former depredations, by their
present services, and at the same time it is
happily
rid of their presence. Ah! madam, ours is
a glorious constitution, where things are so nicely
balanced, that, as in that of a healthy, vigorous
man, the baser parts are purified in the course
of things, by its own wholesome struggles.
The pale features of Alice Dunscombe became
slightly tinged with red, as the colonel proceeded,
nor did the faint glow entirely leave her pallid
face, until she had said
There might have been some who knew not
how to respect the laws of the land, for such are
never wanting; but there were others, who,
however
guilty they might be in many respects, need
not charge themselves with that mean crime, and
VOL. I. 13
yet who could find the passages that lie hid from
common eyes, beneath the rude waves, as well as
you could find the way through the halls and
galleries of the Abbey, with a noonday sun
shining
upon its vanes and high chimneys.
Is it your pleasure, Colonel Howard, that we
examine the three men, and ascertain whether
they belong to the number of these gifted pilots?
said Christopher Dillon, who was growing
uneasy
at his awkward situation, and who hardly
deemed it necessary to conceal the look of
contempt
which he cast at the mild Alice, while he
spoke; perhaps we may gather information
enough from them, to draw a chart of the coast,
that may gain us credit with my lords of the
Admiralty
.
This unprovoked attack on their unresisting
and unoffending guest, brought the rich blood to
the very temples of Miss Howard, who rose, and
addressed herself to her kinsman, with a manner
that could not easily be mistaken, any more than
it could be condemned
If Mr. Dillon will comply with the wishes of
Colonel Howard, as my cousin has expressed
them, we shall not, at least, have to accuse
ourselves
of unnecessarily detaining men who
probably
are more unfortunate than guilty.
When she concluded, Cecilia walked across
the apartment, and took a seat by the side of
Alice Dunscombe, with whom she began to
converse
,
in a low, soothing tone of voice. Mr.
Dillon bowed with a deprecating humility, and
having ascertained that Colonel Howard chose to
give an audience, where he sate, to the prisoners,
he withdrew to execute his mission, secretly
exulting
at any change that promised to lead to a
renewal of an intercourse that might terminate
more to his advantage, than the lofty beauty
whose favour he courted, was, at present,
disposed
to concede.
Christopher is a worthy, serviceable, good
fellow, said the colonel, when the door closed,
and I hope to live, yet, to see him clad in
ermine
;
I would not be understood literally, but
figuratively, for furs would but ill comport with
the climate of the Carolinas. I trust I am to be
consulted by his majesty's ministers when the
new appointments shall be made for the subdued
colonies, and he may safely rely on my good
word being spoken in his favour. Would he not
make an excellent and independent ornament of
the bench, Miss Plowden?
Katherine compressed her lips a little, as she
replied
I must profit by his own discreet rules, and
see testimony to that effect, before I decide, sir.
But listen! The young lady's colour changed
rapidly, and her eyes became fixed in a sort of
feverish gaze on the door. He has at least
been active; I hear the heavy tread of men
already
approaching.
Ah! it is he certainly; justice ought always
to be prompt as well as certain, to make it perfect;
like a drum-head court-martial, which, by the
way, is as summary a sort of government as
heart could wish to live under. If his majesty's
ministers could be persuaded to introduce into the
revolted colonies
Listen! interrupted Katherine, in a voice
which bespoke her deep anxiety; they draw
near!
The sound of footsteps was in fact now so
audible as to induce the colonel to suspend the
delivery of his plan for governing the recovered
provinces. The long, low gallery, which was
paved with a stone flagging, soon brought the
footsteps of the approaching party more distinctly
to their ears, and a low tap at the door presently
announced their arrival. Colonel Howard arose,
with the air of one who was to sustain the
principal
character in the ensuing interview, and bade
them enter. Cecilia and Alice Dunscombe merely
cast careless looks at the opening door,
indifferent
to the scene; but the quick eye of
Katherine
embraced, at a glance, every figure in the
group. Drawing a long, quivering breath, she
fell back on the couch, and her eyes again
lighted with their playful expression, as she
hummed
a low, rapid air, with a voice in which
even the suppressed tones were liquid melody.
Dillon entered, preceding the soldier, whose
gait had become more steady, and in whose rigid
eye a thoughtful expression had taken the place
of its former vacant gaze. In short, something
had manifestly restored to him a more complete
command of his mental powers, although he might
not have been absolutely sobered. The rest of
the party continued in the gallery, while Mr.
Dillon
presented the renovated captain to the
colonel
,
when the latter did him the same kind office
with the ladies.
Miss Plowden, said the veteran, for she
offered
first in the circle, this is my friend,
Captain
Borroughcliffe; he has long been ambitious
of this honour, and I have no doubt his
reception
will be such as to leave him no cause to
repent
he has been at last successful.
Katherine smiled, and answered, with
ambiguous
emphasis
I know not how to thank him, sufficiently, for
the care he has bestowed on our poor persons.
The soldier looked steadily at her, for a
moment
,
with an eye that seemed to threaten a
retaliation
in kind, ere he replied
One of those smiles, madam, would be an
ample compensation for services that are more
real than such as exist only in intention.
Katherine bowed with more complacency than
she usually bestowed on those who wore his dress,
and they proceeded to the next.
This is Miss Alice Dunscombe, Captain
Borroughcliffe
,
daughter of a very worthy
clergyman
who was formerly the curate of this parish,
and a lady who does us the pleasure of giving us
a good deal of her society, though far less than
we all wish for.
The captain returned the civil inclination of
Alice, and the colonel proceeded.
Miss Howard, allow me to present Captain
Borroughcliffe, a gentleman who, having
volunteered
to defend St. Ruth in these critical times,
merits all the favour of its mistress.
Cecilia gracefully rose, and received her guest
with sweet complacency. The soldier made no
reply to the customary compliments that she
uttered
,
but stood an instant gazing at her speaking
countenance, and then, laying his hand
involuntarily
on his breast, bowed nearly to his
sword-hilt
.
These formalities duly observed, the colonel
declared his readiness to receive the prisoners.
As the door was opened by Dillon, Katherine cast
a cool and steady look at the strangers, and
beheld
the light glancing along the arms of the
soldiers
who guarded them. But the seamen
entered
alone; while the rattling of arms, and the
heavy dash of the muskets on the stone pavement,
announced that it was thought prudent to retain a
force at hand, to watch these secret intruders on
the grounds of the abbey.
13*
CHAPTER XII.
Food for powder; they'll fill a pit as well as better.
Falstaff
.
The
three men, who now entered the
apartment
,
appeared to be nothing daunted by the
presence into which they were ushered, though
clad in the coarse and weather-beaten vestments
of seamen who had been exposed to recent and
severe duty. They silently obeyed the
direction
of the soldier's finger, and took their stations
in a distant corner of the room, like men who
knew the deference due to rank, at the same time
that the habits of their lives had long
accustomed
them to encounter the vicissitudes of the
world. With this slight preparation, Colonel
Howard began the business of examination.
I trust ye are all good and loyal subjects,
the veteran commenced, with a considerate
respect
for innocence, but the times are such that
even the most worthy characters become liable to
suspicion; and, consequently, if our
apprehensions
of you should prove erroneous, you must
overlook the mistake, and attribute it to the
awful
condition into which nebellion has plunged this
empire. We have much reason to fear that some
project is about to be undertaken on the coast
by the enemy, as he has appeared, we know, with
a frigate and schooner; and the audacity of the
rebels is only equalled by their shameless and
wicked disrespect for the rights of the sovereign.
While Colonel Howard was uttering his
apologetic
preamble, the prisoners fastened their
eyes on him with much interest; but when he
alluded to the apprehended attack, the gaze of
two of them became more keenly attentive, and,
when concluded, they exchanged furtive glances
of deep meaning. No reply was made, however,
and after a short pause, as if to allow time for
his words to make a proper impression, the
veteran
continued
We have no evidence, I understand, that you
are in the smallest degree connected with the
enemies of this country; but as you have been
found out of the king's highway, or, rather, on a
by-path, which I must confess is frequently used by
the people of the neighbourhood, but which is
nevertheless nothing but a by-path, it becomes
no more than what self-preservation requires of
us, to ask you a few such questions as I trust will
be satisfactorily answered. To use your own
nautical phrases, `from whence came ye, pray?'
and `whither are ye bound?'
A low, deep voice replied
From Sunderland, last, and bound, over-land,
to Whitehaven.
This simple and direct answer was hardly
given, before the attention of the listeners was
called to Alice Dunscombe, who uttered a faint
shriek, and rose from her seat involuntarily,
while her eyes seemed to roll fearfully, and
perhaps
a little wildly, round the room.
Are you ill, Miss Alice? said the sweet,
soothing tones of Cecilia Howard; you are,
indeed you are; lean on me, that I may lead
you to your apartment.
Did you hear it, or was it only fancy! she
answered, her cheek blanched to the whiteness of
death, and her whole frame shuddering as if in
convulsions; say, did you hear it too?
I have heard nothing but the voice of my
uncle, who is standing near you, anxious, as we
all are, for your recovery from this dreadful
agitation
.
Alice still gazed wildly from face to face. Her
eye did not rest satisfied with dwelling on those
who surrounded her, but surveyed, with a sort of
frantic eagerness, the figures and appearance of
the three men, who stood in humble patience, the
silent and unmoved witnesses of this
extraordinary
scene. At length she veiled her eyes with
both her hands, as if to shut out some horrid
vision
,
and then removing them, she smiled
languidly
,
as she signed for Cecilia to assist her
from the room. To the polite and assiduous
offers of the gentlemen, she returned no other
thanks than those conveyed in her looks and
gestures
;
but when the sentinels who paced the
gallery
were passed, and the ladies were alone, she
breathed a long, shivering sigh, and found an
utterance.
'Twas like a voice from the silent grave!
she said, but it could be no more than mockery.
No, no, 'tis a just punishment for letting the
image of the creature fill the place that should be
occupied only with the Creator. Ah! Miss
Howard, Miss Plowden, ye are both youngin
the pride of your beauty and lovelinessbut
little do ye know, and less do ye dread, the
temptations
and errors of a sinful world.
Her thoughts wander! whispered Katherine,
with anxious tenderness; some awful calamity
has affected her intellects!
Yes, it must be that my sinful thoughts have
wandered, and conjured sounds that it would have
been dreadful to have heard in truth, and within
these walls, said Alice, more composedly,
smiling
with a ghastly expression, as she gazed on
the two beautifully solicitous maidens who
supported
her yielding person. But the moment
of weakness is passed, and I am better; aid me
to my room, and return, that you may not
interrupt
the reviving harmony between you and
Colonel Howard. I am now better, nay, I am
quite restored.
Say not so, dear Miss Alice, returned
Cecilia
;
your face denies what your kindness to us
induces you to utter; ill, very ill, you are, nor
shall even your own commands induce me to
leave you.
Remain, then, said Miss Dunscombe,
bestowing
a look of grateful affection on her
lovely
supporter; and while our Katherine returns
to the drawing-room, to give the gentlemen their
coffee, you shall continue with me, as my gentle
nurse.
By this time they had gained the apartment,
and Katherine, after assisting her cousin to place
Alice on her bed, returned to do the honours of
the drawing-room.
Colonel Howard ceased his examination of the
prisoners at her entrance, to inquire, with courtly
solicitude, after the invalid; and, when his
questions
were answered, he again proceeded, as
follows
This is what the lads would call plain-sailing,
Borroughcliffe; they are out of employment in
Sunderland, and have acquaintances and relatives
in Whitehaven, to whom they are going for
assistance
and labour. All very probable, and
perfectly
harmless.
Nothing more so, my respectable host,
returned
the jocund soldier; but it seemeth a
grievous misfortune that a trio of such flesh and
blood should need work wherewithal to exercise
their thews and sinews, while so many of the
vessels of his majesty's fleet navigate the ocean
in quest of the enemies of old England.
There is truth in that; much truth in your
remark, cried the colonel. What say you, my
lads, will you fight the Frenchman and the Don,
ay! and even my own rebellious and infatuated
countrymen? Nay, by heaven, it is not a trifle
that shall prevent his majesty from possessing
the services of three such heroes. Here are five
guineas a-piece for you the moment that you put
foot on board the Alacrity cutter; and that can
easily be done, as she lies at anchor this very
night, only two short leagues to the south of this,
in a small port, where she is riding out the gale
as snugly as if she were in a corner of this
room.
One of the men affected to gaze at the money
with longing eyes, while he asked, as if weighing
the terms of the engagement
Whether the Alacrity was called a good
sea-boat
,
and was thought to give a comfortable
birth to her crew?
Comfortable! echoed Borroughcliffe; for
that matter, she is called the bravest cutter in the
navy. You have seen much of the world, I dare
say; did you ever see such a place as the marine
arsenal at Carthagena, in old Spain?
Indeed I have, sir, returned the seaman, in
a cool, collected tone.
Ah! you have! well, did you ever meet with a
house in Paris that they call the Thuilleries?
because
it's a dog-kennel to the Alacrity.
I have even fallen in with the place you
mention
,
sir, returned the sailor; and must own
the birth quite good enough for such as I am, if
it tallies with your description.
The deuce take these blue-jackets, muttered
Borroughcliffe, addressing himself unconsciously
to Miss Plowden, near whom he happened to be
at the time; they run their tarry countenances
into all the corners of the earth, and abridge a
man most lamentably in his comparisons. Now,
who the devil would have thought that fellow had
ever put his sea-green eyes on the palace of King
Louis!
Katherine heeded not his speech, but sat eyeing
the group of prisoners with a confused and
wavering
expression of countenance, while Colonel
Howard renewed the discourse, by exclaiming
Come, come, Borroughcliffe, let us give the
lads no tales for a recruit, but good, plain, honest
EnglishGod bless the language, and the land
for which it was first made, too. There is no
necessity to tell these men, if they are, what they
seem to be, practical seamen, that a cutter of ten
guns contains all the room and accommodation of
a palace.
Do you allow nothing for English oak and
English comfort, mine host, said the immovable
captain; do you think, good sir, that I
measure
fitness and propriety by square and compass,
as if I were planning Solomon's temple anew!
All I mean to say is, that the Alacrity is a vessel
of singular compactness and magical
arrangement
of room. Like the tent of that
handsome
brother of the fairy, in the Arabian Nights,
she is big or she is little, as occasion needeth;
and now, hang me, if I don't think I have uttered
more in her favour than her commander would
say to help me to a recruit, though no lad in the
three kingdoms should appear willing to try how
a scarlet coat would suit his boorish figure.
That time has not yet arrived, and God
forbid
that it ever should, while the monarch needs
a soldier in the field to protect his rights. But
what say ye, my men? you have heard the
recommendation
that Captain Borroughcliffe has
given of the Alacrity, which is altogether true
after making some allowances for language.
Will ye serve? shall I order you a cheering glass
a man, and lay by the gold, till I hear from the
cutter that you are enrolled under the banners of
the best of kings?
Katherine Plowden, who hardly seemed to
breathe, so close and intent was the interest with
which she regarded the seamen, fancied she
observed
lurking smiles on their faces; but if her
conjecture were true, their disposition to be merry
went no farther, and the one who had spoken
hitherto, replied, in the same calm manner as
before
You will excuse us, if we decline shipping
in the cutter, sir; we are used to distant voyages
and large vessels, whereas the Alacrity is kept at
coast duty, and is not of a size to lay herself
alongside of a Don or a Frenchman with a
double
row of teeth.
If you prefer that sort of sport, you must to
the right-about for Yarmouth; there you will
find ships that will meet any thing that swims,
said the colonel.
Perhaps the gentlemen would prefer
abandoning
the cares and dangers of the ocean for a
life of ease and gayety, said the captain. The
hand that has long dallied with a marlinspike may
be easily made to feel a trigger, as gracefully as a
lady touches the keys of her piano. In short, there
is and there is not a great resemblance between the
life of a sailor and that of a soldier. There are
no gales of wind, or short-allowances, or reefing
topsails, or shipwrecks, among soldiersand at
the same time, there is just as much, or even more
grog-drinking, jollifying, care-killing fun around
a canteen and an open knapsack, as there is on
the end of a mess-chest, with a full can and a
Saturday night's breeze. I have crossed the
ocean several times, and I must own that a ship,
in good weather, is very much the same as a
camp or comfortable barracks.
We have no doubt that all you say is true,
sir, observed the spokesman of the three; but
what to you may seem a hardship, to us is
pleasure
.
We have faced too many a gale to mind a
cap-full of wind, and should think ourselves
always
in the calm latitudes, in one of your
barracks
,
where there is nothing to do but to eat our
grub, and to march a little fore and aft a small
piece of green earth. We hardly know one end
of a musket from the other.
No! said Borroughcliffe, musing; and then
advancing with a quick step towards them, he
cried, in a spirited mannerattention! right
dress!
The speaker, and the seaman next him, gazed
at the captain in silent wonder; but the third
individual
of the party, who had drawn himself a
little aside, as if willing to be unnoticed, or perhaps
pondering on his condition, involuntarily
started
at this unexpected order, and erecting himself,
threw his head to the right, as promptly as if he
had been on a parade ground.
Oho! ye are apt scholars, gentlemen, and
ye can learn, I see, continued Borroughcliffe.
I feel it to be proper that I detain this man till
Vol. I. 14
to-morrow morning, Colonel Howard, and yet I
would give them better quarters than the hard
benches of the guard-room.
Act your pleasure, Captain Borroughcliffe,
returned the host, so you do but your duty to
our royal master. They shall not want for
cheer, and they can have a room over the
servants'
offices in the south side of the Abbey.
Three rooms, my colonel, three rooms must
be provided, though I give up my own.
There are several small empty apartments
there, where blankets might be taken, and the
men placed for safe keeping, if you deem it
necessary
;
though, to me, they seem like good, loyal
tars, whose greatest glory it would be to serve their
prince, and whose principal pleasure would
consist
in getting alongside of a Don or a Monsieur.
We shall discuss these matters anon, said
Borroughcliffe, dryly. I see Miss Plowden
begins to look grave at our abusing her patience
so long, and I know that cold coffee is, like
withered
love, but a tasteless sort of a beverage.
Come, gentlemen, en avant! you have seen the
Thuilleries, and must have heard a little French.
Mr. Christopher Dillon, know you where these
three small apartments are `situate, lying, and
beings,' as your parchments read.
I do, sir, said the complying lawyer, and
shall take much pleasure in guiding you to them.
I think your decision that of a prudent and
sagacious
officer, and much doubt whether Durham
Castle, or some other fortress, will be thought too
big to hold them, ere long.
As this speech was uttered while the men were
passing from the room, its effect on them was
unnoticed
;
but Katherine Plowden, who was left
for a few moments by herself, sat and pondered
over what she had seen and heard, with a
thoughtfulness of manner that was not usual to
her gay and buoyant spirits. The sounds of
the retiring footsteps, however, gradually grew
fainter, and the return of her guardian alone,
recalled the recollection of the young lady to
the duties of her situation.
While engaged in the little offices of the
tea-table
,
Katherine threw many furtive glances at the
veteran; but, although he seemed to be musing,
there was nothing austere or suspicious in his
frank, open countenance.
There is much useless trouble taken with
these wandering seamen, sir, said Katherine, at
length; it seems to be the particular province
of Mr. Christopher Dillon, to make all that come
in contact with him excessively uncomfortable.
And what has Kit to do with the detention of
the men?
What! why, has he not undertaken to stand
godfather to their prisons?by my woman's
patience
,
I think, Colonel Howard, this business
will gain a pretty addition to the names of St.
Ruth. It is already called a house, an abbey, a
place, and by some a castle; let Mr. Dillon have
his way for a month, and it will add gaol to the
number.
Kit is not so happy as to possess the favour
of Miss Plowden; but still Kit is a worthy fellow,
and a good fellow, and a sensible fellow, ay! and
what is of more value than all these put together,
Miss Katherine, Mr. Christopher Dillon is a
faithful and loyal subject to his prince. His
mother was my cousin-german, madam, and I
cannot say how soon I may call him my nephew.
The Dillons are of good Irish extraction, and I
believe that even Miss Plowden will admit that
the Howards have some pretensions to a name.
Ah! it is those very things called names that
I most allude to, said Katherine, quickly. But
an hour since, you were indignant, my dear
guardian, because you suspected that I insinuated
you ought to write gaoler behind the name of
Howard, and even now you submit to have
the office palmed upon you.
You forget, Miss Katherine Plowden, that it
is the pleasure of one of his majesty's officers to
detain these men.
But I thought that the glorious British
constitution
,
which you so often mention,
interrupted
the young lady, spiritedly, gives liberty to all
who touch these blessed shores; you know, sir, that
out of twenty blacks that you brought with you,
how few remain; the rest having fled on the wings
of the spirit of British liberty!
This was touching a festering sore in the
colonel's
feelings, and his provoking ward well knew
the effect her observation was likely to produce.
Her guardian did not break forth in a violent
burst of rage, or furnish those manifestations of
his ire that he was wont to do on less important
subjects, but he arose, with all his dignity
concentred
in a look, and, after making a violent
effort to restrain his feelings within the bounds
necessary to preserve the decorum of his exit, he
ventured a reply.
That the British constitution is glorious,
madam, is most true. That this island is the sole
refuge where liberty has been able to find a
home, is also true. The tyranny and
oppression
of the Congress, which are grinding
down the colonies to the powder of desolation
and poverty, are not worthy of the sacred name.
Rebellion pollutes all that it touches, madam.
Although it often commences under the sanction
of holy liberty, it ever terminates in despotism.
The annuals of the world, from the time of the
Greeks and Romans down to the present day,
abundantly prove it. There was that Julius
Csar
he was one of your people's men, and he
ended a tyrant. Oliver Cromwell was another
a rebel, a demagogue, and a tyrant. The
gradations
,
madam, are as inevitable as from
childhood
to youth, and from youth to age. As for
the little affair that you have been pleased to
mention, of theof theof my private concerns,
I can only say that the affairs of nations are not
to be judged of by domestic incidents, any more
than domestic occurrences are to be judged of
by national politics. The colonel, like many a
better logician, mistook his antithesis for
argument
,
and paused a moment to admire his own
eloquence; but the current of his thoughts,
which always flowed in torrents on this subject,
swept him along in its course, and he continued
Yes, madam, here, and here alone is true liberty
to be found. With this solemn asseveration, which
is not lightly made, but which is the result of
sixty years' experience, I leave you, Miss
Plowden
;
let it be a subject of deep reflection with
you, for I too well understand your treacherous
feelings not to know that your political errors
encourage you in your personal foibles; reflect,
for your own sake, if you love not only your
own happiness, but your respectability and
standing
in the world. As for the black hounds that
you spoke of, they are a set of rebellious,
mutinous
,
ungrateful rascals; and if ever I meet one
of the damned
The colonel had so far controlled his feelings,
as to leave the presence of the lady before he
broke out into the bitter invectives we have
recorded
,
and Katherine stood a minute, pressing
her forefinger on her lips, listening to his voice
as it grumbled along the gallery, until the
sounds were finally excluded by the closing of a
14*
distant door. The wilful girl then shook her
dark locks, and a smile of arch mischief,
blended
with an expression of regret, in her
countenance
,
as she spoke to herself, while with hurried
hands she threw her tea-equipage aside in a
confused
pile
It was perhaps a cruel experiment, but it has
succeeded. Though prisoners ourselves, we are
at least left free for the remainder of this night.
These mysterious sailors must be examined more
closely. If the proud eye of Edward Griffith
was not glaring under the black wig of one of
them, I am no judge of features; and where has
Master Barnstable concealed his charming
visage
!
for neither of the others could be he.
But now for Cecilia.
Her light form glided from the room, while
she was yet speaking, and flitting along the
dimly lighted passages, it disappeared in one of
those turnings that led to the more secret
apartments
of the abbey.
CHAPTER XIII.
How! Lucia, would'st thou have me sink away
In pleasing dreams, and lose myself in love
Cate
.
The
reader must not imagine that the world
stood still during the occurrence of the scenes we
have related. By the time the three seamen
were placed in as many different rooms, and a
sentinel was stationed in the gallery common to
them all, in such a manner as to keep an eye on
his whole charge at once, the hour had run deep
into the night. Captain Borroughcliffe obeyed a
summons from the colonel, who made him an
evasive apology for the change in their evening's
amusement, and challenged his guest to a
renewal
of the attack on the Madeira. This was
too grateful a theme to be lightly discussed by
the captain, and the abbey clock had given forth
as many of its mournful remonstrances as the
division
of the hours would permit, before they
separated
.
In the mean time, Mr. Dillon became
invisible; though a servant, when questioned by
the host on the subject, announced, that he
believed
Mr. Christopher had chosen to ride over to
, to be in readiness to join the hunt, on
the morning, with the dawn. While the
gentlemen
were thus indulging themselves in the dining
parlour, and laughing over the tales of other
times and hard campaigns, two very different
scenes occurred in other parts of the building.
When the quite of the abbey was only
interrupted
by the howling of the wind, or by the
loud and prolonged laughs which echoed through
the passages from the joyous pair, who were thus
comfortably established by the side of the bottle,
a door was gently opened on one of the galleries
of the cloisters, and Katherine Plowden issued
from it, wrapped in a close mantle, and holding
in her hand a chamber lamp, which threw its dim
light faintly along the gloomy walls in front,
leaving all behind her obscured in darkness.
She was, however, soon followed by two other
female figures, clad in the same manner, and
provided
with similar lights. When all were in the
gallery, Katherine drew the door softly to, and
proceeded in front to lead the way.
Hist! said the low, tremulous voice of
Cecilia
,
they are yet up in the other parts of the
house; and if it be as you suspect, our visit
would betray them, and prove the means of their
certain destruction.
Is the laugh of Colonel Howard in his cups
so singular and unknown to your ear, Cecilia,
that you know it not? said Katherine with a
little spirit; or do you forget that on such
occasions
he seldom leaves himself ears to hear, or
eyes to see with. But follow me; it is as I
suspect
it
must be as I suspect; and unless we do
something to rescue them, they are lost,
without
they have laid a deeper scheme than is
apparent.
It is a dangerous road ye both journey,
added the placid tones of Alice Dunscombe;
but ye are young, and ye are credulous.
If you disapprove of our visit, said Cecilia,
it cannot be right, and we had better return.
No, no, I have said naught to disapprove of
your present errand. If God has put the lives of
those in your custody whom ye have taught
yourselves
to look up to with love and reverence, such
as woman is bound to yield to one man, he has
done it for no idle purpose. Lead us to their
doors, Katherine; let us relieve our doubts, at
least.
The ardent girl did not wait for a second
bidding
,
but she led them, with light and quick steps,
along the gallery, until they reached its
termination
,
where they descended to the basement
floor, by a flight of narrow steps, and carefully
opening a small door, they emerged into the
open air. They now stood on a small plat
of grass, which lay between the building and the
ornamental garden, across which they moved
rapidly
,
concealing their lights, and bending their
shrinking forms before the shivering blasts that
poured their fury upon them from the ocean.
They soon reached a large but rough addition to
the buildings, that concealed its plain
architecture
behind the more laboured and highly finished
parts of the edifice, into which they entered
through a massive door, that stood ajar, as if to
admit them.
Chloe has been true to my orders,
whispered
Katherine, as they passed out of the chilling
air; now, if all the servants are asleep, our
chance to escape unnoticed amounts to certainty.
It became necessary to go through the
servants'
hall, which they effected unobserved, as it
had but one occupant, an aged black man, who,
being posted with his ear within two feet of a
bell, in this attitude had committed himself to a
deep sleep. Gliding through this hall, they entered
divers long and intricate passages, all of which
seemed as familiar to Katherine as they were
unknown
to her companions, until they reached
another flight of steps, which they ascended.
They were now near their goal, and stopped to
examine whether any or what difficulties were
likely to be opposed to their further progress.
Now, indeed, our case seems hopeless,
whispered
Katherine, as they stood, concealed by the
darkness, in one end of an extremely long,
narrow
passage; here is the sentinel in the
building
,
instead of being, as I had supposed, under
the windows; what is to be done now?
Let us return, said Cecilia, in the same
manner; my influence with my uncle is great,
even though he seems unkind to us at times. In
the morning I will use it to persuade him to free
them, on receiving their promise to abandon all
such attempts in future.
In the morning it will be too late, returned
Katherine; I saw that demon, Kit Dillon,
mount his horse, under the pretence of riding to
the great hunt of to-morrow, but I know his
malicious
eve too well to be deceived in his errand.
He is silent that he may be sure, and if
to-morrow
come, and find Griffith within these walls,
he will be condemned to a scaffold.
Say no more, said Alice Dunscombe, with
singular emotion; some lucky circumstance
may aid us with this sentinel.
As she spoke, she advanced; they had not
proceeded far, before the stern voice of the
soldier
challenged the party.
'Tis no time to hesitate, whispered
Katherine
;
we are the ladies of the abbey, looking
to our domestic affairs, she continued, aloud,
and think it a little remarkable that we are to
encounter armed men, while going through our
own dwelling.
The soldier respectfully presented his musket,
and replied
My orders are to guard the doors of these
three rooms, ladies; we have prisoners in them,
and as for any thing else, my duty will be to
serve you all in my power.
Prisoners! exclaimed Katherine, in affected
surprise; does Captain Borroughcliffe make
St. Ruth's Abbey a gaol! Of what offences are
the poor men guilty?
I know not, my lady; but as they are sailors,
I suppose they have run from his majesty's
service
.
This is singular, truly! and why are they not
sent to the county prison?
This must be examined into, said Cecilia,
dropping the mantle from before her face. As
mistress of this house, I claim a right to know
whom its walls contain; you will oblige me by
opening the doors, for I see you have the keys
suspended from your belt.
The sentinel hesitated. He was greatly awed
by the presence and beauty of the speakers, but
a still voice reminded him of his duty. A lucky
thought, however, interposed to relieve him from
his dilemma, and at the same time to comply with
the request, or, rather, order of the lady. As he
handed her the keys, he said
Here they are, my lady; my orders are to
keep the prisoners in, not to keep any one out.
When you are done with them, you will please to
return them to me, if it be only to save a poor
fellow's eyes, for unless the door is kept locked,
I shall not dare to look about me for a moment.
Cecilia promised to return the keys, and she
had applied one of them to a lock, with a
trembling
hand, when Alice Dunscombe arrested her
arm, and addressed the soldier.
Say you there are three? are they men in
years?
No, my lady, all good, serviceable lads, who
couldn't do better than to serve his majesty, or,
as it may prove, worse than to run from their
colours
.
But are their years and appearance similar?
I ask, for I have a friend who has been guilty of
some boyish tricks, and has tried the seas, I hear,
among other foolish hazards.
There is no boy here. In the far room on
the left is a smart, soldier-looking chap, of about
thirty, who the captain thinks has carried a
musket
before now; on him I am charged to keep a
particular eye. Next to him is as pretty a
looking
youth as eyes could wish to see, and it makes
one feel mournful to think what he must come to,
if he has really deserted his ship. In the room
near you, is a smaller, quiet little body, who
might make a better preacher than a sailor or a
soldier either, he has such a gentle way with
him.
Alice covered her eyes with her hand a
moment
,
and then recovering herself, proceeded
Gentleness may do more with the
unfortunate
men than fear; here is a guinea; withdraw
to the far end of the passage, where you can
watch them as well as here, while we enter, and
endeavour to make them confess who and what
they really are.
The soldier took the money, and after looking
about him in a little uncertainty, he at length
complied
,
as it was obviously true they could only
escape by passing him, near the flight of steps.
When he was beyond hearing, Alice Dunscombe
turned to her companions, and a slight glow
appeared
in feverish spots on her cheeks, as she
addressed
them.
It would be idle to attempt to hide from you,
that I expect to meet the individual whose voice
I must have heard in reality to-night, instead of
only imaginary sounds, as I vainly, if not
wickedly supposed. I have many reasons for
changing my opinion, the chief of which is that
he is leagued with the rebellious Americans in
this unnatural war. Nay, chide me not, Miss
Plowden; you will remember that I found my
being on this island. I come here on no vain or
weak errand, Miss Howard, but to spare human
blood. She paused, as if struggling to speak
calmly. But no one can witness the
interview
except our God.
Go, then, said Katherine, secretly rejoicing
at her determination, while we inquire into the
characters of the others.
Alice Dunscombe turned the key, and gently
opening the door, she bade her companions to
tap for her, as they returned, and then instantly
disappeared in the apartment.
Cecilia and her cousin proceeded to the next
door, which they opened in silence, and entered
slowly into the room.
Katherine Plowden had so far examined into
the arrangements of Colonel Howard, as to know
that at the same time he had ordered blankets to
be provided for the prisoners, he had not thought
it necessary to administer any further to the
accommodations
of men who had apparently made
their beds and pillows of planks for the greater
part of their lives.
The ladies accordingly found the youthful
sailor whom they sought, with his body rolled in
the shaggy covering, extended at his length along
VOL. I. 15
the naked boards, and buried in a deep sleep.
So timid were the steps of his visiters, and so
noiseless was their entrance, that they approached
even to his side, without disturbing his slumbers.
The head of the prisoner lay rudely pillowed on
a billet of wood, one hand protecting his face
from its rough surface, and the other thrust into
his bosom, where it rested, with a relaxed grasp,
on the handle of a dirk. Although he slept, and
that heavily, yet his rest was unnatural and
perturbed
.
His breathing was hard and quick, and
something like the low, rapid murmurings of a
confused utterance mingled with his respiration.
The moment had now arrived when the character
of Cecilia Howard appeared to undergo an entire
change. Hitherto she had been led by her cousin,
whose activity and enterprise seemed to qualify
her so well for the office of guide; but now she
advanced before Katherine, and, extending her
lamp in such a manner as to throw the light
across the face of the sleeper, she bent to
examine
his countenance, with keen and anxious
eyes.
Am I right? whispered her cousin.
May God, in his infinite compassion, pity
and protect him! murmured Cecilia, her whole
frame involuntarily shuddering, as the conviction
that she beheld Griffith flashed across her mind.
Yes, Katherine, it is he, and presumptuous
madness has driveu him here. But time presses;
he must be awakened, and his escape effected at
every hazard.
Nay, then, delay no longer, but rouse him
from his sleep.
Griffith! Edward Griffith! said the soft
tones of Cecilia, Griffith, awake!
Your call is useless, for they sleep nightly
among tempests and boisterous sounds, said
Katherine; but I have heard it said that the
smallest touch will generally cause one of them
to stir.
Griffith! repeated Cecilia, laying her fair
hand timidly on his own.
The flash of the lightning is not more nimble
than the leap that the young man made to his
feet, which he no sooner gained, than his dirk
gleamed in the light of the lamps, as he
brandished
it fiercely with one hand, while with the
other he extended a pistol, in a menacing
attitude
,
towards his disturbers.
Stand back! he exclaimed; I am your
prisoner only as a corpse!
The fierceness of his front, and the glaring
eyeballs, that rolled wildly around him, appalled
Cecilia, who shrunk back in fear, dropping her
mantle from her person, but still keeping her
mild eyes fastened on his countenance with a
confiding
gaze, that contradicted her shrinking
attitude
,
as she replied
Edward, it is I; Cecilia Howard, come to
save you from destruction; you are known even
through your ingenious disguise.
The pistol and the dirk fell together on the
blanket of the young sailor, whose looks instantly
lost their disturbed expression in a glow of
pleasure
.
Fortune at length favours me! he cried.
This is kind, Cecilia; more than I deserve, and
much more than I expected. But you are not
alone.
'Tis my cousin Kate; to her piercing eyes
you owe your detection, and she has kindly
consented
to accompany me, that we might urge you
tonay, that we might, if necessary, assist you
to fly. For 'tis cruel folly, Griffith, thus to tempt
your fate.
Have I tempted it, then, in vain! Miss
Plowden, to you I must appeal for an answer and
a justification.
Katherine looked displeased, but after a
moment's
hesitation, she replied
Your servant, Mr. Griffith. I perceive that
the erudite Captain Barnstable has not only
succeeded
in spelling through my scrawl, but he has
also given it to all hands for perusal.
Now you do both him and me injustice, said
Griffith; it surely was not treachery to show me
a plan, in which I was to be a principal actor.
Ah! doubtless your excuses are as obedient
to your calls, as your men, returned the young
lady; but how comes it that the hero of the
Ariel sends a deputy to perform a duty that is so
peculiarly his own? is he wont to be second in
rescues?
Heaven forbid that you should think so
meanly of him, for a moment! We owe you
much, Miss Plowden, but we may have other
duties. You know that we serve our common
country, and have a superior with us, whose beck
is our law.
Return, then, Mr. Griffith, while you may,
to the service of our bleeding country, said
Cecilia, and, after the joint efforts of her brave
children have expelled the intruders from her
soil, let us hope there shall come a time when
Katherine and myself may be restored to our
native homes.
Think you, Miss Howard, to how long a
period
the mighty arm of the British king may
extend
that time? We shall prevail; a nation
fighting for its dearest rights must ever prevail;
but 'tis not the work of a day, for a people, poor,
scattered, and impoverished as we have been, to
beat down a power like that of England; surely
you forget that in bidding me to leave you with
such expectations, Miss Howard, you doom me
to an almost hopeless banishment!
We must trust to the will of God, said
Cecilia
;
if he ordain that America is to be free
only after protracted sufferings, I can aid her
but with my prayers; but you have an arm and
an experience, Griffith, that might do her better
service; waste not your usefulness, then, in
visionary
schemes for private happiness, but seize
the moments as they offer, and return to your
ship, if, indeed, it is yet in safety, and endeavour
to forget this mad undertaking, and, for a time,
the being who has led you to the adventure.
This is a reception that I had not
anticipated
,
returned Griffith; for though accident,
and not intention, has thrown me into your
presence
this evening, I did hope that when I again
saw the frigate, it would he in your company,
Cecilia.
You cannot justly reproach me, Mr. Griffith,
with your disappointment, for I have not uttered
or authorized a syllable that could induce you or
any one to believe that I would consent to quit my
uncle.
Miss Howard will not think me
presumptuous
,
if I remind her that there was a time when
she did not think me unworthy to be intrusted
with her person and her happiness.
A rich bloom mantled on the face of Cecilia,
as she replied
Nor do I now, Mr. Griffith; but you do
well to remind me of my former weakness, for
the recollection of its folly and imprudence only
adds to my present strength.
Nay, interrupted her eager lover, if I
intended
a reproach, or harboured a boastful
15*
thought, spurn me from you for ever, as unworthy
of your favour.
I acquit you of both, much easier than I can
acquit myself of the charge of weakness and
folly, continued Cecilia; but there are many
things that have occurred, since we last met, to
prevent a repetition of such inconsiderate
rashness
on my part. One of them is, she added,
smiling sweetly, that I have numbered twelve
more months to my age, and a hundred to my
experience. Another, and perhaps a more
important
one, is, that my uncle then continued
among the friends of his youth, surrounded by
those whose blood mingles with his own; but here
he lives a stranger, and, though he finds some
consolation
in dwelling in a building where his
ancestors
have dwelt before him, yet he walks as an
alien through its gloomy passages, and would
find the empty honour but a miserable
compensation
for the kindness and affection of one whom
he has loved and cherished from her infancy.
And yet he is opposed to you in your private
wishes, Cecilia, unless my besotted vanity has led
me to believe what it would now be madness to
learn was false; and in your opinions of public
things, you are quite as widely separated. I
should think there could be but little happiness
dependant on a connexion where there is no one
feeling entertained in common.
There is, and an all-important one, said
Miss Howard; 'tis our love. He is my kind,
my affectionate, and, unless thwarted by some evil
cause, my indulgent uncle and guardianand I
am his brother Harry's child. This tie is not
easily to be severed, Mr. Griffith, though, as I do
not wish to see you crazed, I shall not add that
your besotted vanity has played you false; but,
surely, Edward, it is possible to feel a double tie,
and so to act as to discharge our duties to both.
I never, never can or will consent to desert my
uncle, a stranger as he is in the land whose rule
he upholds so blindly. You know not this
England
,
Griffith; she receives her children from the
colonies with cold and haughty distrust, like a
jealous step-mother, who is wary of the favours
that she bestows on her factitious offspring.
I know her in peace, and I know her in
war, said the young sailor, proudly, and can
add, that she is a haughty friend, and a stubborn
foe; but she grapples now with those who ask no
more of her, than an open sea, and an enemy's
favours. But this determination will be
melancholy
tidings for me to convey to Barnstable.
Nay, said Cecilia, smiling, I cannot vouch
for others, who have no uncles, and who have an
extra quantity of ill humour and spleen against
this country, its people, and its laws, although
profoundly ignorant of them all.
Is Miss Howard tired of seeing me under the
tiles of St. Ruth? asked Katherine. But
hark! are there not footsteps approaching along
the gallery?
They listened, in breathless silence, and soon
heard distinctly the approaching tread of more
than one person. Voices were quite audible, and
before they had time to consult on what was best
to be done, the words of the speakers were
distinctly
heard at the door of their own apartment.
Ay! he has a military air about him, Peters,
that will make him a prize; come, open the
door.
This is not his room, your honour, said the
alarmed soldier; he quarters in the last room in
the gallery.
How know you that, fellow? come, produce
the key, and open the way for me; I care not
who sleeps here; there is no saying but I may
enlist them all three.
A single moment of dreadful incertitude
succeeded
,
when the sentinel was heard saying, in
reply to this peremptory order
I thought your honour wanted to see the one
with the black stock, and so left the rest of the
keys at the other end of the passage; but
But nothing, you loon; a sentinel should
always carry his keys about him, like a gaoler;
follow, then, and let me see the lad who dresses
so well to the right.
As the heart of Katherine began to beat less
vehemently, she said
'Tis Borroughcliffe, and too drunk to see
that we have left the key in the door; but what
is to be done? we have but a moment for
consultation
.
As the day dawns, said Cecilia, quickly,
I shall send here, under the pretence of
conveying
you food, my own woman
There is no need of risking any thing for my
safety, interrupted Griffith; I hardly think we
shall be detained, and if we are, Barnstable is at
hand, with a force that would scatter these
recruits
to the four winds of heaven.
Ah! that would lead to bloodshed, and
scenes of horror! exclaimed Cecilia.
Listen! cried Katherine, they approach
again!
A man now stopped, once more, at their door,
which was opened softly, and the face of the
sentinel
was thrust into the apartment.
Captain Borroughcliffe is on his rounds, and
for fifty of your guineas, I would not leave you
here another minute.
But one word more, said Cecilia.
Not a syllable, my lady, for my life,
returned
the man; the lady from the next room
waits for you, and, in mercy to a poor fellow, go
back where you came from.
The appeal was unanswerable, and they
complied
,
Cecilia saying, as they left the room
I shall send you food in the morning, young
man, and directions how to take the remedy
necessary
to your safety.
In the passage they found Alice Dunscombe,
with her face concealed in her mantle, and, it
would seem by the heavy sighs that escaped from
her, deeply agitated by the interview which she
had just encountered.
But as the reader may have some curiosity to
know what occurred to distress this unoffending
lady so sensibly, we shall detain the narrative, to
relate the substance of that which passed between
her and the individual whom she sought.
CHAPTER XIV.
As when a lion in his den
Hath heard the hunters' cries,
And rushes forth to meet his foes,
So did the Douglass rise
percy
.
Alice Dunscombe
did not find the second of
the prisoners buried, like Griffith, in sleep, but
he was seated on one of the old chairs that were
in the apartment, with his back to the door, and
apparently looking through the small window, on
the dark and dreary scenery, over which the
tempest
was yet sweeping in its fury. Her approach
was unheeded, until the light from her lamp
glared
across his eyes, when he started from his
musing
posture, and advanced to meet her. He
was the first to speak.
I expected this visit, he said, when I found
that you recognised my voice, and I felt a deep
assurance in my breast, that Alice Dunscombe
would never betray me.
His listener, though expecting this
confirmation
of her conjectures, was unable to make an
immediate reply, but she sunk into the seat he
had abandoned, and waited a few moments, as if
to recover her powers.
It was, then, no mysterious warning! no airy
voice that mocked my ear; but a dread reality!
she at length said. Why have you thus braved
the indignation of the laws of your country? on
what errand of fell mischief has your ruthless
temper again urged you to embark?
This is strong and cruel language, coming
from you to me, Alice Dunscombe, returned the
stranger, with cool asperity; and the time has
been, when I should have been greeted, after a
shorter absence, with milder terms.
I deny it not; I cannot, if I would, conceal
my infirmity from myself or you; I hardly wish
it to continue unknown to the world. If I have
once esteemed youif I have plighted to you my
troth, and, in my confiding folly, forgot my
higher duties, God has amply punished me for
the weakness, in your own evil deeds.
Nay, let not our meeting be embittered with
useless and provoking recriminations, said the
other; for we have much to say before you
communicate the errand of mercy on which you
have come hither. I know you too well, Alice,
not to see that you perceive the peril in which I
am placed, and am willing to venture something
for my safety. Your motherdoes she yet
live?
She is gone in quest of my blessed father,
said Alice, covering her pale face with her hands;
they have left me alone, truly, for he who was
to have been all to me, was first false to his faith,
and has since become unworthy of my
confidence
.
The stranger became singularly agitated, his
usually quiet eye glancing hastily from the
floor to the countenance of his companion, as he
paced the room with hurried steps; at length he
replied
There is much, perhaps, to be said in
explanation
,
that you do not know. I left the country,
because I found in it nothing but oppression and
injustice, and I could not invite you to become
the bride of a wanderer, without either name or
fortune. But I have now the opportunity of
proving my truth. You say you are alone; be so
no longer, and try how far you were mistaken in
believing that I should one day supply the place
to you of both father and mother.
There is something soothing to a female ear in
the offer of even protracted justice, and Alice
spoke with less of acrimony in her tones, during
the remainder of their conference, if not with
less of severity in her language.
You talk not like a man whose very life
hangs but on a thread that the next minute may
snap asunder. Whither would you lead me? is
it to the tower at London!
Think not I have weakly exposed my
person
without a sufficient protection, returned the
stranger, with cool indifference; there are many
gallant men who only wait my signal, to crush
the paltry force of this officer like a worm
beneath
my feet.
Then has the conjecture of Colonel Howard
been true! and the manner in which the enemy's
vessels have passed the shoals, is no longer a
mystery! you have been their pilot!
I have.
What! would ye pervert the knowledge
gained in the spring-time of your guileless youth
to the foul purpose of bringing desolation to the
doors of those you once knew and respected!
John! John! is the image of the maiden whom
in her morning of beauty and simplicity I
believe
you did love, so faintly impressed, that
it cannot soften your hard heart to the misery
of those among whom she has been born, and
who compose her little world.
Not a hair of theirs shall be touched, not a
thatch shall blaze, nor shall a sleepless night
befall
the vilest among themand all for your
sake, Alice! England comes to this contest with
a seared conscience, and bloody hands, but all
shall be forgotten for the present, when both
opportunity
and power offer, to make her feel our
vengeance, even in her vitals. I came not on
such an errand.
What, then, has led you blindly into snares,
where all your boasted aid would avail you
nothing
;
for, should I call aloud your name, even
here, in the dark and dreary passages of this
obscure edifice, the cry would echo through the
country, ere the morning, and a whole people
would be found in arms to punish your
audacity
.
My name has been sounded, and that in no
gentle strains, returned the pilot, scornfully,
when a whole people have quailed at it; the
craven, cowardly wretches, flying before the man
they had wronged. I have lived to bear the
banners of the new republic, proudly, in sight of
the three kingdoms, when practised skill and
equal arms have in vain struggled to pluck it
down. Ay! Alice, the echoes of my guns are
still roaring among your eastern hills, and
would render my name more appalling than
inviting
to your sleeping yeomen.
Boast not of the momentary success that the
arm of God has yielded to your unhallowed
efforts
,
said Alice; for a day of severe and
heavy retribution must follow; nor flatter
yourself
with the idle hope, that your name, terrible
as ye have rendered it to the virtuous, is
sufficient
,
of itself, to drive the thoughts of home,
VOL. I. 16
and country, and kin, from all who hear it.
Nay, I know not that even now, in listening to
you, I am not forgetting a solemn duty, which
would teach me to proclaim your presence, that
the land might know that her unnatural son is a
dangerous burthen in her bosom.
The pilot turned quickly in his short walk;
and, after reading her countenance, with the
expression
of one who felt his security, he said, in
gentler tones
Would that be Alice Dunscombe! would
that be like the mild, generous girl whom I
knew in my youth! But, I repeat, the threat
would fail to intimidate, even if you were
capable
of executing it. I have said that it is only
to make the signal, to draw around me a force
sufficient to scatter these dogs of soldiers to the
four winds of heaven.
Have you calculated your power justly,
John? said Alice, unconsciously betraying her
deep interest in his safety. Have you
reckoned
the probability of Mr. Dillon's arriving,
accompanied
by an armed band of horsemen, with
the morning's sun? for it's no secret in the
Abbey
,
that he is gone in quest of such assistance.
Dillon! exclaimed the pilot, starting;
who is he! and on what suspicion does he seek
this addition to your guard?
Nay, John, look not at me, as if you would
know the secrets of my heart. It was not I who
prompted him to such a step; you cannot, for a
moment, think that I would betray you! But
too surely he has gone, and, as the night wears
rapidly away, you should be using the hour of
grace to effect your own security.
Fear not for me, Alice, returned the pilot,
proudly, while a faint smile struggled around his
compressed lip; and yet, I like not this
movement
,
either. How call you his name? Dillon!
is he a minion of King George?
He is, John, what you are not, a loyal
subject
of his sovereign lord the King, and, though
a native of the revolted colonies, he has preserved
his virtue uncontaminated amid the corruptions
and temptations of the times.
An American! and disloyal to the liberties of
the human race! By Heaven, he had better not
cross me; for if my arm reach him, it shall hold
him forth as a spectacle of treason to the world.
And has not the world enough of such a
spectacle
in yourself? Are ye not, even now,
breathing
your native air, though lurking through the
mists of the island, with desperate intent against
its peace and happiness?
A dark and fierce expression of angry
resentment
flashed from the eyes of the pilot, and even
his iron frame seemed to shake with emotion, as
he answered
Call you his dastardly and selfish treason,
aiming, as it does, to aggrandize a few, at the
expense of millions, a parallel case to the
generous
ardour that impels a man to fight in the
defence
of sacred liberty? I might tell you that I
am armed in the common cause of my fellow
subjects
and countrymen; that though an ocean
divided
us in distance, yet are we a people of the
same blood, and children of the same parents,
and that the hand which oppresses one, inflicts
an injury on the other. But I disdain all such
narrow apologies. I was born on this orb, and I
claim to be a citizen of it. A man with a soul,
not to be limited by the arbitrary boundaries of
tyrants and hirelings, but one who has the right
as well as the inclination to grapple with
oppression
,
in whosoever's name it is exercised, or in
whatever hollow and specious shape it founds its
claim to abuse our race.
Ah! John, John, though this may sound
like reason to rebellious ears, to mine it seemeth
only as the ravings of insanity. It is in vain ye
build up your new and disorganizing systems of
rule, or rather misrule, which are opposed to all
that the world has ever yet done, or will ever see
done in peace and happiness. What avail your
subtleties and false reasonings against the heart!
It is the heart which tells us where our home is,
and how to love it.
You talk like a weak and prejudiced woman,
Alice, said the pilot, more composedly; and
one who would shackle nations with the ties that
bind the young and feeble of your own sex
together
.
And by what holier or better bond can they be
united! said Alice. Are not the relations of
domestic life of God's establishing, and have not
nations grown from families, as branches spread
from the stem, till the tree overshadows the land!
'Tis an ancient and sacred tie that binds man to
his nation, neither can it be severed without
infamy
.
The pilot smiled disdainfully, and throwing
open the rough exterior of his dress, he drew
forth, in succession, several articles, with a
glowing
pride lighting his countenance, as he offered
them singly to her notice,
See, Alice! he said, call you this infamy!
This broad sheet of parchment is stamped with a
seal of no mean importance, and it bears the
royal name of the princely Louis also! And
view this cross! decorated as it is with jewels,
the gift of the same illustrious hand; it is not apt
to be given to the children of infamy, neither is
it wise or decorous to stigmatize a man who has
not been thought unworthy to consort with
princes and nobles, by the opprobrious name of
the `Scotch pirate.
And have ye not earned the title, John, by
ruthless deeds and bitter animosity! I could kiss
the baubles ye show me, if they were a thousand
times less splendid, had they been laid upon your
breast by the hands of your lawful prince; but
now they appear to my eyes only as indelible
blots upon your attainted name. As to your
associates
,
I have heard of them! and it seemeth
that a queen might be better employed than
encouraging by her smiles the disloyal subjects
of other monarchs, though even her enemies.
God only knows when his pleasure may suffer
a spirit of disaffection to rise up among the
people
of her own nation, and then the thought that
she has encouraged rebellion may prove both
bitter
and unwelcome.
That the royal and lovely Antoinette has
deigned to repay my services with a small
portion
of her gracious approbation, is not among
the least of my boasts, returned the pilot, in
affected humility, while secret pride was
manifested
even in his proud attitude. But venture
not a syllable in her dispraise, for you know not
whom you censure. She is less distinguished by
her illustrious birth and elevated station, than by
her virtues and loveliness. She lives the first of
her sex in Europethe daughter of an emperor,
the consort of the most powerful king, and the
smiling and beloved patroness of a nation who
worship at her feet. Her life is above all
reproach
,
as it is above all earthly punishment,
were she so lost as to merit it; and it has been
the will of Providence to place her far beyond
the reach of all human misfortunes.
Has it placed her above human errors, John!
16*
punishment is the natural and inevitable
consequence
of sin, and unless she can say more than
has ever fallen to the lot of humanity to say truly,
she may yet be made to feel the chastening arm
of One, to whose eyes all her pageantry and
power are as vacant as the air she breathesso
insignificant
must it seem when compared to his own
just rule! But if you vaunt that you have been
permitted to kiss the hem of the robes of the
French queen, and have been the companion of
high-born and flaunting ladies, clad in their richest
array, can ye yet say to yourself, that amid them
all ye have found one whose tongue has been
bold to tell you the truth, or whose heart has
sincerely joined in her false professions!
Certainly none have met me with the
reproaches
that I have this night received from
Alice Dunscombe, after a separation of six long
years, returned the pilot, reproachfully.
If I have spoken to you the words of holy
truth, John, let them not be the less welcome,
because they are strangers to your ears. Oh!
think that she who has thus dared to use the
language
of reproach to one whose name is terrible
to all who live on the border of this island, is led
to the rash act by no other motive than interest in
your eternal welfare.
Alice! Alice, you madden me with these
foolish speeches! Am I a monster to frighten
unprotected
women and helpless children? What
mean these epithets, as coupled with my name?
Have you too lent a credulous ear to the vile
calumnies
with which the policy of your rulers have
ever attempted to destroy the fair fame of those
who oppose them, and those chiefly who oppose
them with success. My name may be terrible
to the officers of the royal fleet, but where and
how have I earned a claim to be considered
formidable
to the helpless and unoffending?
Alice Dunscombe cast a furtive and timid
glance at the pilot, which spoke even stronger
than her words, as she replied
I know not that all which is said of you and
your deeds is true. I have often prayed, in
bitterness
and sorrow, that a tenth part of that
which is laid to your charge may not be heaped
on your devoted head at the great and final
account
.
But, John, I have known you long and
well, and Heaven forbid, that, on this solemn
occasion
,
which may be the last of our earthly
interviews
,
I should be found wanting in christian
duty, through a woman's weakness. I have often
thought, when I have heard the gall of bitter
reproach
and envenomed language hurled against
your name, that they who spoke so rashly, little
understood the man they vituperated. But, though
ye are at times, and I may say almost always, as
mild and even as the smoothest sea over which ye
have ever sailed, yet God has mingled in your
nature a fearful mixture of fierce passions, which,
roused, are more like the southern waters when
troubled with the tornado. It is difficult for
me to say, how far this evil spirit may lead a man,
who has been goaded by fancied wrongs, to
forget
his country and home, and who is suddenly
clothed with power to show his resentments.
The pilot listened with rooted attention, and
his piercing eye seemed to reach to the seat of
those thoughts which she but half expressed; still,
he retained the entire command of himself, and
answered more in sorrow than in anger
If any thing could convert me to your own
peaceful and unresisting opinions, Alice, it would
be the reflections that offer themselves at this
conviction
,
that even you have been led, by the base
tongues of my dastardly enemies, to doubt my
honour and conduct. What is fame, when a man
can be thus traduced to his nearest friends! But
no more of these childish reflections! They are
unworthy of myself, my office, and the sacred
cause in which I have enlisted!
Nay, John, shake them not off, said Alice,
with deep interest, unconsciously laying her hand
on his arm; they are as the dew to the parched
herbage, and may freshen the feelings of your
youth, and soften the heart that has grown hard,
if hard it be, more by unnatural indulgence, than
its own base inclinations.
Alice Dunscombe, said the pilot,
approaching
her with solemn earnestness, I have learnt
much this night, though I came not in quest of
such knowledge. You have taught me how
powerful
is the breath of the slanderer, and how frail
is the tenure by which we hold our good names.
Full twenty times have I met the hirelings of your
prince in open battle, fighting ever manfully
under
that flag which was first raised to the breeze
by my own hands, and which, I thank my God,
I have never yet seen lowered an inch; but with
no one act of cowardice or private wrong, in
all that service, can I reproach myself; and yet,
how am I rewarded! The tongue of the vile
calumniator is keener than the sword of the
warrior
,
and leaves a more indelible scar!
Never have ye uttered a truer sentiment,
John, and God send that ye may encourage
such thoughts to your own eternal advantage,
said Alice, with engaging interest. You say
that you have risked your precious life in twenty
combats, and observe how little of Heaven's favour
is bestowed on the abettors of rebellion! They
tell me that the world has never witnessed a more
desperate and bloody struggle than this last, for
which your name has been made to sound to the
furthermost ends of the isle.
'Twill be known wherever naval combats are
spoken of, interrupted the pilot, the melancholy
which had begun to lower in his countenance,
giving place to a look of proud exultation.
And yet, its fancied glory cannot shield your
name from wrong, nor are the rewards of the
victor equal, in a temporal sense, to those which
the vanquished has received. Know you that our
gracious monarch, deeming your adversary's
cause so sacred, has extended to him his royal
favour?
Ay! he has dubbed him knight! exclaimed
the pilot, with a scornful and bitter laugh; let
him be again furnished with a ship, and me with
another opportunity, and I promise him an
earldom
,
if being again vanquished can constitute a
claim!
Speak not so rashly, nor vaunt yourself
of possessing a protecting power, that may desert
you, John, when you most need it, and least
expect
the change, returned his companion; the
battle is not always to the strong, neither is the
race to the swift.
Forget you, my good Alice, that your words
will admit of a double meaning? Has the battle
been to the strong! Though you say not well in
denying the race to the swift. Yes, yes, often and
again have the dastards escaped me by their
prudent
speed! Alice Dunscombe, you know not a
thousandth part of the torture that I have been
made to feel, by high born miscreants, who envy
the merit they cannot equal, and detract from the
glory of deeds that they dare not attempt to
emulate
.
How have I been cast upon the ocean like
some unworthy vessel that is commissioned to do
a desperate deed, and then to bury itself in the
ruin it has made! How many malignant hearts
have triumphed, as they beheld my canvass open,
thinking that it was spread to hasten me to a
gibbet, or to a tomb in the bosom of the ocean;
but I have disappointed them!
The eyes of the pilot no longer gazed with their
piercing and settled meaning, but they flashed
with a fierce and wild pleasure, as he continued,
in a louder voice
Yes, bitterly have I disappointed them! Oh!
the triumph over my fallen enemies has been
tame, to this heartfelt exultation which places me
immeasurably above those false and craven
hypocrites
!
I begged, I implored, the Frenchmen, for
the meanest of their craft, which possessed but the
common qualities of a ship of war; I urged the
policy and necessity of giving me such a force, for
even then I promised to be found in harm's way;
but, envy and jealousy robbed me of my just
dues, and of more than half my glory. They call
me pirate! If I have a claim to the name, it was
furnished more by the paltry outfit of my friends,
than by any acts towards my enemies!
And do not these recollections prompt you to
return to your allegiance to your prince and
native land, John? said Alice, in a subdued
voice.
Away with the silly thought, interrupted the
pilot, recalled to himself as if by a sudden
conviction
of the weakness he had betrayed; it is
ever thus where men are made conspicuous by
their worksbut to your visitI have the power
to rescue myself and companions from this paltry
confinement, and yet I would not have it done
with violence, for your sake.Bring you the
means of doing it in quiet?
When the morning arrives, you will be all
conducted to the apartment where we first met.
This will be done at the solicitation of Miss
Howard
,
under the plea of compassion and justice, and
with the professed object of inquiring into your
situations. Her request will not be refused, and
while your guard is stationed at the door, you will
be shown, by another entrance through the
private
apartments of the wing, to a window, whence
you can easily leap to the ground, where a thicket
is at hand; afterwards we shall trust your safety
to your own discretion?
And if this Dillon, of whom you have spoken,
should suspect the truth, how will you answer to
the law for aiding our escape?
I believe he little dreams who is among the
prisoners, said Alice, musing, though he may
have detected the character of one of your
companions
.
But it is private feeling, rather than
public spirit, that urges him on.
I have suspected something of this, returned
the pilot, with a smile, that crossed those features
where ungovernable passions had so lately been
exhibited, with an effect, that might be likened
to the last glimmering of an expiring
conflagration
,
serving to render the surrounding ruin more
obvious. This young Griffith has led me from
my direct path, with his idle imprudence, and it
is right that his mistress should incur some risk.
But with you, Alice, the case is different; here
you are only a guest, and it is unnecessary that
you should be known in the unfortunate affair.
Should my name get abroad, this recreant
American
,
this Col. Howard, will find all the favour
he has purchased by his advocating the cause of
tyranny, necessary to protect him from the
displeasure
of the ministry.
I fear to trust so delicate a measure to the
young discretion of my amiable friend, said
Alice, shaking her head.
Remember, that she has her attachment to
plead in her excuse; but dare you say to the
world that you still remember, with gentle
feelings
,
the man whom you stigmatize with such
opprobrious epithets!
A slight colour gleamed over the pallid brow
of Alice Dunscombe, as she uttered in a voice
that was barely audible
There is no longer a reason why the world
should know of such a weakness, though it did
exist. And, as the faint glow passed away,
leaving her face pale, nearly as the hue of death,
her eyes kindled with unusual fire, and she added,
They can but take my life, John, and that I
am ready to lay down in your service!
Alice! exclaimed the softened pilot, my
kind, my gentle Alice!
The knock of the sentinel at the door, was
heard at this critical moment. Without waiting
for a reply to his summons, the man entered the
apartment, and, in hurried language, declared the
urgent necessity that existed for the lady to retire.
A few brief remonstrances were uttered by both
Alice and the pilot, who wished to comprehend
more clearly each other's intentions relative to
the intended escape; but the fear of personal
punishment rendered the soldier obdurate, and a
dread of exposure at length induced the lady to
comply. She arose, and was leaving the
apartment
with lingering steps, when the pilot,
touching
her hand, whispered to her impressively
Alice, we meet again before I leave this island
for ever.
We meet in the morning, John, she
returned
,
in the same tone of voice, in the
apartments
of Miss Howard.
He dropped her hand, and she glided from the
room, when the impatient sentinel closed the door,
and silently turned the key on his prisoner. The
pilot remained in a listening attitude, until the
light footsteps of the retiring pair were no longer
audible, when he paced his confined apartment
with perturbed steps, occasionally pausing to look
out at the driving clouds, and the groaning oaks
that were trembling and rocking their broad arms
in the fitful gusts of the gale. In a few minutes
the tempest in his own passions had gradually
subsided to the desperate and still calmness that
made him the man he was; when he again seated
himself where Alice had found him, and began
to muse on the events of the times, from which,
the transition to projecting schemes of daring
enterprise
and mighty consequences, was but the
usual employment of his active and restless mind.
VOL. I. 17
CHAPTER XV.
Sir And
. I have no exquisite reason for't, but I've reason good enough.
Twelfth Night
.
The
countenance of Captain Borroughcliffe,
when the sentinel admitted him to the apartment
that he had selected, was in that state of doubtful
illumination, when looks of peculiar cunning
blend so nicely with the stare of vacancy, that
the human face is rendered not unlike an April
day, now smiling and inviting, and at the next
moment clouded and dreary. It was quite
apparent
that the soldier had an object for his
unexpected
visit, by the importance of his air, and
the solemnity of the manner with which he
entered
on the business. He waved his hand for the
sentinel to retire, with lofty dignity, and
continued
balancing his body, during the closing of
the door, and while a sound continued audible to
his confused faculties, with his eyes fixed in the
direction of the noise, with that certain sort of
wise look, that in many men supplies the place
of something better. When the captain felt
himself
secure from interruption, he moved round
with quick military precision, in order to face the
man of whom he was in quest. Griffith had been
sleeping, though uneasily, and with watchfulness;
and the pilot was calmly waiting a visit which it
seems he had anticipated; but their associate, who
was no other than Captain Manual, of the
marines
,
was discovered in a very different
condition
.
Though the weather was cool, and the
night tempestuous, he had thrown aside his
peajacket
,
and much of his disguise, and was sitting
ruefully on his blanket, wiping, with one hand,
the large drops of sweat from his forehead, and
occasionally grasping his throat with the other,
with a kind of convulsed, mechanical movement.
He stared wildly at his visiter, though his
entrance
produced no other alteration in these
pursuits
,
than a more diligent application of his
handkerchief, and a more frequent grasping of his
naked neck, as if he were willing to ascertain by
actual experiment, what degree of pressure the
part was able to sustain, without exceeding a
given quantity of inconvenience.
Comrade, I greet ye! said Borroughcliffe,
staggering to the side of his prisoner, where he
seated himself with an entire absence of
ceremony
;
Comrade, I greet ye! Is the kingdom in
danger, that gentlemen traverse the island in the
uniform of the regiment of incognitus,
incognitii
,
'torumdammee, how I forget my Latin!
Say, my fine fellow, are you one of these
'torums
?
Manual breathed a little hard, which,
considering
the manner he had been using his throat, was
a thing to be expected; but, swallowing his
apprehensions
,
he answered with more spirit than
his situation rendered prudent, or the occasion
demanded.
Say what you will of me, and treat me as
you please, I defy any man to call me tory with
truth.
You are no 'torum! Well, then, the war
office
has got up a new dress! Your regiment must
have earned their facings in storming some water
battery, or perhaps it has done duty as marines.
Am I right?
I'll not deny it, said Manual, more stoutly;
I have served as a marine for two years, though
taken from the line of
The army, said Borroughcliffe,
interrupting
a most damning confession of which state
line the other had belonged to. I kept a dog
watch myself, once, on board the fleet of my
Lord Howe; but it is a service that I do not envy
any man. Our afternoon parades were
dreadfully
unsteady, for it's a time, you know, when a
man wants solid ground to stand on. However,
I purchased my company with some prize money
that fell in my way, and I always remember
the marine service with gratitude. But this is
dry work. I have put a bottle of sparkling
Madeira
in my pocket, with a couple of glasses,
which we will discuss, while we talk over more
important matters. Thrust your hand into my
right pocket; I have been used to dress to the
front so long, that it comes mighty awkward to
me to make this backward motion, as if it were
into a cartridge box.
Manual, who knew not how to construe the
manner or language of the other, perceived at
once a good deal of plain English in this request,
and he dislodged one of Colonel Howard's dusty
looking bottles, with a dexterity that denoted the
earnestness of his purpose. Borroughcliffe had
made a suitable provision of glasses, and
extracting
the cork in a certain scientific manner, he
tendered to his companion a bumper of the liquor,
before another syllable was uttered by either of
the expectants. The gentlemen concluded their
draughts with a couple of smacks, that sounded
not unlike the pistols of two practised duellists,
though certainly a much less alarming noise; when
the entertainer renewed the discourse.
I like one of your musty-looking bottles,
that is covered with dust and cobwebs, with a
good southern tan on it, he said. Such liquor
does not abide in the stomach, but it gets into the
heart at once, and becomes blood in the beating
of a pulse. But how soon I knew you! That
sort of knowledge is the freemasonry of our
craft. I knew you to be the man you are, the
moment I laid eyes on you in what we call our
guard-room; but I thought I would humour the
old soldier who lives here, by letting him have
the formula of an examination, as a sort of
deference
to his age and former rank. But I knew
you the instant I saw you. I have seen you
before
!
The theory of Borroughcliffe, in relation to
the incorporation of wine with the blood, might
have been true in the case of the marine, whose
whole frame appeared to undergo a kind of
magical
change by the experiment of drinking, which,
the reader will understand, was diligently
persevered
in, while a drop remained in the bottle.
The perspiration no longer rolled from his brow,
neither did his throat manifest that uneasiness
which had rendered such constant external
applications
necessary; but he settled down into an
air of cool and collected curiosity and interest,
which, in some measure, was the necessary
concomitant
of his situation.
We may have met before, as I have been
much in service, and yet I know not where you
17*
could have seen me, said Manual. Were you
ever a prisoner of war?
Hum! not exactly such an unfortunate devil;
but a sort of conventional non-combatant. I
shared the hardships, the glory, the equivocal
victories, (where we killed and drove countless
numbers of rebelswho were not,) and, wo is
me! the capitulation of Burgoyne. But let that
passwhich was more than the Yankees would
allow us to do. You know not where I could
have seen you? I have seen you on parade, in
the field, in battle and out of battle, in camp,
in barracks, in short, every where but in a
drawing-room
.
No, no; I have never seen you before
this night in a drawing-room!
Manual stared in a good deal of wonder, and
some uneasiness, at these confident assertions,
which promised to put his life in no little
jeopardy
;
and it is to be supposed that the peculiar
sensation about the throat was revived, as he made
a heavy draught before he said
You will swear to thisCan you call me by
name?
I will swear to it in any court in
Christendom
,
said the dogmatical soldier; and your
name isisFugleman.
If it is, I'll be damn'd! exclaimed the other,
with exulting precipitation.
Swear not! said Borroughcliffe, with a
solemn
air; for what mattereth an empty name!
Call thyself by what appellation thou wilt, I know
thee. Soldier is written on thy martial front;
thy knee bendeth not; nay, I even doubt if the
rebellious member bow in prayer.
Come, sir, interrupted Manual, a little
sternly
;
no more of this trifling, but declare your
will at once. Rebellious member, indeed! These
fellows will call the skies of America rebellious
heavens shortly!
I like thy spirit, lad, returned the
undisturbed
Borroughcliffe; it sits as gracefully on
a soldier, as his sash and gorget; but it is lost on
an old campaigner. I marvel, however, that thou
takest such umbrage at my slight attack on thy
orthodoxy. I fear the fortress must be weak,
where the outworks are defended with such a
waste of unnecessary courage.
I know not why or wherefore you have paid
me this visit, Captain Borroughcliffe, said
Manual
,
with a laudable discretion, which prompted
him to reconnoitre the other's views a little, before
he laid himself more open; if captain be your
rank, and Borroughcliffe be your name. But this
I do know, that if it be only to mock me in my
present situation, it is neither soldier-like nor
manly; and it is what, in other circumstances,
might be attended by some hazard.
Hum! said the other, with his immovable
coolness; I see you set the wine down as
nothing
,
though the king drinks not as good; for the
plain reason that the sun of England cannot find
its way through the walls of Windsor Castle, as
easily as the sun of Carolina can warm a
garret
covered with cedar shingles. But I like your
spirit more and more. So draw yourself up in
battle array, and let us have another charge at
this black bottle, when I shall lay before your
military eyes a plan of the whole campaign.
Manual first bestowed an inquiring glance at
his companion, when, discovering no other
expression
than foolish cunning, which was fast
yielding before the encroaching footsteps of stupid
inebriety, he quietly placed himself in the desired
position. The wine was drunk, when
Borroughcliffe
proceeded to open his communication more
unreservedly.
You are a soldier, and I am a soldier. That
you are a soldier, my orderly could tell; for the
dog has both seen a campaign, and smelt
villanous
salt-petre, when compounded according to
a wicked invention; but it required the officer to
detect the officer. Privates do not wear such
linen as this, which seemeth to me an
unreasonably
cool attire for the season; nor velvet stocks,
with silver buckles; nor is there often the odorous
flavour of sweet-scented pomatum to be
discovered
around their greasy locks. In short, thou
art both soldier and officer.
I confess it, said Manual; I hold the rank
of captain, and shall expect the treatment of
one.
I think I have furnished you with wine fit for
a general, returned Borroughcliffe; but have
your way. Now, it would be apparent to men,
whose faculties had not been rendered clear by
such cordials as this dwelling aboundeth with,
that when you officers journey through the island,
clad in the uniform incognitorum, which, in your
case, means the marine corps, that something is
in the wind of more than usual moment.
Soldiers
owe their allegiance to their prince, and
next to him, to war, women, and wine. Of war,
there is none in the realm; of women, plenty;
but wine, I regret to say, that is, good wine,
grows both scarce and dear. Do I speak to the
purpose, comrade?
Proceed, said Manual, whose eyes were not
less attentive than his ears, in a hope to discover
whether his true character were understood.
En avant! in plain English, forward march!
Well then, the difficulty lies between women and
wine; which, when the former are pretty, and
the latter rich, is a very agreeable sort of an
alternative
.
That it is not wine of which you are
in quest, I must believe, my comrade captain, or
you would not go on the adventure in such shabby
attire. You will excuse me, but who would think
of putting any thing better than their port before
a man in a pair of tarred trowsers. No! no!
Hollands, green-and-yellow Hollands, is a
potation
good enough to set before one of thy present
bearing.
And yet I have met with him who has treated
me to the choicest of the south-side Madeira?
Know you the very side from which the
precious
fluid comes! That looks more in favour of
the wine. But, after all, woman, dear,
capricious
woman, who one moment fancies she
sees a hero in regimentals, and the next, a saint
in a cassock; and who always sees something
admirable
in a suitor, whether he be clad in tow or
velvetwoman is at the bottom of this
mysterious
masquerading. Am I right, comrade?
By this time, Manual had discovered that he
was safe, and he returned to the conversation with
a revival of all his ready wits, which had been
strangely paralyzed by his previous disorder in the
region of the throat. First bestowing a wicked
wink on his companion, and a look that would
have outdone the wisest aspect of Solomon, he
replied
Ah! woman has much to answer for!
I knew it, exclaimed Borroughcliffe; and
this confession only confirms me in the good
opinion I have always entertained of myself. If
his majesty has any particular wish to close this
American business, let him have a certain
convention
burnt, and a nameless person promoted,
and we shall see! But, answer as you love
truth; is it a business of holy matrimony, or a
mere dalliance with the sweets of Cupid?
Of honest wedlock, said Manual, with an
air as serious as if Hymen already held him in
his fetters.
'Tis honest! Is there money?
Is there money? repeated Manual, with a
sort of contemptuous echo. Would a soldier
part with his liberty, but with his life, unless the
chains were made of gold?
That's the true military doctrine! cried the
other; faith, you have some discretion in your
amphibious corps, I find! But why this disguise,
are the `seniors grave,' as well as `potent and
reverend?' Why this disguise, I again ask?
Why this disguise! repeated Manual, coolly;
Is there any such thing as love in your
regiment
without disguise? With us it is a regular
symptom of the disease.
A most just and discreet description of the
passion, my amphibious comrade! said the
English officer; and yet the symptoms in your
case are attended by some very malignant tokens.
Does your mistress love tar?
No; but she loveth me; and, of course,
whatever attire I choose to appear in.
Still discreet and sagacious! and yet only a
most palpable feint to avoid my direct attack.
You have heard of such a place as Gretna Green,
a little to the north of this, I dare say, my
aquatic
comrade. Am I right?
Gretna Green! said Manual, a little
embarrassed
by his ignorance; some parade
ground, I suppose?
Ay, for those who suffer under the fire of
Master Cupid. A parade ground! well, there is
some artful simplicity in that! But all will not
do with an old campaigner. It is a difficult thing
to impose on an old soldier, my marine friend.
Now listen and answer; and you shall see what
it is to possess a discernmenttherefore deny
nothing
.
You are in love?
I deny nothing, said Manual,
comprehending
at once that this was his safest course.
Your mistress is willing, and the money is
ready, but the old people say, halt!
I am still mute.
'Tis prudent. You say marchGretna Green
is the object; and your flight is to be by water?
Unless I can make my escape by water, I
shall never make it, said Manual, with another
sympathetic movement with his hand to his
throat.
Keep mute; you need tell me nothing. I can
see into a mystery that is as deep as a well, to
night. Your companions are hirelings; perhaps
your shipmates; or men to pilot you on this
expedition
?
One is my shipmate, and the other is our
pilot, said Manual, with more truth than usual.
You are well provided. One thing more,
and I shall become mute in my turn. Does she
whom you seek lie in this house?
She does not; she lies but a short distance from
this place; and I should be a happy fellow, could
I but once more put
Eyes on her. Now listen, and you shall have
your wish. You possess the ability to march yet,
which, considering the lateness of the hour, is no
trifling privilege; open that windowis it
possible
to descend from it?
Manual eagerly complied, but he turned from
the place in disappointment.
It would be certain death to attempt the leap.
The devil only could escape from it.
So I should think, returned Borroughcliffe
dryly. You must be content to pass for that
respectable gentleman for the rest of your days,
in St. Ruth's Abbey. For through that identical
hole must you wing your flight on the pinions of
love.
But how! The thing is impossible.
In imagination only. There is some stir; a
good deal of foolish apprehension; and a great
excess of idle curiosity, among certain of the
tenants of this house on your account. They
fear the rebels, who, we all know, have not
soldiers
enough to do their work neatly at home,
and who of course would never think of sending
any here. You wish to be snugI wish to serve
a brother in distress. Through that window you
must be supposed to flyno matter how; while
by following me you can pass the sentinel, and
retire peaceably, like any other mortal, on your
own two stout legs.
This was a result that exceeded all that Manual
had anticipated from their amicable but droll
dialogue
;
and the hint was hardly given, before he
threw on the garments that agitation had before
rendered such encumbrances, and in less time
than we have taken to relate it, the marine was
completely equipped for his departure. In the
mean time, Captain Borroughcliffe raised himself
to an extremely erect posture, which he
maintained
,
with the inflexibility of a rigid martinet.
When he found himself established on his feet,
the soldier intimated to his prisoner that he was
ready to proceed. The door was instantly opened
by Manual, and together they entered the
gallery
.
Who comes there? cried the sentinel, with
a vigilance and vigour that he intended should
compensate for his previous neglect of duty.
Walk straight, that he may see you, said
Borroughcliffe, with much philosophy.
Who goes there! repeated the sentinel,
throwing his musket to a poise, with a rattling
sound that echoed along the naked walls.
Walk crooked, added Borroughcliffe, that
if he fire he may miss.
We shall be shot at, with this folly, muttered
Manual. We are friends, and your officer is
one of us.
Stand friendsadvance officer and give the
countersign, cried the sentinel.
That is much easier said than done, returned
his captain; forward! Mr. Amphibious, you can
walk like a postmanmove to the front, and
proclaim
the magical word, `loyalty;' 'tis a
standing
countersign, ready furnished to my hands by
mine host, the colonel; your road is then clear
before youbut hark
Manual made an eager step forward, when,
recollecting
himself, he turned, and added
My assistants, the seamen! I can do nothing
without them.
Lo! the keys are in the doors, ready for my
admission, said the Englishman; turn them
and bring out your forces.
Quick as thought, Manual was in the room of
Griffith, to whom he briefly communicated the
situation of things, when he re-appeared in the
passage, and then proceeded on a similar errand
to the room of the pilot.
Follow, and behave as usual, he whispered;
say not a word, but trust all to me.
The pilot arose, and obeyed these instructions
without asking a question, with the most
admirable
coolness.
I am now ready to proceed, said Manual,
when they had joined Borroughcliffe.
During the short time occupied in these
arrangements
,
the sentinel and his captain had stood
looking at each other, with great military
exactitude
.
VOL. I. 18
The former ambitious of manifesting his
watchfulness; the latter awaiting the return of
the marine. The captain now beckoned to
Manual
to advance and give the countersign.
Loyalty, whispered Manual, when he
approached
the sentinel. But the soldier had been
allowed time to reflect; and as he well understood
the situation of his officer, he hesitated to allow
the prisoner to pass. After a moment's pause, he
said
Advance friends. At this summons, the
whole party moved to the point of his bayonet;
when the man continued, The prisoners have
the countersign, Captain Borroughcliffe, but I
dare not let them pass.
Why not? asked the captain; am I not
here, sirrah; do you not know me?
Yes, sir, I know your honour, and respect
your honour; but I was posted here by my
sergeant
,
and ordered not to let these men pass out
on any account.
That's what I call good discipline, said
Borroughcliffe, with an exulting laugh; I knew
the lad would not mind me any more than that he
would obey the orders of that lamp. Here are
no slaves of the lamp, my amphibious comrade;
drill ye your marines in this consummate style to
niceties?
What means this trifling? said the pilot,
sternly.
Ah! I thought I should turn the laugh on
you, cried Manual, affecting to join in the mirth;
we know all these things well, and we practise
them in our corps; but though the sentinel
cannot
know you, the sergeant will; so let him be
called, and orders be given through him to the
man on post, that we may pass out.
Your throat grows uneasy, I see, said
Borroughcliffe
;
you crave another bottle of the
generous fluid. Well, it shall be done. Sentinel,
you can throw up yon window, and give a call
to the sergeant.
The outcry will ruin us, said the pilot, in a
whisper to Griffith.
Follow me, said the young sailor. The
sentinel was turning to execute the orders of his
captain, as Griffith spoke; when springing
forward
,
in an instant he wrenched the musket from
his hands; a heavy blow with its butt, felled the
astonished soldier to the floor; then, poising his
weapon, Griffith exclaimed
Forward! we can clear our own way now!
On! said the pilot, leaping lightly over the
prostrate soldier, a dagger gleaming in one hand,
and a pistol presented in the other.
Manual was by his side in an instant, armed in
a similar manner; and the three rushed together
from the building, without meeting any one to
oppose
their flight.
Borroughcliffe was utterly unable to follow;
and so astounded was he by this sudden violence,
that several minutes passed before he was restored
to the use of his speech, a faculty which seldom
deserted him. The man had recovered his senses
and his feet, however; and the two stood gazing
at each other in mute condolence. At length the
sentinel broke the silence
Shall I give the alarm, your honour?
I rather think not, Peters. I wonder if there
be any such thing as gratitude or good breeding
in the marine corps!
I hope your honour will remember that I did
my duty, and that I was disarmed while executing
your orders.
I can remember nothing about it, Peters,
except
that it is rascally treatment, and such as I
shall yet make this amphibious, aquatic
gentleman
answer for. But, lock the doorlook as if
nothing had happened, and
Ah! your honour, that is not so easily done
as your honour may please to think. I have not
any doubt but there is the print of the breech of
a musket stamped on my back and shoulders, as
plainly to be seen as that light.
Then look as you please; but hold your
peace, sirrah. Here is a crown to buy a plaster.
I heard the dog throw away your musket on the
stairsgo seek it, and return to your post; and
when you are relieved, act as if nothing had
happened
.
I take the responsibility on myself.
The man obeyed, and when he was once more
armed, Borroughcliffe, a good deal sobered by
the surprise, made the best of his way to his own
apartment, muttering threats and execrations
against the corps of marines, and the whole
race, as he called them, of aquatic amphibii.
CHAPTER XVI.
Away! away! the covey's fled the cover;
Put forth the dogs, and let the falcon fly
I'll spend some leisure in the keen pursuit,
Nor longer waste my hours in sluggish quiet.
The
soldier passed the remainder of the night
in the heavy sleep of a bacchanalian, and awoke
late on the following morning, only when aroused
by the entrance of his servant. When the
customary
summons had induced the captain to
unclose
his eye-lids, he arose in his bed, and after
performing the usual operation of a diligent
friction
on his organs of vision, he turned sternly to
his man, and remarked, with an ill-humour that
seemed to implicate the innocent servant in the
fault which his master condemned
I thought, sirrah, that I ordered Sergeant
Drill not to let a drum-stick touch a sheep-skin
while we quartered in the dwelling of this
hospitable
old colonel! Does the fellow despise my
commands; or does he think the roll of a drum,
echoing through the crooked passages of St. Ruth,
a melody that is fit to disturb the slumbers of its
inmates!
I believe, sir, returned the man, it was
the wish of Colonel Howard himself, that on this
18*
occasion the sergeant should turn out the guard
by the roll of the drum.
The devil it was! I see the old fellow loves
to tickle the drum of his own ear now and then,
with familiar sounds; but have you had a muster
of the cattle from the farm-yard too, as well as a
parade of the guard? I hear the trampling of
feet, as if the old abbey were a second ark, and
all the beasts of the field were coming aboard
of us!
'Tis nothing but the party of dragoons from
, who are wheeling into the court-yard, sir,
where the colonel has gone out to receive them.
Court-yard! light dragoons! repeated
Borroughcliffe
,
in amazement; and has it come to
this, that twenty stout fellows of theth are not
enough to guard such a rookery as this old abbey,
against the ghosts and north-east storms, but we
must have horse to reinforce us. Hum! I
suppose
some of these booted gentlemen have heard
of this South-Carolina Madeira.
Oh, no, Sir! cried his man, it is only
the party that Mr. Dillon went to seek last
evening
,
after you saw fit, sir, to put the three pirates
in irons.
Pirates in irons! said Borroughcliffe, again
passing his hands over his eyes, though in a more
reflecting manner than before; ha! oh! I
remember
to have put three suspicious looking
rascals
in the black-hole, or some such place; but
what can Mr. Dillon, or the light dragoons, have
to do with these fellows?
That we do not know, sir; but it is said
below
,
sir, as some suspicions had fallen on their
being conspirators and rebels from the colonies,
and that they were great officers and tories in
disguise
;
some said that one was General
Washington
,
and others, that it was only three members
of the Yankee parliament, come over to get our
good old English fashions, to set themselves up
with.
Washington! Members of Congress! Go
go, simpleton, and learn how many these troopers
muster, and what halt they make; but stay,
place my clothes near me. Now, do as I bid
you; and if the dragoon officer inquire for me,
make my respects, and tell him I shall be with
him soon. Go, fellow; go.
When the man left the room, the captain, while
he proceeded with the business of the toilet,
occasionally
gave utterance to the thoughts that
crowded on his recollection, after the manner of
a soliloquy.
Ay! my commission to a half-pay ensigncy,
that some of these lazy fellows, who must have a
four-legged beast to carry them to the wars, have
heard of the `south side.' South side! I believe I
must put an advertisement in the London Gazette,
calling that amphibious soldier to an account.
If he be a true man, he will not hide himself
under
his incognito, but will give me a meeting.
If that should fail, damme, I'll ride across to
Yarmouth, and call out the first of the mongrel
breed that I fall in with. 'Sdeath! was ever such
an insult practised on a gentleman, and a soldier,
before! Would that I only knew his name!
Why, if the tale should get abroad, I shall be the
standing joke of the mess-table, until some greater
fool than myself can be found. It would cost
me at least six duels to get rid of it. No, no;
not a trigger will I pull in my own regiment
about the silly affair; but I'll have a crack at
some marine in very revenge; for that is no more
than reasonable. That Peters! if the scoundrel
should dare whisper any thing of the manner in
which he was stamped with the breech of the
musket! I can't flog him for it, but if I don't
make it up to him, the first time he gives me a
chance, I am ignorant of the true art of
balancing
regimental accounts.
By the time the recruiting officer had
concluded
this soliloquy, which affords a very fair
exposition
of the current of his thoughts, he was
prepared
to meet the new comers, and he accordingly
descended to the court-yard, as in duty bound, to
receive them in his proper person.
Borroughcliffe
encountered his host, in earnest
conversation
with a young man in a cavalry uniform, in
the principal entrance of the abbey, and was
greeted by the former with
A good morning to you, my worthy guard
and protector! here is rare news for your loyal
ears. It seems that our prisoners are enemies to
the king in disguise; and Cornet Fitzgerald
Captain Borroughcliffe, of the th, permit
me to make you acquainted with Mr. Fitzgerald,
of the th Light Dragoons. While the
soldiers
exchanged their salutations, the old man
continuedThe cornet has been kind enough
to lead down a detachment of his troop, to escort
the rogues up to London, or some other place,
where they will find enough good and loyal
officers
to form a court martial, that can authorize
their execution as spies. Christopher Dillon,
my worthy kinsman, Kit, saw into their real
characters, at a glance, while you and I, like
two unsuspecting boys, thought the rascals would
have made fit men to serve the king. But Kit
has an eye and a head that few enjoy like him,
and I would that he might receive his dues at the
English bar.
It is to be desired, sir, said Borroughcliffe,
with a grave aspect, that was produced chiefly by
his effort to give effect to his sarcasm, but a little,
also, by the recollection of the occurrences that
were yet to be explained; but what reason has
Mr. Christopher Dillon to believe that the three
seamen are more or less than they seem?
I know not what; but a good and sufficient
reason, I will venture my life, cried the colonel;
Kit is a lad for reasons, which you know is the
foundation of his profession, and knows how to
deliver them manfully in the proper place; but
you know, gentlemen, that the members of the
bar cannot assume the open and bold front that
becomes a soldier, without often endangering the
cause in which they are concerned. No, no,
trust me, Kit has his reasons, and in good time
will he deliver them.
I hope, then, said the captain, carelessly,
that it may be found that we have had a
proper
watch on our charge, Colonel Howard; I
think you told me the windows were too high for
an escape in that direction, for I had no sentinel
outside of the building.
Fear nothing, my worthy friend, cried his
host; unless your men have slept, instead of
watching, we have them safe; but, as it will be
necessary to convey them away before any of the
civil authority can lay hands on them, let us
proceed
to the rear, and unkennel the dogs. A party of
the horse might proceed with them to, while
we are breaking our fasts. It would be no wise
thing to let the civilians deal with them, for they
seldom have a true idea of the nature of the
crime.
Pardon me, sir, said the young officer of
horse; I was led to believe, by Mr. Dillon, that
we might meet with a party of the enemy in some
little force, and that I should find a pleasanter
duty than that of a constable; besides, sir, the
laws of the realm guaranty to the subject a trial
by his peers, and it is more than I dare do to
carry the men to the barracks, without first
taking them before a magistrate.
Ay! you speak of loyal and dutiful
subjects
,
said the colonel; and, as respects them,
doubtless, you are right; but such privileges are
withheld from enemies and traitors.
It must be first proved that they are such,
before they can receive the treatment or the
punishment
that they merit, returned the young
man, a little positively, who felt the more
confidence
,
because he had only left the Temple the
year before. If I take charge of the men at
all, it will be only to transfer them safely to the
civil authority.
Let us go, and see the prisoners, cried
Borroughcliffe
,
with a view to terminate a discussion
that was likely to wax warm, and which he knew
to be useless; perhaps they may quietly enrol
themselves under the banners of our sovereign,
when all other interference, save that of
wholesome
discipline, will become unnecessary.
Nay, if they are of a rank in life to
render
such a step probable, returned the cornet,
I am well content that the matter should be
thus settled. I trust, however, that Captain
Borroughcliffe will consider that the th
light dragoons has some merit in this affair, and
that we are far short of our numbers in the second
squadron.
We shall not be difficult at a compromise,
returned the captain; there is one a piece for
us, and a toss of a guinea shall determine who
has the third man. Sergeant! follow, to deliver
over your prisoners, and relieve your sentry.
As they proceeded, in compliance with this
arrangement
,
to the building in the rear, Colonel
Howard, who made one of the party, observed
I dispute not the penetration of Captain
Borroughcliffe, but I understand Mr. Christopher
Dillon that there is reason to believe one of these
men, at least, to be of a class altogether above
that of a common soldier, in which case your
plans may fall to the ground.
And who does he deem the gentleman to be?
asked BorroughcliffeA Bourbon in disguise,
or a secret representative of the rebel congress?
Nay, nay; he said nothing more; my
kinsman
Kit keeps a close mouth, whenever Dame
Justice is about to balance her scales. There are
men who may be said to have been born to be
soldiers; of which number I should call the Earl
Cornwallis, who makes such head against the
rebels in the two Carolinas; others seem to be
intended
by nature for divines, and saints on earth,
such as their Graces of York and Canterbury;
while another class appear as if it were
impossible
for them to behold things, unless with
discriminating
,
impartial, and disinterested eyes; to
which, I should say, belong my Lord Chief
Justice
Mansfield, and my kinsman, Mr. Christopher
Dillon. I trust, gentlemen, that when the royal
arms have crushed this rebellion, that his majesty's
ministers will see the propriety of extending the
dignity of the peerage to the colonies, as a means
of reward to the loyal, and a measure of policy,
to prevent future disaffection; in which case, I
hope to see my kinsman decorated with the
ermine
of justice, bordering the mantle of a peer.
Your expectations, my excellent sir, are
right reasonable, as I doubt not your kinsman
will become, at some future day, that which he is
not at present, unhappily for his deserts, right
honourable, said Borroughcliffe. But be of
good heart, sir, from what I have seen of his
merits, I doubt not that the law will yet have its
revenge in due season, and that we shall be
properly
edified and instructed how to attain
elevation
in life, by the future exaltation of Mr.
Christopher
Dillon; though by what title he is to be then
known, I am at a loss to say.
Colonel Howard was too much occupied with
his own ex parte views of the war and things in
general, to observe the shrewd looks that were
exchanged between the soldiers; but he answered
with perfect simplicity
I have reflected much on that point; and have
come to the opinion, that as he has a small estate
on that river, he should cause his first barony to
be known by the title of `Pedee.'
Barony! echoed Borroughcliffe; I trust the
new nobles of a new world will disdain the old
worn out distinctions of a hackneyed universe
eschew all baronies, mine host, and cast earldoms
and dukedoms to the shades. The immortal
Locke has unlocked his fertile mind to furnish
you with appellations suited to the originality of
your condition, and the nature of your country.
Ah! here comes the Cacique of Pedee, in his
proper person!
As Borroughcliffe spoke, they were ascending
the flight of stone steps which led to the upper
apartments, where the prisoners were still
supposed
to be confined; and, at the same moment,
the sullen, gloomy features of Dillon were seen
as he advanced along the lower passage, with an
expression of malicious exultation hovering above
his dark brow, that denoted his secret
satisfaction
.
As the hours had passed away, the period
had come round when the man who had been
present
at the escape of Griffith and his friends, was
again posted to perform the duty of sentinel. As
this soldier well knew the situation of his trust,
he was very coolly adjusted, with his back against
the wall, endeavouring to compensate himself for
his disturbed slumbers during the night, when the
sounds of the approaching footsteps warned him
to assume the appearance of watchfulness.
How now, fellow! cried Borroughcliffe;
what have you to say of your charge?
I believe the men sleep, your honour; for I
have heard no noises from the rooms since I
relieved
the last sentinel.
The lads are weary, and are right to catch
what sleep they can in their comfortable
quarters
,
returned the captain. Stand to your arms,
sirrah! and throw back your shoulders; and do
not move like a crab, or a train-band corporal;
do you not see an officer of horse coming up?
Would you disgrace your regiment!
Ah! your honour, Heaven only knows
whether
I shall ever get my shoulders even again.
Buy another plaster, said Borroughcliffe,
slipping a shilling into his hand; observe, you
know nothing but your duty.
Which is, your honour
To mind me and be silent. But here comes
the sergeant with his guard, he will relieve you.
The rest of the party had stopped at the other
end of the gallery, to allow the few files of
soldiers
,
who were led by the orderly, to pass them,
when they all moved toward the prisons in a
body. The sentinel was relieved in due military
style; when Dillon placed his hand on one of the
doors, and said, with a malicious sneer,
Open here first, Mr. Sergeant; this cage holds
the man we most want.
Softly, softly, my Lord Chief Justice, and
most puissant Cacique, said the captain; the
hour has not yet come to empannel a jury of fat
yeomen, and no man must interfere with my boys
but myself.
VOL. I. 19
The rebuke is harsh, I must observe,
Captain
Borroughcliffe, said the colonel; but I
pardon it because it is military. No, no, Kit;
these nice points must be left to martial usages.
Be not impatient, my cousin; I doubt not the hour
will come, when you shall hold the scales of
justice
,
and satisfy your loyal longings on many a
traitor. Zounds! I could almost turn executioner
myself in such a cause!
I can curb my impatience, sir, returned Dillon,
with hypocritical meekness, and great
self-command
,
though his eyes were gleaming with savage
exultation. I beg pardon of Captain
Borroughcliffe
,
if, in my desire to render the civil
authority
superior to the military, I have trespassed on
your customs.
You see, Borroughcliffe! exclaimed the
colonel
,
exultingly, the lad is ruled by an instinct
in all matters of law and justice. I hold it to be
impossible that a man thus endowed can ever
become
a disloyal subject. But our breakfast
waits, and Mr. Fitzgerald has breathed his horse
this cool morning; let us proceed to the
examination
.
Borroughcliffe motioned to the sergeant to
open the door, when the whole party entered the
vacant room.
Your prisoner has escaped! cried the cornet,
after a single moment employed in making sure
of the fact.
Never! it must not, shall not be, cried
Dillon
,
quivering with rage, as he glanced his eyes
furiously around the apartment; here has been
treachery! and foul treason to the king!
By whom committed, Mr. Christopher
Dillon
?
said Borroughcliffe, knitting his brow,
and speaking in a suppressed tone; dare you,
or any man living, charge treason to theth?
A very different feeling from rage appeared
now to increase the shivering propensities of the
future judge, who at once perceived it was
necessary
to moderate his passion, and he returned, as
it were by magic, to his former plausible and
insinuating
manner, as he replied
Colonel Howard will understand the cause of
my warm feelings, when I tell him, that this very
room contained, last night, that disgrace to his
name and country, as well as traitor to his king,
Edward Griffith, of the rebel navy.
What! exclaimed the colonel, starting,
has that recreant youth dared to pollute the
threshold of St. Ruth with his footstep! but you
dream, Kit; there would be too much hardihood
in the act.
It appears not, sir, returned the other; for
though in this very apartment he most certainly
was, he is here no longer. And yet from this
window, though open, escape would seem to be
impossible, even with much assistance.
If I thought that the contumelious boy had
dared to be guilty of such an act of gross
impudence
,
cried the colonel, I should be tempted
to resume my arms, in my old age, to punish his
effrontery. What! it is not enough that he
entered
my dwelling in the colony, availing himself
of the distraction of the times, with an intent to
rob me of my choicest jewel, ay! gentlemen,
even of my brother Harry's daughterbut that
he must also invade this hallowed island, with a
like purpose, thus thrusting his treason, as it
were, into the presence of his abused prince!
No, no, Kit, thy loyalty misleads thee; he has
never dared to do the deed!
Listen, sir, and you shall be convinced,
returned
the pliant Christopher. I do not
wonder
at your unbelief; but as good testimony is the
soul of justice, I cannot resist its influence. You
know, that two vessels, corresponding in
appearance
to the two rebel cruisers that annoyed us so
much in the Carolinas, have been seen on the
coast for several days, which induced us to beg
the protection of Captain Borroughcliffe. Three
men are found, the day succeeding that on which
we hear that these vessels came within the shoals,
stealing through the grounds of St. Ruth, in
sailors' attire. They are arrested, and in the
voice of one of them, sir, I immediately detected
that of the traitor Griffith. He was disguised, it
is true, and cunningly so; but when a man has
devoted his whole life to the business of
investigating
truth, he added, with an air of much
modesty
,
it is difficult to palm any disguise on his
senses.
Colonel Howard was strongly impressed with
the probability of these conjectures, and the
closing appeal confirmed him immediately in his
kinsman's opinion, while Borroughcliffe listened,
with deep interest, to the speakers, and more
than once bit his lip with vexation. When Dillon
concluded, the soldier exclaimed
I'll swear there was a man among them, who
has been used to the drill.
Nothing more probable, my worthy friend,
said Dillon; for as the landing was never made
without some evil purpose, rely on it, he came
not unguarded or unprotected. I dare say, the
three were all officers, and one of them might
have been of the marines. That they had
assistance
is certain, and it was because I felt
assured
they had a force secreted at hand, that I went
in quest of the reinforcement.
There was so much plausibility, and, in fact, so
much truth, in all this, that conviction was
unwillingly
admitted by Borroughcliffe, who walked
aside, a moment, to conceal the confusion which,
in spite of his ordinary inflexibility of
countenance
,
he felt was manifesting itself in his rubric
visage, while he muttered
The amphibious dog! he was a soldier, but
a traitor and an enemy. No doubt he will have
a marvellous satisfaction in delighting the
rebellious
ears of his messmates, by rehearsing the
manner
in which he poured cold water down the back
of one Borrouglicliffe, of the th, who was
amusing him, at the same time, by pouring good,
rich south-side Madeira down his own rebellious
throat. I have a good mind to exchange my
scarlet coat for a blue jacket, on purpose to meet
the sly rascal on the other element, where we can
discuss this matter over again. Well, sergeant,
do you find the other two?
They are gone together, your honour,
returned
the orderly, who just then re-entered from
an examination of the other apartments; and
unless the evil one helped them off, it's a
mysterious
business to me.
Colonel Howard, said Borroughcliffe,
gravely
,
your precious south-side cordial must be
banished from the board, regularly with the cloth,
until I have my revenge; for satisfaction of this
insult is mine to claim, and I seek it this instant.
Go, Drill; detail a guard for the protection of the
house, and feed the rest of your command, then
beat the general, and we will take the field. Ay!
my worthy veteran host, for the first time since
the days of the unlucky Charles Stuart, there
shall be a campaign in the heart of England.
Ah! rebellion, rebellion! accursed, unnatural,
unholy rebellion, caused the calamity then and
now! exclaimed the colonel.
Had I not better take a hasty refreshment for
my men and their horses? asked the cornet;
19*
and then make a sweep for a few miles along
the coast? It may be my luck to encounter the
fugitives, or some part of their force.
You have anticipated my very thoughts,
returned
Borroughcliffe. The Cacique of Pedee
may close the gates of St. Ruth, and, by barring
the windows, and arming the servants, he can
make a very good defence against an attack,
should they think proper to assail our fortress;
after he has repulsed them, leave it to me to cut
off their retreat.
Dillon but little relished this proposal; for he
thought an attempt to storm the abbey would be
the most probable course adopted by Griffith, in
order to rescue his mistress; and the jurist had
none of the spirit of a soldier in his composition.
In truth, it was this deficiency that had induced
him to depart in person, the preceding night, in
quest of the reinforcement, instead of sending an
express on the errand. But the necessity of
devising
an excuse for a change in this dangerous
arrangement, was obviated by Colonel Howard,
who exclaimed, as soon as Borroughcliffe
concluded
his plan
To me, Captain Borroughcliffe, belongs of
right, the duty of defending St. Ruth, and it
shall be no boy's play to force my works; but
Kit would rather try his chance in the open field,
I know. Come, let us to our breakfast, and then
he shall mount, and act as guide to the horse,
along the difficult passes of the seashore.
To breakfast then let it be, cried the
captain
;
I distrust not my new commander of the
fortress; and in the field the Cacique for ever!
We follow you, my worthy host.
This arrangement was hastily executed in all
its parts. The gentlemen swallowed their meal
in the manner of men who ate only to sustain
nature
,
and as a duty; after which the whole house
became a scene of bustling activity. The troops
were mustered and paraded; Borroughcliffe,
setting apart a guard for the building, placed
himself at the head of the remainder of his little
party, and they moved out of the court-yard in
open order, and at quick time. Dillon joyfully
beheld himself mounted on one of the best of
Colonel Howard's hunters, where he knew that
he had the control, in a great measure, of his own
destiny; his bosom throbbing with a powerful
desire
to destroy Griffith, while he entertained a
lively wish to effect his object without incurring any
personal risk. At his side was the young cornet,
seated with practised grace in his saddle, who,
after giving time for the party of foot soldiers to
clear the premises, glanced his eye along the few
files he led, and then gave the word to move.
The little division of horse wheeled briskly into
open column, and the officer, touching his cap to
Colonel Howard, they dashed through the
gateway
together, and pursued their route towards
the seaside, at a hand gallop.
The veteran lingered a few minutes, while the
clattering of hoofs was to be heard, or the
gleam of arms was visible, to hear and gaze at
sounds and sights that he still loved; after which,
he proceeded, in person, and not without a secret
enjoyment of the excitement, to barricado the
doors and windows, with an undaunted
determination
of making, in case of need, a stout
defence
.
St. Ruth lay but a short two miles from the
ocean; to which numerous roads led, through the
grounds of the abbey, which extended to the
shore. Along one of these paths, Dillon
conducted
his party, until, after a few minutes of hard
riding, they approached the cliffs, when, posting
his troopers under cover of a little copse, the
cornet rode in advance, with his guide, to the
verge of the perpendicular rocks, whose bases
were washed by the foam that was still capped in
white sheets from the surges of the subsiding sea.
The gale had broken, before the escape of the
prisoners, and as the power of the eastern
tempest
had gradually diminished, a light current
from the south, that blew directly along the land,
prevailed; and, though the ocean still rolled
in fearful billows, their surfaces were smooth, and
they were becoming, at each moment, less
precipitous
,
and more regular. The eyes of the
horse-men
were cast in vain over the immense expanse
of water, that was glistening brightly under the
rays of the sun, which had just risen from its
bosom
,
in quest of some object or distant sail, that
might confirm their suspicions, or relieve their
doubts. But every thing of that description
appeared
to have avoided the dangerous navigation,
during the violence of the late tempest, and
Dillon
was withdrawing his eyes in disappointment,
from the vacant view, when, as they fell towards
the shore, he beheld that which caused him to
exclaim
There they go! and, by Heaven, they will
escape!
The cornet looked in the direction of the
other's finger, when he beheld, at a short distance
from the land, and apparently immediately under
his feet, a little boat, that looked like a dark
shell upon the water, rising and sinking amid
the waves, as if the men it obviously contained,
were resting on their oars in idle expectation.
'Tis they! continued Dillon; or, what is
more probable, it is their boat waiting to convey
them to their vessel; no common business would
induce seamen to lie in this careless manner,
within such a narrow distance of the surf.
And what is to be done? They cannot be
made to feel horse where they are; nor would the
muskets of the foot touch them. A light three
pounder would do its work handsomely on
them!
The strong desire which Dillon entertained to
intercept, or rather to destroy the party,
rendered
him prompt at expedients. After a moment
of musing, he replied
The runaways must yet be on the land; and
by scouring the coast, and posting men at proper
places, their retreat can easily be prevented; in
the mean time I will ride under the spur to
bay, where one of his majesty's cutters now lies
at anchorIt is but half an hour of hard riding,
and I can be on board of her. The wind blows
directly in her favour, and if we can once bring
her down behind that headland, we shall infallibly
cut off or sink these midnight depredators.
Off, then! cried the cornet, whose young
blood was boiling for a skirmish; you will at
least drive them to the shore, where I can deal
with them.
The words were hardly uttered, before Dillon
was out of sight, after galloping furiously along
the cliffs, and turning short into a thick wood,
that lay in his route. The loyalty of this
gentleman
was altogether of a calculating nature, and
was intimately connected with what he considered
his fealty to himself. He believed that the
possession
of Miss Howard's person and fortune
were advantages that would much more than
counterbalance any elevation that he was likely
to obtain by the revolution of affairs in his native
colony. He considered Griffith as the only
natural
obstacle to his success, and he urged his
horse forward with a desperate determination to
work the ruin of the young sailor, before another
sun had set. When a man labours in an evil
cause, with such feelings, and with such
incentives
,
he seldom slights or neglects his work; and
Mr. Dillon, accordingly, was on board the
Alacrity
,
several minutes short of the time in which
he had promised to perform the distance.
The plain old seaman, who commanded the
cutter, listened to his tale with cautious ears;
and examined into the state of the weather, and
other matters, connected with his duty, with
the slow and deliberative decision of one who
had never done much to acquire a confidence in
himself, and who had been but niggardly
rewarded
for the little he had actually performed.
As Dillon was urgent, however, and the day
seemed propitious, he at length decided to act as
he was desired, and the cutter was accordingly
gotten under way.
A crew of something less than fifty men,
moved with no little of their commander's
deliberation
;
but as the little vessel rounded the
point behind which she had been anchored, her
guns were cleared, and the usual preparations
were completed for immediate and actual
service
.
Dillon, sorely against his will, was compelled
to continue on board, in order to point out the
place where the unsuspecting boatmen were
expected
to be entrapped. Every thing being
ready, when they had gained a safe distance
from the land, the Alacrity was kept away
before
the wind, and glided along the shore, with
a swift and easy progress, that promised a
speedy execution of the business in which her
commander had embarked.
CHAPTER XVII.
Pol
.
Very like a whale.
Shakspeare
.
Notwithstanding
the object of their
expedition
was of a public nature, the feelings which
had induced both Griffith and Barnstable to
accompany
the pilot, with so much willingness, it
will easily be seen, were entirely personal. The
short intercourse that he had maintained with his
associates, enabled the mysterious leader of their
party to understand the characters of his two
principal officers so thoroughly, as to induce him,
when he landed, with the purpose of
reconnoitring
to ascertain whether the objects of his
pursuit
still held their determination to assemble at
the appointed hour, to choose Griffith and Manual
as his only associates, leaving Barnstable in
command
of his own vessel, to await their return, and
to cover their retreat. A good deal of
argument
,
and some little of the authority of his
superior
officer, was necessary to make Barnstable
quietly acquiesce in this arrangement; but as his
good sense told him that nothing should be
unnecessarily
hazarded, until the moment to strike
the final blow had arrived, he became gradually
more resigned, taking care, however, to caution
Griffith to reconnoitre the abbey at the same
time they were reconnoitring  house. It
was the strong desire of the latter to comply with
this injunction, which carried them a little out of
their proper path, and led to the consequences
that we have partly related. The evening of that
day was the time when the pilot intended to
complete his enterprise, thinking to entrap his
game while enjoying the festivities that usually
succeeded
their sports, and an early hour in the
morning
was appointed when Barnstable should appear
at the nearest point to the abbey, to take off his
countrymen, in order that they might be as little
as possible subjected to the gaze of their enemies,
by daylight. If they failed to arrive at the
appointed
time, his instructions were, to return to
his schooner, which lay snugly embayed in a
secret and retired haven, that but few ever
approached
,
either by land or water.
While the young cornet still continued gazing
at the whale-boat, (for it was the party from the
schooner that he saw,) the hour had expired for the
appearance of Griffith and his companions, and
Barnstable reluctantly determined to comply with
the letter of his instructions, and to leave them
to their own sagacity and skill to regain the Ariel.
The boat had been suffered to ride in the edge of
the surf, since the appearance of the sun, and the
eyes of her crew were kept anxiously fixed on
the cliffs, though in vain, to discover the signal
that was to call them to the place of landing.
After looking at his watch for the twentieth time,
and as often casting glances of uneasy
dissatisfaction
towards the shore, the lieutenant
exclaimed
A charming prospect, this, Master Coffin,
but rather too much poetry in it for your taste; I
believe you relish no land that is of a harder
consistency than mud!
I was born on the waters, sir, returned the
cockswain, from his snug abode, where he was
disposed with his usual economy of room, and
it's according to all things for a man to love his
natyve soil. I'll not deny, Captain Barnstable,
but I would rather drop my anchor on a bottom
that won't broom a keel, but, at the same time, I
harbour no great malice against dry land.
I shall never forgive it, myself, if any
accident
has befallen Griffith, in this excursion,
rejoined
the lieutenant; his pilot may be a better
man on the water than on terra firma, long
Tom.
The cockswain turned his solemn visage, with
an extraordinary meaning, towards his
commander
,
before he replied
For as long a time as I've followed the
waters
,
sir, and that has been ever since I've drawn
my rations, seeing that I was born while the boat
was crossing Nantucket shoals, I've never known
a pilot come off in greater need, than the one we
fell in with, when we made that stretch or two on
the land, in the dog-watch of yesterday.
Ay! the fellow has played his part like a
man; the occasion was great, and it seems that
he was quite equal to his work.
The frigate's people tell me, sir, that he
handled
the ship like a top, continued the
cockswain
;
but she is a ship that is a natural inimy
of the bottom!
Can you say as much for this boat, Master
Coffin? cried Barnstable; keep her out of the
surf, or you'll have us rolling in upon the beach,
presently, like an empty water-cask; you must
remember that we cannot all wade, like yourself,
in two-fathom-water.
Vol. I. 20
The cockswain cast a cool glance at the crests
of foam that were breaking over the tops of the
billows, within a few yards of where their boat
was riding, and called aloud to his men
Pull a stroke or two; away with her into
dark water.
The drop of the oars resembled the
movements
of a nice machine, and the light boat
skimmed along the water like a duck, that
approaches
to the very brink of some imminent
danger, and then avoids it, at the most critical
moment, apparently without an effort. While
this necessary movement was making,
Barnstable
arose, and surveyed the cliffs, with keen eyes,
and then turning once more in disappointment
from his search, he said
Pull more from the land, and let her run
down, at an easy stroke, to the schooner. Keep
a look-out at the cliffs, boys; it is possible that
they are stowed in some of the holes in the rocks,
for it's no daylight business they are on.
The order was promptly obeyed, and they had
glided along for near a mile, in this manner, in
the most profound silence, when suddenly the
stillness was broken by a heavy rush of air, and
a dash of the water, seemingly at no great
distance
from them.
By heaven, Tom, cried Barnstable, starting,
there is the blow of a whale.
Ay, ay, sir, returned the cockswain, with
undisturbed composure; here is his spout, not
half a mile to seaward; the easterly gale has
driven the creater to leeward, and he begins to
find himself in shoal water. He's been sleeping,
while he should have been working to
windward
!
The fellow takes it coolly, too! he's in no
hurry to get an offing!
I rather conclude, sir, said the cockswain
rolling over his tobacco in his mouth, very
composedly
,
while his little sunken eyes began to
twinkle
with pleasure at the sight, the gentleman
has lost his reckoning, and don't know which
way to head, to take himself back into blue
water.
'Tis a fin-back! exclaimed the lieutenant;
he will soon make head-way, and be off.
No, sir, 'tis a right whale, answered Tom;
I saw his spout; he threw up a pair of as pretty
rainbows as a Christian would wish to look at.
He's a raal oil-butt, that fellow!
Barnstable laughed, turned himself away from
the tempting sight, and tried to look at the cliffs;
and then unconsciously bent his longing eyes
again on the sluggish animal, who was throwing
his huge carcass, at times, for many feet from the
water, in idle gambols. The temptation for
sport, and the recollection of his early habits, at
length prevailed over his anxiety in behalf of his
friends, and the young officer inquired of his
cockswain
Is there any whale-line in the boat, to make
fast to that harpoon which you bear about with
you in fair weather or foul?
I never trust the boat from the schooner
without part of a shot, sir, returned the
cockswain
;
there is something nateral in the sight
of a tub to my old eyes.
Barnstable looked at his watch, and again at
the cliffs, when he exclaimed, in joyous tones
Give strong way, my hearties! There seems
nothing better to be done; let us have a stroke of
a harpoon at that impudent rascal.
The men shouted spontaneously, and the old
cockswain suffered his solemn visage to relax into
a small laugh, while the whale-boat sprung
forward
like a courser for the goal. During the
few minutes they were pulling towards their
game, long Tom arose from his crouching
attitude
in the stern-sheets, and transferred his huge
frame to the bows of the boat, where he made
such preparations to strike the whale as the
occasion
required. The tub, containing about half of
a whale-line, was placed at the feet of
Barnstable
,
who had been preparing an oar to steer with,
in place of the rudder, which was unshipped, in
order that, if necessary, the boat might be whirled
round, when not advancing.
Their approach was utterly unnoticed by the
monster of the deep, who continued to amuse
himself with throwing the water, in two circular
spouts, high into the air, occasionally flourishing
the broad flukes of his tail with a graceful but
terrific
force, until the hardy seamen were within a
few hundred feet of him, when he suddenly cast
his head downward, and, without an apparent
effort, reared his immense body for many feet
above the water, waving his tail violently, and
producing a whizzing noise, that sounded like
the rushing of winds.
The cockswain stood erect, poising his
harpoon
,
ready for the blow; but when he beheld
the creature assume this formidable attitude, he
waved his hand to his commander, who instantly
signed to his men to cease rowing. In this
situation
the sportsmen rested a few moments, while the
whale struck several blows on the water, in rapid
succession, the noise of which re-echoed along
the cliffs, like the hollow reports of so many
cannon
.
After this wanton exhibition of his terrible
strength, the monster sunk again into his native
element, and slowly disappeared from the eyes of
his pursuers.
Which way did he head, Tom? cried
Barnstable
,
the moment the whale was out of sight.
Pretty much up and down, sir, returned the
cockswain, whose eye was gradually brightening
with the excitement of the sport; he'll soon
run his nose against the bottom, if he stands long
on that course, and will be glad to get another
snuff of pure air; send her a few fathoms to
starboard, sir, and I promise we shall not be out
of his track.
The conjecture of the experienced old seaman
proved true, for, in a few minutes, the water
broke near them, and another spout was cast into
the air, when the huge animal rushed, for half his
length, in the same direction, and fell on the
sea, with a turbulence and foam equal to that
which is produced by the launching of a vessel,
for the first time, into its proper element. After
this evolution, the whale rolled heavily, and
seemed to rest from further efforts.
His slightest movements were closely watched
by Barnstable and his cockswain, and when he
was in a state of comparative rest, the former
gave a signal to his crew, to ply their oars once
more. A few long and vigorous strokes sent the
boat directly up to the broadside of the whale,
with its bows pointing towards one of the fins,
which was, at times, as the animal yielded
sluggishly
to the action of the waves, exposed to
view. The cockswain poised his harpoon, with
much precision, and then darted it from him with
a violence that buried the iron in the blubber of
their foe. The instant the blow was made, long
Tom shouted, with singular earnestness
Starn all!
Stern all! echoed Barnstable; when the
obedient seamen, by united efforts, forced the
boat in a backward direction, beyond the reach of
any blow from their formidable antagonist. The
alarmed animal, however, meditated no such
resistance
;
ignorant of his own power, and of the
20*
insignificance of his enemies, he sought refuge in
flight. One moment of stupid surprise succeeded
the entrance of the iron, when he cast his huge
tail into the air, with a violence that threw the
sea around him into increased commotion, and
then disappeared, with the quickness of
lightning
,
amid a cloud of foam.
Snub him! shouted Barnstable; hold on,
Tom; he rises already.
Ay, ay, sir, replied the composed
cockswain
,
seizing the line, which was running out of
the boat with a velocity that rendered such a
man
uvre
rather hazardous, and causing it to yield
more gradually round the large loggerhead that
was placed in the bows of the boat for that
purpose
.
Presently the line stretched forward, and,
rising to the surface, with tremulous vibrations, it
indicated the direction in which the animal might
be expected to re-appear. Barnstable had cast
the bows of the boat towards that point, before
the terrified and wounded victim rose once more
to the surface, whose time was, however, no longer
wasted in his sports, but who cast the waters
aside, as he forced his way, with prodigious
velocity
,
along their surface. The boat was dragged
violently in his wake, and cut through the
billows
with a terrific rapidity, that, at moments,
appeared
to bury the slight fabric in the ocean.
When long Tom beheld his victim throwing his
spouts on high again, he pointed with exultation
to the jetting fluid, which was streaked with the
deep red of blood, and cried
Ay! I've touched the fellow's life! it must be
more than two foot of blubber that stops my iron
from reaching the life of any whale that ever
sculled the ocean!
I believe you have saved yourself the trouble
of using the bayonet you have rigged for a
lance, said his commander, who entered into
the sport with all the ardour of one whose youth
had been chiefly passed in such pursuits; feel
your line, Master Coffin; can we haul alongside
of our enemy? I like not the course he is
steering
,
as he tows us from the schooner.
'Tis the creater's way, sir, said the
cockswain
;
you know they need the air in their
nostrils, when they run, the same as a man; but
lay hold, boys, and let us haul up to him.
The seamen now seized the whale-line, and
slowly drew their boat to within a few feet of the
tail of the fish, whose progress became sensibly
less rapid, as he grew weak with the loss of blood.
In a few minutes he stopped running, and
appeared
to roll uneasily on the water, as if
suffering
the agony of death.
Shall we pull in, and finish him, Tom? cried
Barnstable; a few sets from your bayonet
would do it.
The cockswain stood examining his game, with
cool discretion, and replied to this
interrogatory
No, sir, nohe's going into his flurry;
there's no occasion for disgracing ourselves by
using a soldier's weapon in taking a whale.
Starn off, sir, starn off! the creater's in his
flurry!
The warning of the prudent cockswain was
promptly obeyed, and the boat cautiously drew
off to a distance, leaving to the animal a clear
space, while under its dying agonies. From a
state of perfect rest, the terrible monster threw its
tail on high, as when in sport, but its blows were
trebled in rapidity and violence, till all was hid
from view by a pyramid of foam, that was deeply
died with blood. The roarings of the fish were
like the bellowings of a herd of bulls, and to one
who was ignorant of the fact, it would have
appeared
as if a thousand monsters were engaged
in deadly combat, behind the bloody mist that
obstructed the view. Gradually, these effects
subsided, and when the discoloured water again
settled down to the long and regular swell of the
ocean, the fish was seen, exhausted, and yielding
passively to its fate. As life departed, the
enormous
black mass rolled to one side, and when
the white and glistening skin of the belly became
apparent, the seamen well knew that their victory
was achieved.
What's to be done now, said Barnstable, as
he stood and gazed with a diminished excitement
at their victim; he will yield no food, and his
carcass will probably drift to land, and furnish
our enemies with the oil.
If I had but that creater in Boston Bay,
said the cockswain, it would prove the making
of me; but such is my luck for ever! Pull up,
at any rate, and let me get my harpoon and line
the English shall never get them while old Tom
Coffin can blow.
Don't speak too fast, said the strokesman
of the boat; whether he gets your iron or not,
here he comes in chase!
What mean you, fellow? cried Barnstable.
Captain Barnstable can look for himself,
returned the seaman, and tell whether I speak
truth.
The young sailor turned, and saw the Alacrity,
bearing down before the wind, with all her sails
set, as she rounded a headland, but a short half
league to windward of the place where the boat
lay.
Pass that glass to me, said the captain with
steady composure. This promises us work in
one of two ways; if she be armed, it has become
our turn to run; if not, we are strong enough to
carry her.
A very brief survey made the experienced
officer
acquainted with the true character of the
vessel
in sight; and, replacing the glass with much
coolness, he said,
That fellow shows long arms, and ten teeth,
beside King George's pennant from his
top-mast-head
.
Now, my lads, you are to pull for your
lives; for whatever may be the notions of Master
Coffin on the subject of his harpoon, I have no
inclination to have my arms pinioned by John
Bull, though his majesty himself put on the
irons.
The men well understood the manner and
meaning
of their commander; and, throwing aside
their coats, they applied themselves in earnest to
their task. For half an hour a profound silence
reigned in the boat, which made an amazing
progress
.
But many circumstances conspired to aid
the cutter; she had a fine breeze, with smooth
water, and a strong tide in her favour; and, at
the expiration of the time we have mentioned, it
was but too apparent that the distance between
the pursued and pursuers was lessened nearly
half. Barnstable preserved his steady
countenance
,
but there was an expression of care
gathering
around his dark brow, which indicated that
he saw the increasing danger of their situation.
That fellow has long legs, Master Coffin,
he said, in a cheerful tone; your whale-line
must go overboard, and the fifth oar must be
handled by your delicate hands.
Tom arose from his seat, and proceeding
forward
,
he cast the tub and its contents together
into the sea, when he seated himself at the bow
oar, and bent his athletic frame with amazing
vigour to the task.
Ah! there is much of your philosophy in
that stroke, long Tom, cried his commander;
keep it up, boys, and if we gain nothing else, we
shall at least gain time for deliberation. Come,
Master Coffin, what think you; we have three
resources
before us, let us hear which is your choice:
first, we can turn and fight and be sunk; secondly,
we can pull to the land, and endeavour to make
good our retreat to the schooner in that manner;
and, thirdly, we can head to the shore, and
possibly
by running under the guns of that fellow,
get the wind of him, and keep the air in our
nostrils
,
after the manner of the whale. Damn the
whale! but for the tow the black rascal gave us, we
should have been out of sight of this rover!
If we fight, said Tom, with quite as much
composure as his commander manifested, we
shall be taken or sunk; if we land, sir, I shall
be taken for one man, as I never could make any
headway on dry ground; and if we try to get
the wind of him by pulling under the cliffs, we
shall be cut off by a parcel of lubbers that I can
see running along their edges, hoping, I dare
say, that they shall be able to get a skulking shot
at a boat's crew of honest seafaring men.
You speak with as much truth as philosophy,
Tom, said Barnstable, who saw his slender
hopes of success curtailed, by the open
appearance
of the horse and foot on the cliffs. These
Englishmen have not slept the last night, and I
fear Griffith and Manual will fare but badly.
That fellow brings a cap full of wind down with
him'tis just his play, and he walks like a
race-horse
.
Ha! he begins to be in earnest!
While Barnstable was speaking, a column of
white smoke was seen issuing from the bows of
the cutter, and as the report of a cannon was
wafted to their ears, the shot was seen skipping
from wave to wave, tossing the water in spray,
and flying to a considerable distance beyond them.
The seamen cast cursory glances in the direction
of the passing ball, but it produced no manifest
effect in either their conduct or appearance. The
cockswain, who scanned its range with an eye of
more practice than the rest, observed, That's
a lively piece for its metal, and it speaks with a
good clear voice; but if they hear it aboard the
Ariel, the man who fired it will be sorry it wasn't
born dumb.
You are the prince of philosophers, Master
Coffin! cried Barnstable; there is some hope
in that; let the Englishman talk away, and my
life on it, the Ariels don't believe it is thunder;
hand me a musketI'll draw another shot.
The piece was given to Barnstable, who
discharged
it several times, as if to taunt their
enemies
,
and the scheme was completely successful.
Goaded by the insults, the cutter discharged gun
after gun at the little boat, throwing the shot
frequently so near as to wet her crew with the
spray, but without injuring them in the least.
The failure of these attempts to injure them,
excited
the mirth of the reckless seamen, instead
of creating any alarm; and whenever a shot
came nearer than common, the cockswain would
utter some such expression as
A ground swell, a long shot, and a small
object
,
make a clean target; or, A man must
squint straight to hit a boat.
As, notwithstanding their unsuccessful
gunnery
,
the cutter was constantly gaining on the
whale-boat, there was a prospect of a speedy
termination of the chase, when the report of a
cannon was thrown back like an echo from
one of the Englishman's discharges, and
Barnstable
and his companions had the pleasure of
seeing the Ariel stretching slowly out of the little
bay where she had passed the night, with the
smoke of the gun of defiance curling above her
taper masts.
A loud and simultaneous shout of rapture was
given by the lieutenant and all his boat's-crew,
at this cheering sight, while the cutter took in all
her light sails, and, as she hauled up on a wind,
she fired a whole broadside at the successful
fugitives
.
Many stands of grape, with several round
shot, flew by the boat, and fell upon the water,
near them, raising a cloud of foam, but without
doing any injury.
She dies in a flurry, said Tom, casting his
eyes at the little vortex into which the boat was
then entering.
If her commander be a true man, cried
Barnstable, he'll not leave us on so short an
acquaintance. Give way, my souls! give way!
I would see more of this loquacious cruiser.
The temptation for exertion was great, and it
was not disregarded by the men; in a few
minutes
the whale-boat reached the schooner, when
the crew of the latter received their commander
and his companions with shouts and cheers that
rung across the waters, and reached the ears of the
disappointed spectators on the verge of the cliffs.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Thus guided, on their course they bore,
Until they near'd the mainland shore;
When frequent on the hollow blast
Wild shouts of merriment were cast.
Lord of the Isles
.
The
joyful shouts and hearty cheers of the
Ariel's crew continued for some time after her
commander had reached her deck. Barnstable
answered the congratulations of his officers by
cordial shakes of the hand, and after waiting for
the ebullition of delight among the seamen
to subside a little, he beckoned with an air of
authority
for silence.
I thank you, my lads, for your good will,
he said, when all were gathered around him in
deep attention; they have given us a tough
chase, and if you had left us another mile to go,
we had been lost. That fellow is a King's cutter,
and though his disposition to run to leeward is a
good deal mollified, yet he shows signs of fight.
At any rate, he is stripping off some of his
clothes, which looks as if he were game. Luckily
for us, Captain Manual has taken all his marines
ashore with him, (though what he has done with
them or himself, is a mystery,) or we should have
had our decks lumbered with live cattle; but, as
VOL. I. 21
it is, we have a good working breeze, tolerably
smooth water, and a dead match! There is a
sort of national obligation on us to whip that
fellow
,
and, therefore, without more words about
the matter, let us turn to and do it, that we may
get our breakfasts.
To this specimen of marine eloquence, the crew
cheered as usual; the young men burning for the
combat, and the few old sailors who belonged to
the schooner, shaking their heads with infinite
satisfaction
,
and swearing by sundry strange oaths,
that their captain could talk, when there was
need of such thing, like the best Dictionary that
ever was launched.
During this short harangue, and the subsequent
comments, the Ariel had been kept, under a cloud
of canvass, as near to the wind as she could lie,
and as this was her best sailing, she had stretched
swiftly out from the land, to a distance whence the
cliffs, and the soldiers who were spread along their
summits, became plainly visible. Barnstable
turned his glass repeatedly, from the cutter to the
shore, as different feelings predominated in his
breast, before he again spoke.
If Mr. Griffith is stowed away among those
rocks, he at length said, he shall see as pretty
an argument discussed, in as few words, as he
ever listened to, provided the gentlemen in
yonder
cutter have not changed their minds as to the
road they intend to journeywhat think you, Mr.
Merry?
I wish with all my heart and soul, sir,
returned
the fearless boy, that Mr. Griffith was
safe aboard us; it seems the country is alarmed,
and God knows what will happen if he is taken!
as to the fellow to windward, he'll find it easier
to deal with the Ariel's boat, than with her
mother
;
but he carries a broad sail, I question if he
means to show play.
Never doubt him, boy, said Barnstable,
he is working off the shore, like a man of sense,
and besides, he has his spectacles on, trying to
make out what tribe of Yankee Indians we belong
to. You'll see him come to the wind presently,
and send a few pieces of iron down this way, by
the way of letting us know where to find him.
Much as I like your first lieutenant, Mr. Merry,
I would rather leave him on the land this day,
than see him on my decks. I want no fighting
captain to work this boat for me! but tell the
drummer, sir, to beat to quarters.
The boy, who was staggering under the weight
of his melodious instrument, had been expecting
this command, and, without waiting for the
midshipman
to communicate the order, he
commenced
that short rub-a-dub air, that will at any
time rouse a thousand men from the deepest
sleep, and cause them to fly to their means of
offence
,
with a common soul. The crew of the
Ariel had been collected in groups, studying the
appearance of the enemy, cracking their jokes, and
waiting only for this usual order to repair to the
guns; and at the first tap of the drum, they
spread with steadiness to the different parts of
the little vessel, where their various duties called
them. The cannon were surrounded by small
parties of vigorous and athletic young men; the
few marines were drawn up in array with muskets;
the officers appeared in their boarding caps, with
pistols stuck in their belts and naked sabres
in their hands. Barnstable paced his little
quarter-deck
with a firm tread, dangling a speaking
trumpet, by its lanyard, on his fore-finger, or
occasionally applying the glass to his eye, which,
when not in use, was placed under one arm,
while his sword was resting against the foot of
the mainmast; a pair of heavy ship's pistols were
thrust in his belt also; and piles of muskets,
boarding-pikes, and naked sabres, were placed
on different parts of the deck. The laugh of the
seamen was heard no longer; and those who
spoke, uttered their thoughts only in low and
indistinct
whispers.
The English cutter held her way from the land,
until she got an offing of more than two miles,
when she reduced her sails to a yet smaller
number
,
and heaving into the wind, she fired a gun
in a direction opposite to that which pointed to
the Ariel.
Now I would wager a quintal of codfish,
Master Coffin, said Barnstable, against the
best cask of porter that was ever brewed in
England
,
that fellow believes a Yankee schooner can
fly in the wind's eye! If he wishes to speak to us,
why don't he give his cutter a little sheet, and
come down.
The cockswain had made his arrangements for
the combat, with much more method and
philosophy
than any other man in the vessel. When the
drum beat to quarters, he threw aside his jacket,
vest, and shirt, with as little hesitation as if he
stood under an American sun, and with all the
discretion of a man who had engaged in an
undertaking
that required the free use of his utmost
powers. As he was known to be a privileged
individual
in the Ariel, and one whose opinions, in
all matters of seamanship, were regarded as
oracles
by the crew, and were listened to by his
commander
with no little demonstration of respect,
the question excited no surprise. He was standing
at the breech of his long gun, with his brawny
arms folded on a breast that had been turned to
the colour of blood by long exposure, his
grizzled
locks fluttering in the breeze, and his tall
form towering far above the heads of all near him.
He hugs the wind, sir, as if it was his
sweet-heart
,
was his answer; but he'll let go his hold,
soon; and if he don't, we can find a way to make
him fall to leeward.
Keep a good full! cried the commander, in
a stern voice, and let the vessel go through the
water. That fellow walks well, long Tom; but
we are too much for him on a bowline; though,
if he continue to draw ahead in this manner, it
will be night before we can get alongside him.
Ay, ay, sir, returned the cockswain; them
cutters carries a press of canvass, when they seem
to have but little; their gafts are all the same as
young booms, and spread a broad head to their
mainsails. But it's no hard matter to knock a
few cloths out of their bolt-ropes, when she will
both drop astarn and to leeward.
I believe there is good sense in your scheme,
this time, said Barnstable, for I am anxious
about the frigate's peoplethough I hate a noisy
chase; speak to him, Tom, and let us see if he
will answer.
Ay, ay, sir, cried the cockswain, sinking his
body in such a manner as to let his head fall to a
level with the cannon that he controlled, when,
after divers orders, and sundry movements, to
govern the direction of the piece, he applied a
match, with a rapid motion, to the priming. An
immense body of white smoke rushed from the
muzzle of the cannon, followed by a sheet of
vivid fire, until, losing its power, it yielded to the
wind, and, as it rose from the water, spread
like a cloud, and, passing through the masts of
the schooner, was driven far to leeward, and
soon blended in the mists which were swiftly
scudding before the fresh breezes of the ocean.
21*
Although many curious eyes were watching
this beautiful sight from the cliffs, there was too
little of novelty in the exhibition to attract a
single
look, of the crew of the schooner, from the
more important examination of the effect of the
shot on their enemy. Barnstable sprang lightly
on a gun, and watched the instant when the ball
would strike, with keen interest, while long Tom
threw himself aside from the line of the smoke,
with a similar intention; holding one of his long
arms extended towards his namesake, with a
finger
on the vent, and supporting his frame by
placing the hand of the other on the deck, as his
eyes glanced through an opposite port-hole, in an
attitude that most men might have despaired of
imitating with success.
There go the chips! cried Barnstable.
Bravo! Master Coffin, you never planted iron
in the ribs of an Englishman with more
judgment
;
let him have another piece of it, and if he
like the sport, we'll play a game of long bowls
with him!
Ay, ay, sir, returned the cockswain, who,
the instant he witnessed the effects of his shot,
had returned to superintend the reloading of his
gun; if he holds on half an hour longer, I'll
dub him down to our own size, when we can
close, and make an even fight of it.
The drum of the Englishman was now, for the
first time, heard, rattling across the waters, and
echoing the call to quarters, that had already
proceeded from the Ariel.
Ah! you have sent him to his guns! said
Barnstable; we shall now hear more of it;
wake him up, Tomwake him up.
We shall start him an end, or put him to
sleep altogether, shortly, said the deliberate
cockswain, who never allowed himself to be at
all hurried, even by his commander. My shot
are pretty much like a shoal of porpoises, and
commonly sail in each others' wake. Stand by
heave her breech forwardso; get out of that,
you damned young reprobate, and let my
harpoon
alone.
What are you at, there, Master Coffin?
cried Barnstable; are you tongue-tied?
Here's one of the boys skylarking with my
harpoon in the lee scuppers, and by-and-by, when
I shall want it most, there'll be a no-man's-land
to hunt for it in.
Never mind the boy, Tom; send him aft
here, to me, and I'll polish his behaviour; give
the Englishman some more iron.
I want the little villain to pass up my
cartridges
,
returned the angry old seaman; but
if you'll be so good, sir, as to hit him a crack or
two, now and then, as he goes by you to the
magazine
,
the monkey will learn his manners, and
the schooner's work will be all the better done for
it. A young herring-faced monkey! to
meddle
with a tool ye don't know the use of. If
your parents had spent more of their money on
your edication, and less on your outfit, you'd
ha' been a gentleman to what ye are now.
Hurrah! Tom, hurrah! cried Barnstable,
a little impatiently; is your namesake never to
open his throat again!
Ay, ay, sir; all ready, grumbled the
cockswain
,
depress a little; soso; a damn'd
young baboon-behav'd curmudgeon; overhaul
that forward fall more; stand by with your match
but I'll pay him! fire. This was the actual
commencement of the fight; for as the shot of
Tom Coffin travelled, as he had intimated, very
much in the same direction, their enemy found
the sport becoming too hot to be endured in
silence
;
and the report of the secoud gun from the
Ariel, was instantly followed by that of the whole
broadside of the Alacrity. The shot of the
cutter
flew in a very good direction, but her guns
were too light to give them efficiency at that
distance
,
and as one or two were heard to strike
against the bends of the schooner, and fall back,
innocuously, into the water, the cockswain, whose
good humour became gradually restored, as the
combat thickened, remarked, with his customary
apathy
Them count for no more than love taps
does the Englishman think that we are firing
salutes
!
Stir him up, Tom! every blow you give him
will help to open his eyes, cried Barnstable,
rubbing his hands with glee, as he witnessed the
success of his efforts to close.
Thus far the cockswain and his crew had the
fight, on the part of the Ariel, altogether to
themselves
,
the men who were stationed at the smaller
and shorter guns, standing in perfect idleness by
their sides; but in ten or fifteen minutes the
commander
of the Alacrity, who had been staggered
by the weight of the shot that had struck him,
found that it was no longer in his power to
retreat
,
if he wished it; when he decided on the
only course that was left for a brave man to
pursue
,
and steered, boldly, in such a direction as
would soonest bring him in contact with his enemy,
without exposing his vessel to be raked by his
fire. Barnstable watched each movement of his
foe with eagle eyes, and when the vessels had got
within a lessened distance, he gave the order for
a general fire to be opened. The action now
grew warm and spirited on both sides. The power
of the wind was counteracted by the constant
explosion of the cannon; and instead of driving
rapidly to leeward, a white canopy of curling
smoke hung above the Ariel, or rested on the
water
,
lingering in her wake, so as to mark the
path by which she was approaching to a closer
and still deadlier struggle. The shouts of the
young sailors, as they handled their instruments
of death, became more animated and fierce, while
the cockswain pursued his occupation with the
silence and skill of one who laboured in a
regular
vocation. Barnstable was unusually composed
and quiet, maintaining the grave deportment of
a commander on whom rested the fortunes of the
contest, at the same time that his dark eyes
were dancing with the fire of suppressed
animation
.
Give it them! he occasionally cried, in a
voice that might be heard amid the bellowing of
the cannon; never mind their cordage, my lads;
drive home their bolts, and make your marks
below
their ridge ropes.
In the mean time, the Englishman played a
manful game. He had suffered a heavy loss by
the distant cannonade, which no metal he
possessed
could retort upon his enemy; but he
struggled
nobly to repair the error in judgment with
which he had begun the contest. The two
vessels
gradually drew nigher to each other, until
they both entered into the common cloud, created
by their fire, which thickened and spread around
them in such a manner as to conceal their dark
hulls from the gaze of the curious and interested
spectators on the cliffs. The heavy reports of
the cannon were now mingled with the rattling of
muskets and pistols, and, streaks of fire might
be seen, glancing like flashes of lightning through
the white cloud, which enshrouded the combatants,
and many minutes of painful uncertainty followed,
before the deeply interested soldiers, who were
gazing at the scene, discovered on whose banners
victory had alighted.
We shall follow the combatants into their misty
wreath, and display to the reader the events as
they occurred.
The fire of the Ariel was much the most quick
and deadly, both because she had suffered less, and
her men were less exhausted; and the cutter stood
desperately on to decide the combat, after
grappling
,
hand to hand. Barnstable anticipated her
intention, and well understood her commander's
reason for adopting this course, but he was not a
man to calculate coolly his advantages, when
pride and daring invited him to a more severe
trial. Accordingly, he met the enemy half-way,
and, as the vessels rushed together, the stern of the
schooner was secured to the bows of the cutter, by
the joint efforts of both parties. The voice of the
English commander was now plainly to be heard,
in the uproar, calling to his men to follow him.
Away there, boarders! repel boarders on the
starboard quarter! shouted Barnstable through
his trumpet.
This was the last order that the gallant young
sailor gave with this instrument, for, as he spoke,
he cast it from him, and seizing his sabre, flew
to the spot where the enemy was about to make
his most desperate effort. The shouts,
execrations
,
and tauntings of the combatants, now
succeeded
to the roar of the cannon, which could be
used no longer with effect, though the fight was
still maintained with spirited discharges of the
small arms.
Sweep him from his decks! cried the English
commander, as he appeared on his own bulwarks,
surrounded by a dozen of his bravest men; drive
the rebellious dogs into the sea!
Away there, marines! retorted Barnstable,
firing his pistol at the advancing enemy; leave
not a man of them to sup his grog again.
The tremendous and close volley that succeeded
this order, nearly accomplished the command of
Barnstable to the letter, and the commander of
the Alacrity, perceiving that he stood alone,
reluctantly fell back on the deck of his own
vessel
,
in order to bring on his men once more.
Board her! gray beards and boys, idlers
and all! shouted Barnstable, springing in
advance
of his crewa powerful arm arrested the
movement of the dauntless seaman, and before
he had time to recover himself, he was drawn
violently
back to his own vessel, by the irresistible
grasp of his cockswain.
The fellow's in his flurry, said Tom, and
it wouldn't be wise to go within reach of his
flukes; but I'll just step ahead and give him a set
with my harpoon.
Without waiting for a reply, the cockswain
reared his tall frame on the bulwarks, and was in
the attitude of stepping on board of his enemy,
when a sea separated the vessels, and he fell with
a heavy dash of the waters into the ocean. As
twenty muskets and pistols were discharged at the
instant he appeared, the crew of the Ariel
supposed
his fall to be occasioned by his wounds, and
were rendered doubly fierce by the sight, and the
cry of their commander to
Revenge long Tom! board her; long Tom
or death!
They threw themselves forward in irresistible
numbers, and forced a passage, with much
blood-shed
,
to the forecastle of the Alacrity. The
Englishman
was overpowered, but still remained
undaunted
he
rallied his crew, and bore up most
gallantly to the fray. Thrusts of pikes, and blows
of sabres were becoming close and deadly, while
muskets and pistols were constantly discharged
by those who were kept at a distance by the
pressure
of the throng of closer combatants.
Barnstable led his men, in advance, and became
a mark of peculiar vengeance to his enemies,
as they slowly yielded before his vigorous
assaults
.
Chance had placed the two commanders
on opposite sides of the cutter's deck, and the
victory seemed to incline towards either party,
wherever these daring officers directed the
struggle
in person. But the Englishman, perceiving
that the ground he maintained in person was lost
elsewhere, made an effort to restore the battle by
changing his position, followed by one or two
of his best men. A marine, who preceded him,
levelled his musket within a few feet of the
head of the American commander, and was about
to fire, when Merry glided among the combatants,
and passed his dirk into the body of the man,
who fell at the blow; shaking his piece, with
horrid imprecations, the wounded soldier prepared
to deal his vengeance on his youthful assailant,
when the fearless boy leaped within its muzzle, and
buried his own keen weapon in his heart.
Hurrah! shouted the unconscious
Barnstable
,
from the edge of the quarter-deck, where,
attended by a few men, he was driving all before
him. Revengelong Tom and victory!
We have them! exclaimed the Englishman;
handle your pikes! we have them between two
fires.
The battle would probably have terminated
very differently from what previous circumstances
had indicated, had not a wild looking figure
appeared
in the cutter's channels at that moment,
issuing from the sea, and gaining the deck at the
same instant. It was long Tom, with his iron
visage rendered fierce by his previous
discomfiture
,
and his grizzled locks drenched with the
briny element, from which he had risen, looking
like Neptune with his trident. Without speaking,
he poised his harpoon, and with a powerful
effort, pinned the unfortunate Englishman to
the mast of his own vessel.
Starn all! cried Tom, by a sort of instinct,
when the blow was struck; and catching up the
musket of the fallen marine, he dealt out terrible
and fatal blows with its butt, on all who
approached
him, utterly disregarding the use of the
bayonet on its muzzle. The unfortunate
commander
of the Alacrity brandished his sword with
frantic gestures, while his eyes rolled in horrid
wildness, when he writhed for an instant in his
passing agonies, and then, as his head dropped
lifeless upon his gored breast, he hung against the
spar, a spectacle of dismay to his crew. A
few of the Englishmen stood, chained to the spot
in silent horror at the sight, but most of them fled
to their lower deck, or hastened to conceal
themselves
in the secret parts of the vessel, leaving to the
Americans the undisputed possession of the
Alacrity
.
Two thirds of the cutter's crew suffered either
in life or limbs, by this short struggle; nor was
the victory obtained by Barnstable without paying
the price of several valuable lives. The first burst
of conquest was not, however, the moment to
appreciate
the sacrifice, and loud and reiterated
shouts, proclaimed the exultation of the
conquerors
.
As the flush of victory subsided, however,
recollection returned, and Barnstable issued such
orders as humanity and his duty rendered
necessary
.
While the vessels were separating, and
the bodies of the dead and wounded were
removing
,
the conqueror paced the deck of his
prize, as if lost in deep reflection. He passed his
VOL. I. 22
hand, frequently, across his blackened and
blood-stained
brow, while his eyes would rise to
examine
the vast canopy of smoke that was hovering
above the vessels, like a dense fog exhaling from
the ocean. The result of his deliberations was
soon announced to his crew.
Haul down all your flags, he cried; set
the Englishman's colours again, and show the
enemy's jack above our own ensign in the Ariel.
The appearance of the whole channel-fleet
within
half gun shot, would not have occasioned more
astonishment among the victors, than this
extraordinary
mandate. The wondering seamen
suspended
their several employments, to gaze at the
singular change that was making in the flags,
those symbols that were viewed with a sort of
reverence
,
but none presumed to comment openly on
the procedure, except long Tom, who stood on the
quarter-deck of the prize, straightening the
pliable
iron of the harpoon which he had recovered,
with as much care and diligence as if it were
necessary
to the maintenance of their conquest.
Like the others, however, he suspended his
employment
,
when he heard this order, and
manifested
no reluctance to express his dissatisfaction
at the measure.
If the Englishmen grumble at the fight, and
think it not fair play, muttered the old
cockswain
,
let us try it over again, sir; as they are
somewhat short of hands, they can send a boat
to the land, and get off a gang of them lazy
riptyles
,
the soldiers, who stand looking at us, like
so many red lizzards crawling on a beach, and
we'll give them another chance; but damme, if I
see the use of whipping them, if this is to be the
better-end of the matter.
What's that you're grumbling there, like a dead
north-easter, you horse mackerel! said
Barnstable
;
where are our friends and countrymen
who are on the land! are we to leave them to
swing on gibbets or rot in dungeons!
The cockswain listened with great earnestness,
and when his commander had spoken, he struck
the palm of his broad hand against his brawny
thigh, with a report like a pistol, and answered,
I see how it is, sir; you reckon the red coats
have Mr. Griffith in tow. Just run the schooner
into shoal water, Captain Barnstable, and drop
an anchor, where we can get the long gun to bear
on them, and give me the whale-boat and five or
six men to back methey must have long legs
if they get an offing before I run them aboard!
Fool! do you think a boat's crew could
contend
with fifty armed soldiers!
Soldiers! echoed Tom, whose spirits had
been strongly excited by the conflict, snapping
his finger with ineffable disdain, that for all
the soldiers that were ever rigged: one whale could
kill a thousand of them! and here stands the man
that has kill'd his round hundred of whales!
Pshaw, you grampus, do you turn braggart
in your old age!
It's no bragging, sir, to speak a log-book
truth! but if Captain Barnstable thinks that
old Tom Coffin carries a speaking trumpet for a
figure head, let him pass the word forrard to man
the boats.
No, no, my old master at the marlingspike,
said Barnstable, kindly, I know thee too well,
thou brother of Neptune! but, shall we not throw
the bread-room dust in those Englishmen's eyes,
by wearing their bunting awhile, till something
may offer to help our captured countrymen.
The cockswain shook his head, and cogitated
a moment, as if struck with sundry new ideas,
when he answered
Ay, ay, sir; that's blue-water-philosophy:
as deep as the sea! Let the riptyles clew up the
corners of their mouths to their eye-brows, now!
when they come to hear the ra'al yankee truth
of the matter, they will sheet them down to their
leather neckcloths!
With this reflection the cockswain was much
consoled, and the business of repairing damages
and securing the prize, proceeded without further
interruption on his part. The few prisoners who
were unhurt, were rapidly transferred to the
Ariel. While Barnstable was attending to this
duty, an unusual bustle drew his eyes to one of
the hatchways, where he beheld a couple of his
marines dragging forward a gentleman, whose
demeanour and appearance indicated the most
abject
terror. After examining the extraordinary
appearance of this individual, for a moment, in
silent amazement, the lieutenant exclaimed
Who have we here! some amateur in fights!
an inquisitive, wonder-seeking non-combatant,
who has volunteered to serve his king, and
perhaps
draw a picture, or write a book, to serve
himself! Pray, sir, in what capacity did you
serve in this vessel?
The captive ventured a sidelong glance at his
interrogator, in whom he expected to encounter
Griffith, but perceiving that it was a face he did
not know, he felt a revival of confidence that
enabled
him to reply
I came here by accident; being on board
the cutter at the time her late commander
determined
to engage you. It was not in his power
to land me, as I trust you will not hesitate to do;
your conjecture of my being a non-combatant
Is perfectly true, interrupted Barnstable;
it requires no spy-glass to read that name
written
on you from stem to stern; but for certain
weighty reasons
He paused to turn at a signal given him by
young Merry, who whispered eagerly in his ear
'Tis Mr. Dillon, kinsman of Colonel
Howard
;
I've seen him often, sailing in the wake of
my cousin Cicily.
Dillon! exclaimed Barnstable, rubbing his
hands with pleasure; what, Kit of that name!
he with `the Savannah face, eyes of black, and
skin of the same colour;' he's grown a little
whiter with fear; but he's a prize, at this
moment
,
worth twenty Alacritys!
These exclamations were made in a low voice,
and at some little distance from the prisoner,
whom he now approached, and addressed
Policy, and consequently duty, require that
I should detain you for a short time, sir; but you
shall have a sailor's welcome to whatever we
possess
,
to lessen the weight of captivity.
Barnstable precluded any reply, by bowing to
his captive, and turning away, to superintend the
management of his vessels. In a short time it
was announced that they were ready to make sail,
when the Ariel and her prize were brought
close to the wind, and commenced beating slowly
along the land, as if intending to return to the
bay whence the latter had sailed that
morning
.
As they stretched into the shore, on the first
tack, the soldiers on the cliffs rent the air with
their shouts and acclamations, to which Barnstable,
pointing to the assumed symbols that were
fluttering
in the breeze from his masts, directed his
crew to respond in the most cordial manner. As
the distance, and the want of boats, prevented
any further communication, the soldiers, after
gazing
at the receding vessels for a time, disappeared
from the cliffs, and were soon lost from the sight
of the adventurous mariners. Hour after hour
was consumed in the tedious navigation, against
an adverse tide, and the short day was drawing to
a close, before they approached the mouth of their
destined haven. As they made one of their
numerous
stretches, to and from the land, the
cutter
,
in which Barnstable continued, passed the
victim of their morning's sport, riding on the
water, the waves curling over his huge carcass as
on some rounded rock, and already surrounded
by the sharks, who were preying on his
defenceless
body.
See! Master Coffin, cried the lieutenant,
pointing out the object to his cockswain, as they
glided by it, the shovel-nosed gentlemen are
regaling daintily; you have neglected the
christian's
duty of burying your dead.
The old seaman cast a melancholy look at the
dead whale, and replied,
If I had the creatur in Boston Bay, or on
the Sandy Point of Munny-Moy, 'twould be the
making of me! But riches and honour are for
the great and the larned, and there's nothing left
for poor Tom Coffin to do, but to veer and haul
on his own rolling-tackle, that he may ride out
the rest of the gale of life, without springing any
of his old spars.
How now, long Tom! cried his officer,
these rocks and cliffs will shipwreck you on
the shoals of poetry yet; you grow sentimental!
Them rocks might wrack any vessel that
struck them, said the literal cockswain; and
as for poetry, I wants none better than the good
old song of Captain Kid; but it's enough to raise
solemn thoughts in a Cape Poge Indian, to see
an eighty barrel whale devoured by shirks'tis
an awful waste of property! I've seen the death
of two hundred of the creaturs, though it seems
to keep the rations of poor old long Tom as short
as ever.
The cockswain walked aft, while the vessel was
passing the whale, and seating himself on the
taffrail, with his face resting gloomily on his bony
hand, he fastened his eyes on the object of his
solicitude
,
and continued to gaze at it with
melancholy
regret, until it was no longer to be seen
glistening in the sunbeams, as it rolled its
glittering
side of white into the air, or the rays fell
unreflected on the black and rougher coat of the
back of the monster. In the mean time, the
navigators
diligently pursued their way for the
haven we have mentioned, into which they
steered with every appearance of the fearlessness
of friends, and the exultation of conquerors.
A few eager and gratified spectators lined the
edges of the small bay, and Barnstable concluded
his arrangement for deceiving his enemy, by
admonishing
his crew, that they were now about to
enter on a service that would require their utmost
intrepidity and sagacity.
END OF VOL. I.Believing that Providence may conduct me
where we shall meet, or whence I may be able to
transmit to you this account, I have prepared a
short statement of the situation of Cecilia
Howard
and myself; not, however, to urge you and
Griffith to any rash or foolish hazards, but that
you may both sit down, and, after due
consultation
,
determine on what is proper for our relief.
By this time, you must understand the
character
of Colonel Howard too well to expect he
will ever consent to give his niece to a rebel. He
Vol. I. 7
has already sacrificed to his loyalty, as he calls
it, (but I whisper to Cecilia, 'tis his treason,) not
only his native country, but no small part of his
fortune also. In the frankness of my disposition,
(you know my frankness, Barnstable, but too
well!) I confessed to him, after the defeat of the
mad attempt Griffith made to carry off Cecilia,
in Carolina, that I had been foolish enough to
enter into some weak promise to the brother
officer
who had accompanied the young sailor in his
traitorous visits to the plantation. Heigho! I
sometimes think it would have been better for us
all, if your ship had never been chased into the
river, or after she was there, if Griffith had made
no attempt to renew his acquaintance with my
cousin. The colonel received the intelligence as
such a guardian would hear that his ward was
about to throw away thirty thousand dollars and
herself on a traitor to his king and country. I
defended you stoutly; said that you had no
king, as the tie was dissolved; that America was
your country, and that your profession was
honourable
;
but it would not all do. He called
you rebel; that I was used to. He said you
were a traitor; that, in his vocabulary, amounts
to the same thing. He even hinted that you were
a coward; and that I knew to be false, and did
not hesitate to tell him so. He used fifty
opprobrious
terms that I cannot remember, but
among others were the beautiful epithets of `
disorganizer
,'
`leveller,' `democrat,' and `jacobin.'
(I hope he did not mean a monk!) In short, he
acted Colonel Howard in a rage. But as his
dominion does not, like that of his favourite kings,
continue from generation to generation, and one
short year will release me from his power, and
leave me mistress of my own actions, that is, if
your fine promises are to be believed, I bore it
all very well, being resolved to suffer any thing
but martyrdom, rather than abandon Cecilia.
She, dear girl, has much more to distress her than
I can have; she is not only the ward of Colonel
Howard, but his niece, and his sole heir. I am
persuaded this latter circumstance makes no
difference
in either her conduct or her feelings, but
he appears to think it gives him a right to
tyrannize
over her on all occasions. After all,
Colonel
Howard is a gentleman when you do not
put him in a passion, and, I believe, a thoroughly
honest man, and Cecilia even loves him. But a
man who is driven from his country, in his
sixtieth
year, with the loss of near half his fortune,
is not apt to canonize those who compel the
change.
It seems that when the Howards lived on
this island, a hundred years ago, they dwelt in
the county of Northumberland. Hither, then,
he brought us, when political events, and his
dread of becoming the uncle to a rebel, induced
him to abandon America, as he says, for ever.
We have been here now three months, and for
two thirds of that time we lived in tolerable
comfort
;
but latterly, the papers have announced the
arrival of the ship and your schooner in France,
and from that moment as strict a watch has been
kept over us, as if we had meditated a renewal of
the Carolina flight. The colonel, on his arrival
here, hired an old building, that is part house,
part abbey, part castle, and all prison, because
it is said to have once belonged to an ancestor of
his. In this delightful dwelling there are many
cages, that will secure more uneasy birds than
we are. About a fortnight ago an alarm was
given in a neighbouring village, which is situated
on the shore, that two American vessels,
answering
your description, had been seen hovering
along the coast; and, as the people in this
quarter
dream of nothing but that terrible fellow,
Paul Jones, it was said that he was on board one
of them. But I believe that Colonel Howard
suspects who you really are. He was very
minute
in his inquiries, I hear; and since then, has
established a sort of garrison in the house, under
the pretence of defending it against marauders,
like those who are said to have laid my Lady
Selkirk under contribution.
Now, understand me, Barnstable; on no
account
would I have you risk yourself on shore;
neither must there be blood spilt, if you love me;
but that you may know what sort of a place we
are confined in, and by whom surrounded, I will
describe both our prison and the garrison. The
whole building is of stone, and not to be
attempted
with slight means. It has windings and
turnings
,
both internally and externally, that would
require more skill than I possess to make
intelligible
;
but the rooms we inhabit are in the upper
or third floor of a wing, that you may call a
tower, if you are in a romantic mood, but which,
in truth, is nothing but a wing. Would to God I
could fly with it! If any accident should bring
you in sight of the dwelling, you will know our
rooms, by the three smoky vanes that whiffle
about its pointed roof, and, also, by the windows
in that story being occasionally open. Opposite
to our windows, at the distance of half a mile, is
a retired, unfrequented ruin, concealed, in a great
measure, from observation by a wood, and
affording
none of the best accommodations, it is
true, but shelter in some of its vaults or
apartments
.
I have prepared, according to the
explanations
you once gave me on this subject, a
set of small signals, of differently coloured silks,
and a little dictionary of all the phrases that I
could imagine as useful, to refer to, properly
numbered to correspond with the key and the
flags, all of which I shall send you with this
letter
.
You must prepare your own flags, and of
course I retain mine, as well as a copy of the
key and book. If opportunity should ever offer,
we can have, at least, a pleasant discourse
together
;
you from the top of the old tower in the
ruins, and I from the east window of my
dressing-room
!
But now for the garrison. In
addition
to the commandant, Colonel Howard, who
retains all the fierceness of his former military
profession, there is, as his second in authority,
that bane of Cecilia's happiness, Kit Dillon, with
his long Savannah face, scornful eyes of black, and
skin of the same colour. This gentleman, you
know, is a distant relative of the Howards, and
wishes to be more nearly allied. He is poor, it
is true, but then, as the colonel daily remarks,
he is a good and loyal subject, and no rebel.
When I asked why he was not in arms in these
stirring times, contending for the prince he loves
so much, the colonel answers, that it is not his
profession, that he has been educated for the
law, and was destined to fill one of the highest
judicial stations in the colonies, and that he
hoped he should yet live to see him sentence
certain
nameless gentlemen to condign punishment.
This was consoling, to be sure, but I bore it.
However, he left Carolina with us, and here he
is, and here he is likely to continue, unless you
can catch him, and anticipate his judgment on
himself. This gentleman the colonel has long
desired to see the husband of Cecilia, and since
the news of your being on the coast, the siege
has nearly amounted to a storm. The
consequences
are, that my cousin at first kept her
room, and then the colonel kept her there, and
7*
even now she is precluded from leaving the wing
we inhabit. In addition to these two principal
gaolers, we have four men servants, two black
and two white; and an officer and twenty
soldiers
from the neighbouring town are billeted
on us, by particular desire, until the coast is
declared
free from pirates! yes, that is the musical
name they give youand when their own people
land, and plunder, and rob, and murder the men
and insult the women, they are called heroes!
It's a fine thing to be able to make dictionaries,
and invent namesand it must be your fault, if
mine has been framed for no purpose. I declare,
when I recollect all the insulting and cruel things
I hear in this country, of my own and her
people
,
it makes me lose my temper, and forget my
sex; but do not let my ill humour urge you to
any thing rash; remember your life, remember
their prisons, remember your reputation, but do
not, do not forget your
Katherine Plowden.
P. S. I had almost forgotten to tell you, that
in the signal-book you will find a more particular
description of our prison, where it stands, and a
drawing of the grounds, &c.